










 













 




Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version














Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version















Tridentine Mass - Wikipedia






















 






Tridentine Mass

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the forms of the Mass liturgy prior to 1570, see Pre-Tridentine Mass.




Elevation of the chalice after the consecration during a Solemn Mass


The Tridentine Mass, now officially often referred to as the Extraordinary Form of the Roman Rite ('Extraordinary Form for short; Latin: forma extraordinaria), is the Roman Rite Mass which appears in typical editions of the Roman Missal published from 1570 to 1962.[1] The most widely used Mass liturgy in the world until the introduction of the Mass of Paul VI in 1969, it is celebrated in ecclesiastical Latin.[2]
"Tridentine" is derived from the Latin Tridentinus, "related to the city of Tridentum" (modern-day Trent, Italy). In response to a decision of the Council of Trent,[3] Pope Pius V promulgated the 1570 Roman Missal, making it mandatory throughout the Latin Church, except in places and religious orders with missals from before 1370.[4] Despite being often described as "the (Traditional) Latin Mass", the Mass of Paul VI (the Novus Ordo Missae) that replaced it as the Ordinary Form of the Roman Rite has its official text in Latin and is sometimes celebrated in that language.[5][6]
In 2007, Pope Benedict XVI issued the motu proprio Summorum Pontificum, accompanied by a letter to the world's bishops authorizing use of the Tridentine Mass and Ritual for competent priests. The Pope stated that the 1962 edition of the Roman Missal is to be considered an "extraordinary form" (forma extraordinaria)[7] of the Roman Rite, of which the 1970 Mass of Paul VI is the ordinary, normal or standard form. Since that is the only authorized extraordinary form, some refer to the 1962 Tridentine Mass as "the extraordinary form" of the Mass.[8] The 1962 Tridentine Mass is sometimes referred to as the "usus antiquior" (older use) or "forma antiquior" (older form),[9] to differentiate it from the Mass of Paul VI, again in the sense of being the only one of the older forms for which authorization has been granted.
In Masses celebrated without the people, Latin Rite Catholic priests are free to use either the 1962 Tridentine missal or the Ordinary Form missal. These Masses "may—observing all the norms of law—also be attended by faithful who, of their own free will, ask to be admitted".[10] Permission to use the Tridentine Mass as parish liturgies may be given by the pastor or rector.[11]



Contents


1 Language
2 Terminology
3 Pope St. Pius V's revision of the liturgy
4 Historical variations

4.1 Typical editions of the Roman Missal
4.2 1962 Missal


5 Liturgical structure

5.1 Before Mass
5.2 Mass of the Catechumens

5.2.1 Prayers at the foot of the altar
5.2.2 Priest at the altar
5.2.3 Instruction


5.3 Mass of the Faithful

5.3.1 Offertory
5.3.2 Consecration
5.3.3 Elevation candle
5.3.4 Communion
5.3.5 Conclusion


5.4 Prayers of the priest before and after Mass
5.5 Leonine Prayers
5.6 Participation by the people


6 Different levels of celebration
7 Revision of the Roman Missal

7.1 Opposition to the latest revisions of the liturgy


8 Attitudes of Popes since the Second Vatican Council

8.1 Pope Paul VI
8.2 Pope John Paul II
8.3 Pope Benedict XVI


9 Present regulations
10 Present practice
11 See also
12 References
13 External links

13.1 Full texts of Tridentine Roman Missals
13.2 Texts of parts of the Tridentine Missal (post-1604)
13.3 History
13.4 Comparison with non-Roman Western rites and uses
13.5 Media
13.6 Directories of Latin Masses





Language[edit]
In most countries, the language used for celebrating the Tridentine Mass was (and is) Latin. However, in Dalmatia and parts of Istria in Croatia, the liturgy was celebrated in Church Slavonic, and authorisation for use of this language was extended to some other Slavic regions between 1886 and 1935.[12][13]
After the publication of the 1962 edition of the Roman Missal, the 1964 Instruction on implementing the Constitution on Sacred Liturgy of the Second Vatican Council laid down that "normally the epistle and gospel from the Mass of the day shall be read in the vernacular". Episcopal conferences were to decide, with the consent of the Holy See, what other parts, if any, of the Mass were to be celebrated in the vernacular.[14]
Outside the Roman Catholic Church, the vernacular language was introduced into the celebration of the Tridentine Mass by some Old Catholics and Anglo-Catholics with the introduction of the English Missal.
Some Western Rite Orthodox Christians, particularly in the Antiochian Orthodox Archdiocese of North America, use the Tridentine Mass in the vernacular with minor alterations under the title of the "Divine Liturgy of St. Gregory".
Most Old Catholics use the Tridentine Mass, either in the vernacular or in Latin.
Terminology[edit]




A pre-1969 Roman Rite high altar decorated with reredos and fixed on a three step platform, at which the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar are said. Leaning against the Tabernacle and two of the candlesticks are altar cards to remind the celebrant of the words when he is away from the missal


The Catholic Church uses the term extraordinary form of the Roman Rite Mass among other terms.[7] The most widespread term for the rite, other than "Tridentine Mass", is "Latin Mass". Likewise, the ordinary form of the Roman Rite Mass was promulgated in Latin and can be celebrated in that language.[15]
Occasionally the term "Gregorian Rite" is used when talking about the Tridentine Mass,[16][discuss] as is, more frequently, "Tridentine Rite".[17] Pope Benedict XVI declared it inappropriate to speak of the versions of the Roman Missal of before and after 1970 as if they were two rites. Rather, he said, it is a matter of a twofold use of one and the same rite.[18]
Traditionalist Catholics, whose best-known characteristic is an attachment to the Tridentine Mass, frequently refer to it as the "Traditional Mass" or the "Traditional Latin Mass". They describe as a "codifying" of the form of the Mass the preparation of Pius V's edition of the Roman Missal, of which he said that the experts to whom he had entrusted the work collated the existing text with ancient manuscripts and writings, restored it to "the original form and rite of the holy Fathers" and further emended it.[19] To distinguish this form of Mass from the Mass of Paul VI, traditionalist Catholics sometimes call it the "Mass of the Ages",[20][21][22][23][24][25] and say that it comes down to us "from the Church of the Apostles, and ultimately, indeed, from Him Who is its principal Priest and its spotless Victim".[26][27]
Pope St. Pius V's revision of the liturgy[edit]
At the time of the Council of Trent, the traditions preserved in printed and manuscript missals varied considerably, and standardization was sought both within individual dioceses and throughout the Latin West. Standardization was required also in order to prevent the introduction into the liturgy of Protestant ideas in the wake of the Protestant Reformation.
Pope St. Pius V accordingly imposed uniformity by law in 1570 with the papal bull "Quo primum", ordering use of the Roman Missal as revised by him.[19] He allowed only those rites that were at least 200 years old to survive the promulgation of his 1570 Missal. Several of the rites that remained in existence were progressively abandoned, though the Ambrosian rite survives in Milan, Italy and neighbouring areas, stretching even into Switzerland, and the Mozarabic rite remains in use to a limited extent in Toledo and Madrid, Spain. The Carmelite, Carthusian and Dominican religious orders kept their rites, but in the second half of the 20th century two of these three chose to adopt the Roman Rite. The rite of Braga, in northern Portugal, seems to have been practically abandoned: since 18 November 1971 that archdiocese authorizes its use only on an optional basis.[28]
Beginning in the late 17th century, France and neighbouring areas, such as Münster, Cologne and Trier in Germany, saw a flurry of independent missals published by bishops influenced by Jansenism and Gallicanism. This ended when Abbot Guéranger and others initiated in the 19th century a campaign to return to the Roman Missal.
Pius V's revision of the liturgy had as one of its declared aims the restoration of the Roman Missal "to the original form and rite of the holy Fathers".[19] Due to the relatively limited resources available to his scholars, this aim was in fact not realised.[29]
Three different printings of Pius V's Roman Missal, with minor variations, appeared in 1570, a folio and a quarto edition in Rome and a folio edition in Venice. A reproduction of what is considered to be the earliest, referred to therefore as the editio princeps, was produced in 1998.[30] In the course of the printing of the editio princeps, some corrections were made by pasting revised texts over parts of the already printed pages.[31] There were several printings again in the following year 1571, with various corrections of the text.[32]
Historical variations[edit]




Missale Romanum in Croatian Glagolitic script printed in 1483


In the Apostolic Constitution (papal bull) Quo primum, with which he prescribed use of his 1570 edition of the Roman Missal, Pius V decreed: "We order and enjoin that nothing must be added to Our recently published Missal, nothing omitted from it, nor anything whatsoever be changed within it." This of course did not exclude changes by a Pope, and Pope Pius V himself added to the Missal the feast of Our Lady of Victory, to celebrate the victory of Lepanto of 7 October 1571. His immediate successor, Pope Gregory XIII, changed the name of this feast to "The Most Holy Rosary of the Blessed Virgin Mary" and Pope John XXIII changed it to "Our Lady of the Rosary".
Pius V's work in severely reducing the number of feasts in the Roman Calendar (see this comparison) was very soon further undone by his successors. Feasts that he had abolished, such as those of the Presentation of Mary, Saint Anne and Saint Anthony of Padua, were restored even before Clement VIII's 1604 typical edition of the Missal was issued.
In the course of the following centuries new feasts were repeatedly added and the ranks of certain feasts were raised or lowered. A comparison between Pope Pius V's Tridentine Calendar and the General Roman Calendar of 1954 shows the changes made from 1570 to 1954. Pope Pius XII made a general revision in 1955, and Pope John XXIII made further general revisions in 1960 simplifying the terminology concerning the ranking of liturgical celebrations.
While keeping on 8 December what he called the feast of "the Conception of Blessed Mary" (omitting the word "Immaculate"), Pius V suppressed the existing special Mass for the feast, directing that the Mass for the Nativity of Mary (with the word "Nativity" replaced by "Conception") be used instead. Part of that earlier Mass was revived in the Mass that Pope Pius IX ordered to be used on the feast.
Typical editions of the Roman Missal[edit]




Altar of Santa Cecilia in Trastevere, as arranged in 1700:[33] one of many churches in Rome whose altar, placed at the western end of the church, was positioned so that the priest necessarily faced east, and so towards the people, when celebrating Mass[34]


In addition to such occasional changes, the Roman Missal was subjected to general revisions whenever a new "typical edition" (an official edition whose text was to be reproduced in printings by all publishers) was issued.
After Pius V's original Tridentine Roman Missal, the first new typical edition was promulgated in 1604 by Pope Clement VIII, who in 1592 had issued a revised edition of the Vulgate. The Bible texts in the Missal of Pope Pius V did not correspond exactly to the new Vulgate, and so Clement edited and revised Pope Pius V's Missal, making alterations both in the scriptural texts and in other matters. He abolished some prayers that the 1570 Missal obliged the priest to say on entering the church; shortened the two prayers to be said after the Confiteor; directed that the words "Haec quotiescumque feceritis, in meam memoriam facietis" ("Do this in memory of me") should not be said while displaying the chalice to the people after the consecration, but before doing so; inserted directions at several points of the Canon that the priest was to pronounce the words inaudibly; suppressed the rule that, at High Mass, the priest, even if not a bishop, was to give the final blessing with three signs of the cross; and rewrote the rubrics, introducing, for instance, the ringing of a small bell.[35]
The next typical edition was issued in 1634, when Pope Urban VIII made another general revision of the Roman Missal.[36]
There was no further typical edition until that of Pope Leo XIII in 1884.[37] It introduced only minor changes, not profound enough to merit having the papal bull of its promulgation included in the Missal, as the bulls of 1604 and 1634 were.
In 1911, with the bull Divino Afflatu,[38] Pope Pius X made significant changes in the rubrics. He died in 1914, so it fell to his successor Pope Benedict XV to issue a new typical edition incorporating his changes. This 1920 edition included a new section headed: "Additions and Changes in the Rubrics of the Missal in accordance with the Bull Divino afflatu and the Subsequent Decrees of the Sacred Congregation of Rites". This additional section was almost as long as the previous section on the "General Rubrics of the Missal", which continued to be printed unchanged.
Pope Pius XII radically revised the Palm Sunday and Easter Triduum liturgy, suppressed many vigils and octaves and made other alterations in the calendar (see General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII), reforms that were completed in Pope John XXIII's 1960 Code of Rubrics, which were incorporated in the final 1962 typical edition of the Tridentine Missal, replacing both Pius X's "Additions and Changes in the Rubrics of the Missal" and the earlier "General Rubrics of the Missal".
Changes made to the liturgy in 1965 and 1967 in the wake of decisions of the Second Vatican Council were not incorporated in the Roman Missal, but were reflected in the provisional vernacular translations produced when the language of the people began to be used in addition to Latin. This explains the references sometimes seen to "the 1965 Missal".
The General Roman Calendar was revised partially in 1955 and 1960 and completely in 1969 in Pope Paul VI's motu proprio Mysterii Paschalis, again reducing the number of feasts.[39]
1962 Missal[edit]
The Roman Missal issued by Pope John XXIII in 1962 differed from earlier editions in a number of ways.

It incorporated the change made by John XXIII in 1962, when he inserted into the canon of the Mass the name of Saint Joseph, the first change for centuries in the canon of the Mass.[40]
It incorporated major changes that Pope Pius XII made in 1955 in the liturgy of Palm Sunday and the Easter Triduum. These included:

Abolition of the ceremonies whereby the blessing of palms on Palm Sunday resembled a Mass, with Epistle, Gospel, Preface and Sanctus; suppression of the knocking three times on the closed doors before returning to the church after the blessing and distribution of the palms; omission of the prayers at the foot of the altar and of the Last Gospel.
On Holy Thursday the washing of feet was incorporated into the Mass instead of being an independent ceremony; if done by a bishop, 12 men, not 13, had their feet washed; the Mass itself was said in the evening instead of the morning and some of its prayers were removed or altered.
On Good Friday, elements that suggested the usual practices of the Mass were removed: the sacred ministers began the liturgy in alb and (for celebrant and deacon) black stoles, rather than respectively in black chasuble, dalmatic, and tunicle, as per a typical Mass; the sacred ministers donned their vestments (without maniples) only for the Solemn Intercessions, in which the celebrant wore a cope instead of a chasuble, and removed them for the adoration of the Cross; the sacred ministers changed to violet vestments (again, without maniples) for the distribution of Holy Communion; "Let us pray. Let us kneel. Arise" was added at the prayer for the Jews, and the adjective perfidis was removed (see Good Friday Prayer for the Jews); an afternoon Communion Service replaced the morning Mass of the Presanctified, at which the priest alone received the earlier-consecrated host, and drank unconsecrated wine into which a small portion of the consecrated host had been put.
The Easter Vigil was moved from Holy Saturday morning to the following nighttime; the use of a triple candle was abolished and other changes were made both to the initial ceremonies centred on the Paschal Candle and to other parts, such as the reduction from twelve to four of the prophecies read, and the introduction of a "renewal of baptismal promises" for the laity (notable for being the first time since the codification of the Missal of Pope Pius V that the vernacular was permitted to be used in such a manner).


It incorporated the rubrical changes made by Pope Pius XII's 1955 decree Cum nostra, which included:

Vigils were abolished except those of Easter, Christmas, Ascension, Pentecost, Saints Peter and Paul, Saint John the Baptist, and Saint Lawrence;
all octaves were abolished except those of Easter, Christmas and Pentecost;
no more than three collects were to be said at Low Mass and one at Solemn Mass.


Its calendar incorporated both the changes made by Pope Pius XII in 1955 (General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII) and those introduced by Pope John XXIII himself with his 1960 Code of Rubrics (General Roman Calendar of 1960). These included:

suppression of the "Solemnity of Saint Joseph, Spouse of the Blessed Virgin Mary" (Wednesday after the second Sunday after Easter) and its replacement by the feast of "Saint Joseph the Worker" (1 May);
removal of some duplicate feasts that appeared twice in earlier versions of the calendar, namely, the Chair of Saint Peter at Rome (18 January), the Finding of the Holy Cross (3 May), Saint John before the Latin Gate (6 May), the Apparition of Saint Michael (8 May), Saint Peter in Chains (1 August), and the Invention of the Relics of Saint Stephen (3 August);
addition of feasts such as that of the Queenship of Mary (31 May).


It replaced the Roman Missal's introductory sections, Rubricae generales Missalis (General Rubrics of the Missal) and Additiones et variationes in rubricis Missalis ad normam Bullae "Divino afflatu" et subsequentium S.R.C. Decretorum (Additions and alterations to the Rubrics of the Missal in line with the Bull Divino afflatu and the subsequent decrees of the Sacred Congregation of Rites), with the text of the General Rubrics and the General Rubrics of the Roman Missal parts of the 1960 Code of Rubrics.

Pope Benedict XVI authorized, under certain conditions, continued use of this 1962 edition of the Roman Missal as an extraordinary form of the Roman Rite,[41] alongside the later form, introduced in 1970, which is now the normal or ordinary form.[42] Pre-1962 forms of the Roman Rite, which some individuals and groups employ,[43] are not authorized for liturgical use.
Liturgical structure[edit]
The Mass is divided into two parts, the Mass of the Catechumens and the Mass of the Faithful. Catechumens, those being instructed in the faith,[44] were once dismissed after the first half, not having yet professed the faith. Profession of faith was considered essential for participation in the Eucharistic sacrifice.[45]
This rule of the Didache is still in effect. It is only one of the three conditions (baptism, right faith and right living) for admission to receiving Holy Communion that the Catholic Church has always applied and that were already mentioned in the early 2nd century by Saint Justin Martyr: "And this food is called among us the Eucharist, of which no one is allowed to partake but the man who believes that the things which we teach are true, and who has been washed with the washing that is for the remission of sins, and unto regeneration, and who is so living as Christ has enjoined" (First Apology, Chapter LXVI).
Before Mass[edit]

Asperges (Sprinkling with holy water, Psalm 51:9, 3) is an optional penitential rite that ordinarily precedes only the principal Mass on Sunday.[46] In the sacristy, a priest wearing an alb, if he is to celebrate the Mass, or surplice, if he is not the celebrant of the Mass, and vested with a stole, which is the color of the day if the priest is the celebrant of the Mass or purple if he is not the celebrant of the Mass, exorcises and blesses salt and water, then puts the blessed salt into the water by thrice sprinkling it in the form of a cross while saying once, "Commixtio salis et aquæ pariter fiat in nomine Patris, et Filii et Spiritus Sancti" (May a mixture of salt and water now be made in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Spirit). After that, the priest, vested in a cope of the color of the day, while the choir sings an antiphon and a verse of Psalm 50/51 or 117/118, sprinkles with the holy water the altar three times, and then the clergy and the congregation. This rite, if used, precedes the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar. During the Easter season, the "Asperges me..." verse is replaced by the "Vidi aquam..." verse, and "Alleluia" is added to the "Ostende nobis..." verse and to its response.

Following the Asperges, Mass begins.
Mass of the Catechumens[edit]
The first part is the Mass of the Catechumens.[47]
Prayers at the foot of the altar[edit]




Prayers at the foot of the altar


The sequence of Prayers at the foot of the altar is:

Sign of the cross


The priest, after processing in—at solemn Mass with deacon, and subdeacon, master of ceremonies and servers, and at other Masses with one or more servers—and at Low Mass placing the veiled chalice on the centre of the altar, makes the sign of the cross at the foot of the altar. At Solemn Mass, the chalice is placed beforehand on the credence table.


Psalm 42 (Psalm 43 MT, i.e. Masoretic numbering), known by its incipit Iudica me, is recited, except in Masses of the season during Passiontide and in Requiem Masses. It is preceded and followed by an antiphon of Psalm 42:4 (43:4 MT) "Introibo ad altare Dei, ad Deum qui lætificat iuventutem meam" (Translation: "I shall go in to the altar of God, the God who gives joy to my youth"), is recited by the priest, alternating with the deacon and subdeacon (if present) or servers.
Psalm 124:8 is recited:


Priest (makes the sign of the cross): "Our help is in the name of the Lord,"
Servers: "Who made heaven and earth."


The double form of a prayer of general confession of sins, known by its incipit Confiteor (I confess), is recited:


Priest (while bowing low): "Confíteor Deo omnipoténti, beátæ Maríæ semper Vírgini, beáto Michaéli Archángelo, beáto Ioanni Baptístæ, sanctis Apóstolis Petro et Paulo, ómnibus Sanctis, et vobis, fratres (tibi, Pater), quia peccávi nimis cogitatióne, verbo et ópere: (while striking the breast three times) mea culpa, mea culpa, mea máxima culpa. Ideo precor beátam Maríam semper Vírginem, beátum Michaélem Archángelum, beátum Ioánnem Baptístam, sanctos Apóstolos Petrum et Paulum, omnes Sanctos, et vos, fratres (te, Pater), oráre pro me ad Dóminum Deum nostrum."

(Translation: I confess to almighty God, to blessed Mary ever Virgin, to blessed Michael the archangel, to blessed John the Baptist, to the holy apostles Peter and Paul, to all the saints, and to you, brethren, that I have sinned exceedingly in thought, word, and deed through my fault, through my fault, through my most grievous fault. Therefore, I beseech blessed Mary ever Virgin ... and you, brethren, to pray to the Lord our God for me.)


The servers pray for the priest: "May Almighty God have mercy on thee, forgive thee thy sins, and bring thee to life everlasting." Then it is the ministers' or servers' turn to confess sinfulness and to ask for prayers. They use the same words as those used by the priest, except that they say "you, Father," in place of "you, brethren", and the priest responds with the same prayer that the servers have used for him (but using the plural number) plus an extra prayer.


Some verses are then said by priest and ministers (or servers), ending with the priest saying Oremus te Domine (Let us pray) After this he ascends to the altar, praying silently "Take away from us our iniquities" "that with pure minds we may worthily enter into the holy of holies", a reference to Exodus 26:33-34, 1 Kings 6:16, 1 Kings 8:6, 2 Chronicles 3:8, Ezekiel 41:4, and others. He places his joined hands on the edge of the altar, so that only the tips of the small fingers touch the front of it, and silently prays that, by the merits of the Saints whose relics are in the altar, God may pardon all his sins. At the words quorum relíquiæ hic sunt (whose relics are here), he spreads his hands and kisses the altar.

Priest at the altar[edit]




Dominus vobiscum ("The Lord be with you") before the Collect.
In the Tridentine Mass the priest should keep his eyes downcast at this point.[48]



Introit

The priest again makes the sign of the Cross while he begins to read the Introit, which is usually taken from a Psalm. Exceptions occur: e.g. the Introit for Easter Sunday is adapted from Wis 10:20-21, and the antiphon in Masses of the Blessed Virgin Mary was from the poet Sedulius. This evolved from the practice of singing a full Psalm, interspersed with the antiphon, during the entrance of the clergy, before the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar were added to the Mass in medieval times. This is indicated by the very name of "Introit".


Kyrie

This part of Mass is a linguistic marker of the origins of the Roman liturgy in Greek. "Kyrie, eleison; Christe, eleison; Kyrie, eleison." means "Lord, have mercy; Christ have mercy;..." Each phrase is said (or sung) three times.


Gloria in excelsis Deo

The first line of the Gloria[49] is taken from Lk 2:14. The Gloria is omitted during the penitential liturgical seasons of Advent, Septuagesima, Lent, and Passiontide, in which violet vestments are worn, but is used on feasts falling during such seasons, as well as on Holy Thursday. It is always omitted for a Requiem Mass.


The Collect

The priest turns toward the people and says, "Dominus vobiscum." The servers respond: "Et cum spiritu tuo." ("The Lord be with you." "And with thy spirit"). The Collect follows, a prayer not drawn directly from Scripture. It tends to reflect the season.



Instruction[edit]

The priest reads the Epistle, primarily an extract from the letters of St. Paul to various churches. In his motu proprio Summorum Pontificum, Pope Benedict XVI has permitted this to be read in the vernacular language when Mass is celebrated with the people.[50]
Between the Epistle and the Gospel two (rarely three) choir responses are sung or said. Usually these are a Gradual followed by an Alleluia; but between Septuagesima Sunday and Holy Saturday, or in a Requiem Mass or other penitential Mass the Alleluia is replaced by a Tract, and between Easter Sunday and Pentecost the Gradual is replaced by a second Alleluia. On a few exceptional occasions (most notably Easter, Pentecost, Corpus Christi, and in a Requiem Mass), a Sequence follows the Alleluia or Tract.

The Gradual is partly composed of a portion of a Psalm.


The Gospel reading, an extract from one of the four Gospels

Before the reading or chanting of the Gospel, the priest prays: "Cleanse my heart and my lips, O almighty God, who didst cleanse the lips of the prophet Isaias...", a reference to Isaiah 6:6. In this passage, after being cleansed by the angel, Isaiah was instructed to prophesy.


The Homily

The rite of Mass as revised by Pope Pius V (the Tridentine Mass) does not consider a sermon obligatory and speaks of it instead as merely optional: it presumes that the Creed, if it is to be said, will follow the Gospel immediately, but adds: "If, however, someone is to preach, the Homilist, after the Gospel has been finished, preaches, and when the sermon or moral address has been completed, the Credo is said, or if it is not to be said, the Offertory is sung."[51] By contrast the Roman Missal as revised by Pope Paul VI declares that the homily may not be omitted without a grave reason from Mass celebrated with the people attending on Sundays and Holy Days of Obligation and that it is recommended on other days.[52]


The Creed

This is the Nicene Creed, professing faith in God the Father, in God the Son, the Word made flesh, in God the Holy Ghost, and in the Holy Church. At the mention of the Incarnation, the celebrant and the congregation genuflect.



Mass of the Faithful[edit]
The second part is the Mass of the Faithful.[53]
Offertory[edit]

Offertory Verse

After greeting the people once more ("Dominus vobiscum/Et cum spiritu tuo") and giving the invitation to pray (Oremus), the priest enters upon the Mass of the Faithful, from which the non-baptized were once excluded. He reads the Offertory Verse, a short quotation from Holy Scripture which varies with the Mass of each day, with hands joined.


Offering of Bread and Wine

The priest offers the host, holding it on the paten at breast level and praying that, although he is unworthy, God may accept "this spotless host (or victim, the basic meaning of hostia in Latin) for his own innumerable sins, offences and neglects, for all those present, and for all faithful Christians living and dead, that it may avail unto salvation of himself and those mentioned. He then mixes a few drops of water with the wine, which will later become the Blood of Jesus, and holding the chalice so that the lip of the chalice is about the height of his lips, offers "the chalice of salvation", asking that it may "ascend with a sweet fragrance." He then prays a prayer of contrition adapted from Dan 3:39-40.


Incensing of the offerings and of the faithful

At a High Mass, the priest blesses the incense, then incenses the bread and wine. Among the prayers the priest says is Psalm 141:2-4: "Let my prayer, O Lord, be directed as incense in Thy sight;...", which is prayed as he incenses the altar. The priest then gives the thurible to the deacon, who incenses the priest, then the other ministers and the congregation.


Washing the hands

The priest prays Psalm 26:6-12: "I will wash my hands among the innocent..."


Prayer to the Most Holy Trinity

This prayer asks that the Divine Trinity may receive the oblation being made in remembrance of the passion, resurrection and ascension of Jesus and in honour of blessed Mary ever Virgin and the other saints, "that it may avail to their honour and our salvation: and that they may vouchsafe to intercede for us in heaven..."


Orate fratres, Suscipiat and Secret; Amen concludes Offertory

Here the priest turns to the congregation and says the first two words, "Orate, fratres," in an elevated tone and then turns around while finishing the exhortation in the secret tone. "Pray, Brethren, that my sacrifice and yours may be acceptable to God the Father almighty."
The altar servers respond with the Suscipiat to which the priest secretly responds, "Amen.": Suscipiat Dominus sacrificium de manibus tuis, ad laudem et gloriam nominis sui, ad utilitatem quoque nostram, totiusque ecclesiæ suae sanctæ. A translation in the English is: "May the Lord accept this sacrifice at your hands, to the praise and glory of His name, for our good and the good of all His Holy Church."
The Priest then says the day's Secret inaudibly, and concludes it with Per omnia sæcula sæculorum aloud.
The altar servers and (in dialogue Mass) the congregation respond: "Amen."



Consecration[edit]








Preface of the Canon

"The Roman Canon dates in essentials from before St. Gregory the Great, who died in 604, and who is credited with adding a phrase to it.[54] (See History of the Roman Canon.) It contains the main elements found in almost all rites, but in an unusual arrangement and it is unclear which part should be considered to be the Epiclesis.
Dominus vobiscum. Et cum spiritu tuo. Sursum corda. Habemus ad Dominum. Gratias agamus Domino Deo nostro. Dignum et iustum est. The first part can be seen above at the Collect; the rest means: Lift up your hearts. We lift them up to the Lord. Let us give thanks to the Lord our God. It is right and just.
Next a preface is prayed, indicating specific reasons for giving thanks to God. This leads to the Sanctus.[55]


Canon or rule of consecration[56]

Intercession (corresponding to the reading of the diptychs in the Byzantine Rite—a diptych is a two-leaf painting, carving or writing tablet.[57])

Here the priest prays for the living, that God may guard, unite and govern the Church together with the Pope and "all those who, holding to the truth, hand on the catholic and apostolic faith". Then specific living people are mentioned, and the congregation in the church. Next, Mary ever Virgin, Saint Joseph, the Apostles, and some Popes and other Martyrs are mentioned by name, as well as a generic "and all your Saints", in communion with whom prayer is offered.


Prayers preparatory to the consecration

A prayer that God may graciously accept the offering and "command that we be delivered from eternal damnation and counted among the flock of those you have chosen".


Consecration (transubstantiation) and major elevation




Elevation of the chalice during the Canon of the Mass at a Solemn Mass



The passage Lk 22:19-20 is key in this section. In Summa Theologiae III 78 3 Thomas Aquinas addresses the interspersed phrase, "the mystery of faith". On this phrase, see Mysterium fidei.


Oblation of the victim to God

An oblation is an offering;[58] the pure, holy, spotless victim is now offered, with a prayer that God may accept the offering and command his holy angel to carry the offering to God's altar on high, so that those who receive the Body and Blood of Christ "may be filled with every grace and heavenly blessing".


Remembrance of the Dead

The priest now prays for the dead ("those who have gone before us with the sign of faith and rest in the sleep of peace") and asks that they be granted a place of refreshment, light and peace. This is followed by a prayer that we be granted fellowship with the Saints. John the Baptist and fourteen martyrs, seven men and seven women, are mentioned by name.


End of the Canon and doxology with minor elevation

The concluding doxology is: "Through him, and with him, and in him, O God, almighty Father, in the unity of the Holy Spirit, all glory and honour is yours, for ever and ever." "Amen" ratifies the Canon prayer.





Elevation candle[edit]




Beuron Art School representation of an elevation candle, mistakenly placed at the Gospel side and upon the altar


Until 1960, the Tridentine form of the Roman Missal laid down that a candle should be placed at the Epistle side of the altar and that it should be lit at the showing of the consecrated sacrament to the people.[59] In practice, except in monasteries and on special occasions, this had fallen out of use long before Pope John XXIII replaced the section on the general rubrics of the Roman Missal with his Code of Rubrics, which no longer mentioned this custom. On this, see Elevation candle.
Communion[edit]




Before receiving Communion from the chalice, the priest makes the sign of the cross over himself, saying (in Latin): May the Blood of our Lord Jesus Christ keep my soul for eternal life. Amen.

























The Lord's Prayer and Libera nos[60]




The "Libera nos" is an extension of the Lord's Prayer developing the line "sed libera nos a malo" ("but deliver us from evil"). The priest prays that we may be delivered from all evils and that the Virgin Mary, Mother of God, together with the apostles and saints, may intercede to obtain for us peace in our day.




Fraction of the Host




During the preceding prayer, the priest breaks the consecrated Host into three parts, and after concluding the prayer drops the smallest part into the Chalice while praying that this commingling and consecration of the Body and Blood of Christ may "be to us who receive it effectual to life everlasting."




Agnus Dei




"Agnus Dei" means "Lamb of God". The priest then prays: "Lamb of God, who takest away the sins of the world, have mercy on us." He repeats this, and then adds: "Lamb of God, who takest away the sins of the world, grant us peace." The Mass of the Last Supper on Holy Thursday has "have mercy on us" all three times. In Requiem Masses, the petitions are "grant them rest" (twice), followed by "grant them eternal rest."


























The Pax

The priest asks Christ to look not at the priest's sins but at the faith of Christ's Church, and prays for peace and unity within the Church. Then, if a High Mass is being celebrated, he gives the sign of peace to the deacon, saying: "Peace be with you."


Prayers preparatory to the Communion

In the first of these two prayers for himself, the priests asks that by Holy Communion he may be freed from all his iniquities and evils, be made to adhere to the commandments of Jesus and never be separated from him. In the second he asks: "Let not the partaking of Thy Body, O Lord Jesus Christ...turn to my judgment and condemnation: but through Thy goodness may it be unto me a safeguard...."


Receiving of the Body and Blood of our Lord

The priest quietly says several prayers here, before receiving Communion. The first is said in a low voice while taking up the Host onto the paten. The second of them, spoken three times in a slightly audible voice,[61] while the priest holds the Host in his left hand and strikes his breast with his right, is based on Matthew 8:8: "Lord, I am not worthy...." Then, after having reverently consumed the Host, he takes up the chalice while in a low voice reciting Psalm 116:12-13: "What shall I render to the Lord, for all the things he hath rendered unto me? I will take the chalice of salvation; and I will call upon the name of the Lord." immediately adding Psalm 18:4: "Praising I will call upon the Lord: and I shall be saved from my enemies."







Priest on the "Ecce Agnus Dei - Behold the Lamb of God" in the people communion.





If the priest is to give Communion to others, he holds up a small host and says aloud: "Behold the Lamb of God ...", and three times: "Lord, I am not worthy ...". He then gives Communion, first making with the host the sign of the cross over each communicant, while saying: "May the Body of Our Lord Jesus Christ preserve your soul for eternal life. Amen."[62]



Conclusion[edit]




"Ite, missa est" sung by the deacon at a Solemn Mass.



Prayers during the Ablutions

The prayers now focus on what has been received, that "we may receive with a pure mind", "that no stain of sin may remain in me, whom these pure and holy sacraments have refreshed."


Communion Antiphon and Postcommunion

The communion antiphon is normally a portion of a Psalm. The Postcommunion Prayer is akin to the Collect in being an appropriate prayer not directly drawn from Scripture.


Ite Missa est; Blessing

"Go, it is the dismissal." The word "Mass" derives from this phrase.
After saying a silent prayer for himself, the priest then gives the people his blessing.
Prior to the revisions of Pope Pius XII and Pope John XXIII, the Ite Missa est was replaced with Benedicamus Domino ("Let us bless the Lord") on days in which the Gloria was not said and the rubrics required the priest to wear violet vestments (i.e., Masses of the season during Advent, Septuagesima, Lent and Passiontide; vigils; certain votive Masses). In the 1962 Missal, Benedicamus Domino is said only when the Mass is followed by another liturgical action, such as the Eucharistic Processions on Holy Thursday and Corpus Christi.
In Requiem Masses, the Ite Missa est is replaced with Requiescant in pace, with the response being "Amen" instead of Deo gratias.


The Last Gospel

The priest then reads the Last Gospel, the beginning of the Gospel of John, John 1:1-14, which recounts the Incarnation of the Son of God. On certain occasions, as for instance at the Day Mass on Christmas Day, another Gospel passage was read instead because that Gospel is read as the Gospel of the Mass, but Pope John XXIII's revision of the rubrics decreed that on those and on other occasions the Last Gospel should simply be omitted.



Prayers of the priest before and after Mass[edit]
The Tridentine Missal includes prayers for the priest to say before and after Mass.
In later editions of the Roman Missal, including that of 1962, the introductory heading of these prayers indicates that they are to be recited pro opportunitate (as circumstances allow),[63] which in practice means that they are merely optional and may be omitted. The original Tridentine Missal presents most of the prayers as obligatory, indicating as optional only a very long prayer attributed to Saint Ambrose (which later editions divide into seven sections, each to be recited on only one day of the week) and two other prayers attributed to Saint Ambrose and Saint Thomas Aquinas respectively.[64]
In addition to these three prayers, the original Tridentine Missal proposes for the priest to recite before he celebrates Mass the whole of Psalms 83–85, 115, 129 (the numbering is that of the Septuagint and Vulgate), and a series of collect-style prayers. Later editions add, after the three that in the original Missal are only optional, prayers to the Blessed Virgin, Saint Joseph, all the angels and saints, and the saint whose Mass is to be celebrated, but, as has been said, treats as optional all the prayers before Mass, even those originally given as obligatory.[65]
The original Tridentine Missal proposes for recitation by the priest after Mass three prayers, including the Adoro te devote. Later editions place before these three the Canticle of the Three Youths (Dan)[66] with three collects, and follow them with the Anima Christi and seven more prayers, treating as optional even the three prescribed in the original Tridentine Missal.[67]
Leonine Prayers[edit]
From 1884 to 1965, the Holy See prescribed the recitation after Low Mass of certain prayers, originally for the solution of the Roman Question and, after this problem was solved by the Lateran Treaty, "to permit tranquillity and freedom to profess the faith to be restored to the afflicted people of Russia".[68]
These prayers are known as the Leonine Prayers because it was Pope Leo XIII who on 6 January 1884 ordered their recitation throughout the world. In what had been the Papal States, they were already in use since 1859.
The prayers comprised three Ave Marias, one Salve Regina followed by a versicle and response, and a collect prayer that, from 1886 on, asked for the conversion of sinners and "the freedom and exaltation of Holy Mother the Church", and, again from 1886 on, a prayer to Saint Michael. In 1904, Pope Pius X added a thrice-repeated "Most Sacred Heart of Jesus, have mercy on us."
In 1964, with effect from 7 March 1965, the Holy See ended the obligation to recite the Leonine Prayers after Low Mass.[69] However, the Leonine Prayers are sometimes still recited after present-day celebrations of Tridentine Mass, although they are not included even in the 1962 edition of the Tridentine Missal.
Participation by the people[edit]




Nuptial Low Mass






Distribution of Communion at a Tridentine Mass: typically, the faithful kneel and receive in the mouth and women wear a headcovering.


The participation of the congregation at the Tridentine Mass is interior, involving eye and heart, and exterior by mouth.[70]
Except in the Dialogue Mass form, which arose about 1910 and led to a more active exterior participation of the congregation, the people present at the Tridentine Mass do not recite out loud the prayers of the Mass. Only the server or servers join with the priest in reciting the prayers at the foot of the altar (which include the Confiteor) and in speaking the other responses.[71] Most of the prayers that the priest says are spoken inaudibly, including almost all the Mass of the Faithful: the offertory prayers, the Canon of the Mass (except for the preface and the final doxology), and (apart from the Agnus Dei) those between the Lord's Prayer and the postcommunion.
At a Solemn Mass or Missa Cantata, a choir sings the servers' responses, except for the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar. The choir sings the Introit, the Kyrie, the Gloria, the Gradual, the Tract or Alleluia, the Credo, the Offertory and Communion antiphons, the Sanctus, and the Agnus Dei. Of these, only the five that form part of the Ordinary of the Mass are usually sung at a Missa Cantata. In addition to the Gregorian Chant music for these, polyphonic compositions exist, some quite elaborate. The priest largely says quietly the words of the chants and then recites other prayers while the choir continues the chant.
Different levels of celebration[edit]
There are various forms of celebration of the Tridentine Mass:

Pontifical High Mass: celebrated by a bishop accompanied by an assisting priest, deacon, subdeacon, thurifer, acolytes and other ministers, under the guidance of a priest acting as Master of Ceremonies. Most often the specific parts assigned to deacon and subdeacon are performed by priests. The parts that are said aloud are all chanted, except that the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar, which before the reform of Pope Pius V were said in the sacristy, are said quietly by the bishop with the deacon and the subdeacon, while the choir sings the Introit. The main difference between a pontifical and an ordinary High Mass is that the bishop remains at his throne almost all the time until the offertory.
Solemn or High Mass (Latin: Missa solemnis): offered by a priest accompanied by a deacon and subdeacon and the other ministers mentioned above.
Missa Cantata (Latin for "sung mass"): celebrated by a priest without deacon and subdeacon, and thus a form of Low Mass, but with some parts (the three variable prayers, the Scripture readings, Preface, Pater Noster, and Ite Missa Est) sung by the priest, and other parts (Introit, Kyrie, Gloria, Gradual, Tract or Alleluia, Credo, Offertory Antiphon, Sanctus and Benedictus, Agnus Dei, and Communion Antiphon) sung by the choir. Incense may be used exactly as at a Solemn Mass with the exception of incensing the celebrant after the Gospel which is not done.
Low Mass: the priest sings no part of the Mass, though in some places a choir or the congregation sings, during the Mass, hymns not always directly related to the Mass.

In its article "The Liturgy of the Mass", the 1917 Catholic Encyclopedia describes how, when concelebration ceased to be practised in Western Europe, Low Mass became distinguished from High Mass:[72]

The separate celebrations then involved the building of many altars in one church and the reduction of the ritual to the simplest possible form. The deacon and subdeacon were in this case dispensed with; the celebrant took their part as well as his own. One server took the part of the choir and of all the other ministers, everything was said instead of being sung, the incense and kiss of peace were omitted. So we have the well-known rite of low Mass (missa privata). This then reacted on high Mass (missa solemnis), so that at high Mass too the celebrant himself recites everything, even though it be sung by the deacon, subdeacon, or choir.

On the origin of the "Missa Cantata", the same source gives the following information:

... high Mass is the norm; it is only in the complete rite with deacon and subdeacon that the ceremonies can be understood. Thus, the rubrics of the Ordinary of the Mass always suppose that the Mass is high. Low Mass, said by a priest alone with one server, is a shortened and simplified form of the same thing. Its ritual can be explained only by a reference to high Mass. For instance, the celebrant goes over to the north side of the altar to read the Gospel, because that is the side to which the deacon goes in procession at high Mass; he turns round always by the right, because at high Mass he should not turn his back to the deacon and so on. A sung Mass (missa Cantata) is a modern compromise. It is really a low Mass, since the essence of high Mass is not the music but the deacon and subdeacon. Only in churches which have no ordained person except one priest, and in which high Mass is thus impossible, is it allowed to celebrate the Mass (on Sundays and feasts) with most of the adornment borrowed from high Mass, with singing and (generally) with incense.

Revision of the Roman Missal[edit]
Pius XII began in earnest the work of revising the Roman Missal with a thorough revision of the rites of Holy Week, which, after an experimental period beginning in 1951, was made obligatory in 1955. The Mass that used to be said on Holy Thursday morning was moved to the evening, necessitating a change in the rule that previously had required fasting from midnight. The Good Friday service was moved to the afternoon, Holy Communion was no longer reserved for the priest alone (as before, hosts consecrated at the Holy Thursday Mass were used) and the priest no longer received part of the host in unconsecrated wine. The Easter Vigil service that used to be held in morning of Holy Saturday[73] was moved to the night that leads to Easter Sunday and many changes were made to the content.
In 1960, Pope John XXIII (1958–1963) ordered the suppression of the word "perfidis" ("unbelieving" i.e. not believing in Jesus), applied to the Jews, in the rites for Good Friday. He revised the rubrics to the Order of Mass and the Breviary. Two years later, in 1962, he made some more minor modifications on the occasion of publishing a new typical edition of the Roman Missal. This is the edition authorized for use by virtue of the Quattuor abhinc annos indult (see below, under Present status of the Tridentine Mass). Among the other changes he made and that were included in the 1962 Missal were: adding St. Joseph's name to the Roman Canon; eliminating the second Confiteor before Communion; suppressing 10 feasts, such as St. Peter's Chair in Rome (or, more accurately, combining both feasts of St Peter's Chair into one, as they originally had been); incorporating the abolition of 4 festal octaves and 9 vigils of feasts and other changes made by Pope Pius XII; and modifying rubrics especially for Solemn High Masses.[74] Among the names that disappeared from the Roman Missal was that of St Philomena: her liturgical celebration had never been admitted to the General Roman Calendar, but from 1920 it had been included (with an indication that the Mass was to be taken entirely from the common) in the section headed "Masses for some places", i.e. only those places for which it had been specially authorized; but her name had already in 1961 been ordered to be removed from all liturgical calendars.
On 4 December 1963, the Second Vatican Council decreed in Chapter II of its Constitution on the Sacred Liturgy Sacrosanctum Concilium:[75]

"[T]he rite of the Mass is to be revised ... the rites are to be simplified, due care being taken to preserve their substance. Parts which with the passage of time came to be duplicated, or were added with little advantage, are to be omitted. Other parts which suffered loss through accidents of history are to be restored to the vigor they had in the days of the holy Fathers, as may seem useful or necessary. The treasures of the Bible are to be opened up more lavishly so that a richer fare may be provided for the faithful at the table of God’s word ... A suitable place may be allotted to the vernacular in Masses which are celebrated with the people ... communion under both kinds may be granted when the bishops think fit...as, for instance, to the newly ordained in the Mass of their sacred ordination, to the newly professed in the Mass of their religious profession, and to the newly baptized in the Mass which follows their baptism..."

The instruction Inter Oecumenici of 26 September 1964 initiated the application to the Mass of the decisions that the Council had taken less than a year before. Permission was given for use, only in Mass celebrated with the people, of the vernacular language, especially in the Biblical readings and the reintroduced Prayers of the Faithful, but, "until the whole of the Ordinary of the Mass has been revised," in the chants (Kyrie, Gloria, Creed, Sanctus, Agnus Dei, and the entrance, offertory and communion antiphons) and in the parts that involved dialogue with the people, and in the Our Father, which the people could now recite entirely together with the priest. Most Episcopal Conferences quickly approved interim vernacular translations, generally different from country to country, and, after having them confirmed by the Holy See, published them in 1965. Other changes included the omission of Psalm 43 (42) at the start of Mass and the Last Gospel at the end, both of which Pope Pius V had first inserted into the Missal (having previously been private prayers said by the priest in the sacristy), and the Leonine Prayers of Pope Leo XIII. The Canon of the Mass, which continued to be recited silently, was kept in Latin.
Three years later, the instruction Tres abhinc annos[76] of 4 May 1967 gave permission for use of the vernacular even in the Canon of the Mass, and allowed it to be said audibly and even, in part, to be chanted; the vernacular could be used even at Mass celebrated without the people being present. Use of the maniple was made optional, and at three ceremonies at which the cope was previously the obligatory vestment the chasuble could be used instead.
Pope Paul VI continued implementation of the Council's directives, ordering with Apostolic Constitution Missale Romanum[77] of Holy Thursday, 3 April 1969, publication of a new official edition of the Roman Missal, which appeared (in Latin) in 1970.
Opposition to the latest revisions of the liturgy[edit]
Some Traditionalist Catholics reject to a greater or lesser extent the changes made since 1950 (see Traditionalist Catholic). None advocate returning to the original (1570) form of the liturgy, though some may perhaps wish a re-establishment of its form before Pius X's revision of the rubrics in 1911. Some do refuse to accept the 1955 changes in the liturgy of Palm Sunday and the Easter Triduum and in the liturgical calendar (see General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII), and instead use the General Roman Calendar as in 1954. Others accept the 1955 changes by Pius XII, but not those of Pope John XXIII. Others again, in accordance with the authorization granted by Pope Benedict XVI in Summorum Pontificum, use the Missal and calendar as it was in 1962.
Some of them argue that, unlike earlier reforms, the revision of 1969-1970 which replaced the Tridentine Mass with the Mass of Pope Paul VI represented a major break with the past. They consider that the content of the revised liturgy is, in Catholic terms, seriously deficient and defective; some hold that it is displeasing to God, and that no Catholic should attend it.[78]
When a preliminary text of two of the sections of the revised Missal was published in 1969, Archbishop Marcel Lefebvre gathered a group of twelve theologians, who, under his direction,[79] wrote a study of the text. They stated that it "represents, both as a whole and in its details, a striking departure from the Catholic theology of the Mass as it was formulated in Session 22 of the Council of Trent".[80] Cardinal Alfredo Ottaviani, a former Prefect of the Sacred Congregation for the Doctrine of the Faith, supported this study with a letter of 25 September 1969 to Pope Paul VI. Cardinal Antonio Bacci signed the same letter. The critical study became known as "the Ottaviani Intervention".[81] Cardinal Ottaviani subsequently stated in writing that he had not intended his letter to be made public, and that Pope Paul VI's doctrinal exposition, on 19 November[82] and 26 November 1969,[83] of the revised liturgy in its definitive form meant that "no one can be genuinely scandalised any more".[84] Jean Madiran, a critic of Vatican II[85] and founder-editor of the French journal Itinéraires, claimed that this letter was fraudulently presented to the elderly and already blind cardinal for his signature by his secretary, Monsignor (and future Cardinal) Gilberto Agustoni, and that Agustoni resigned shortly afterwards.[86] This allegation remains unproven, and Madiran himself was not an eyewitness of the alleged deception.[87]
In October 1967, a meeting of the Synod of Bishops had already given its opinion on a still earlier draft. Of the 187 members, 78 approved it as it stood, 62 approved it but suggested various modifications, 4 abstained, and 47 voted against.[88]
From the 1960s onwards, Western countries have experienced a drop in Mass attendance (in the United States, from 75% of Catholics attending in 1958 to 25% attending by 2002). These same countries saw a decline in seminary enrollments and in the number of priests (in the United States, from 1,575 ordinations in 1954 to 450 in 2002), and a general erosion of belief in the doctrines of the Catholic faith. Opponents of the revision of the Mass liturgy argue, citing opinion poll evidence in their support, that the revision contributed to this decline.[89] Others, pointing, among other considerations, to the fact that, globally, there are more priests and seminarians now than in previous years (in 1970, there were 72,991 major seminarians worldwide, in 2002, there were 113,199, an increase of 55%, at a time, however, when there was an increase of global population of 64%),[90] suggest that the apparent decline of Catholic practice in the West is due to the general influence of secularism and liberalism on Western societies rather than to developments within the Catholic Church.
Attitudes of Popes since the Second Vatican Council[edit]
Pope Paul VI[edit]
Following the introduction of the Mass of Paul VI in 1969-1970, the Holy See granted a significant number of permissions for the use of the former liturgy. For example, elderly priests were not required to switch to celebrating the new form. In England and Wales, occasional celebrations of the Tridentine Mass were allowed in virtue of what became known as the "Agatha Christie indult". However, there was no general worldwide legal framework allowing for the celebration of the rite. Following the rise of the Traditionalist Catholic movement in the 1970s, Pope Paul VI reportedly declined to liberalise its use further on the grounds that it had become a politically charged symbol associated with opposition to his policies.[91]
Pope John Paul II[edit]
In 1984, the Holy See sent a letter known as Quattuor abhinc annos to the presidents of the world's Episcopal Conferences. This document empowered diocesan bishops to authorise, on certain conditions, celebrations of the Tridentine Mass for priests and laypeople who requested them.[92] In 1988, following the excommunication of Archbishop Marcel Lefebvre and four bishops that he had consecrated, the Pope issued a further document, a motu proprio known as Ecclesia Dei,[93] which stated that "respect must everywhere be shown for the feelings of all those who are attached to the Latin liturgical tradition". The Pope urged bishops to give "a wide and generous application" to the provisions of Quattuor abhinc annos, and established the Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei to oversee relations between Rome and Traditionalist Catholics.
The Holy See itself granted authorisation to use the Tridentine Mass to a significant number of priests and priestly societies, such as the Priestly Fraternity of St. Peter, the Institute of Christ the King Sovereign Priest, and the Personal Apostolic Administration of Saint John Mary Vianney. Some diocesan bishops, however, declined to authorise celebrations within their dioceses, or did so only to a limited extent. In some cases, the difficulty was that those seeking the permission were hostile to the church authorities. Other refusals of permission were alleged to have stemmed from certain bishops' disapproval in principle of celebrations of the Tridentine liturgy.
Pope Benedict XVI[edit]
As a cardinal, Joseph Ratzinger was regarded as having a particular interest in the liturgy, and as being favourable towards the older rite of Mass. He famously criticized the erratic way in which, contrary to official policy, many priests celebrated the revised rite.[94]
In September 2006, the Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei established the Institute of the Good Shepherd, made up of former members of the Society of St. Pius X, in Bordeaux, France, with permission to use the Tridentine liturgy.[95] This step was met with some discontent from French clergy, and thirty priests wrote an open letter to the Pope.[96] Consistently with its previous policy, the Society of St Pius X rejected the move.[97]
Following repeated rumours that the use of the Tridentine Mass would be liberalised, the Pope issued a motu proprio called Summorum Pontificum on 7 July 2007,[98] together with an accompanying letter to the world's Bishops.[99] The Pope declared that "the Roman Missal promulgated by Paul VI is the ordinary expression of the lex orandi (law of prayer) of the Catholic Church of the Latin rite. Nevertheless, the Roman Missal promulgated by St. Pius V and reissued by St. John XXIII is to be considered as an extraordinary expression of that same 'Lex orandi'".[100] He further stated that "the 1962 Missal ... was never juridically abrogated".[101] He replaced with new rules those of Quattuor Abhinc Annos on use of the older form: essentially, authorization for using the 1962 form for parish Masses and those celebrated on public occasions such as a wedding is devolved from the local bishop to the priest in charge of a church, and any priest of the Latin Rite may use the 1962 Roman Missal in "Masses celebrated without the people", a term that does not exclude attendance by other worshippers, lay or clergy.[102] While requests by groups of Catholics wishing to use the Tridentine liturgy in parish Masses are to be dealt with by the parish priest (or the rector of the church) rather than, as before, by the local bishop, the Pope and Cardinal Darío Castrillón have stated that the bishops' authority is not thereby undermined.[103]
Present regulations[edit]
The regulations set out in Summorum Pontificum provide that:

In Masses celebrated "without the people", every Latin Rite priest may use either the 1962 Roman Missal or that of Paul VI except during the Easter Triduum (when Masses without participation by the people are no longer allowed). Celebrations of Mass in this form (formerly referred to as "private Masses") may, as before, be attended by laypeople who ask to be admitted.[104]
In parish Masses, where there is a stable group of laypeople who adhere to the earlier liturgical tradition, the parish priest should willingly accept their requests to be allowed to celebrate the Mass according to the 1962 Missal, and should ensure that their welfare harmonises with the ordinary pastoral care of the parish, under the guidance of the bishop in accordance with canon 392 of the Code of Canon Law, avoiding discord and favouring the unity of the Church.

Mass may be celebrated using the 1962 Missal on working days, while on Sundays and feast days one such celebration may be held.
For priests and laypeople who request it, the parish priest should allow celebrations of the 1962 form on special occasions such as weddings, funerals, and pilgrimages.


Communities belonging to institutes of consecrated life and societies of apostolic life which wish to use the 1962 Missal for conventual or "community" celebration in their oratories may do so.

With letter 13/2007 of 20 January 2010 the Pontifical Council Ecclesia Dei responded positively to a question whether a parish priest (pastor) or another priest may on his own initiative publicly celebrate the extraordinary form, along with the customary regular use of the new form, "so that the faithful, both young and old, can familiarize themselves with the old rites and benefit from their perceptible beauty and transcendence". Although the Council accompanied this response with the observation that a stable group of the faithful attached to the older form has a right to assist at Mass in the extraordinary form, a website that published the response interpreted it as not requiring the existence of such a stable group.[105]
Present practice[edit]
The publication of Summorum Pontificum has led to an increase in the number of regularly scheduled public Tridentine Masses. On 14 June 2008 Cardinal Darío Castrillón Hoyos told a London press conference that Pope Benedict wants every parish to offer both the old and the new forms for Sunday Mass.[106]
The cardinal said that the Vatican was preparing to instruct seminaries to teach all students the Tridentine form of the Roman Rite. The complexity of the rubrics makes it difficult for priests accustomed to the simpler modern form to celebrate the Tridentine form properly, and it is unclear how many have the required knowledge.
Some Traditionalist Catholic priests and organisations, holding that no official permission is required to use any form of the Tridentine Mass, celebrate it without regularizing their situation,[107] and sometimes using editions of the Roman Missal earlier than the 1962 edition approved in Summorum Pontificum.
In order to provide for priests who celebrate the Tridentine Mass, publishers have issued facsimiles or reprintings of old missals. There were two new printings of the 1962 Tridentine Missal in 2004: one, with the imprimatur of Bishop Fabian Bruskewitz of Lincoln, Nebraska, by Baronius Press in association with the Priestly Fraternity of St. Peter; the other by the Society of St. Pius X's publishing house, Angelus Press. There was a new printing of a facsimile 1962 Tridentine Altar Missal in 2008 by PCP books. Some other missals reproduced date from before 1955 and so do not have the revised Holy Week rites promulgated by Pope Pius XII. They are used by traditionalists who reject Pius XII's liturgical changes. As well as such altar missals for use by the priest, old hand missals for those attending Mass have been reproduced, including a St Bonaventure Press facsimile of a pre-1955 edition of the St Andrew's Missal.
See also[edit]

List of communities using the Tridentine Mass
Sacred language
Western Rite Orthodoxy

References[edit]


^ In this context, "typical edition" means the officially approved edition to whose text other printings are obliged to conform.
^ Angelus A. De Marco, O.F.M., "Liturgical Languages" in The American Ecclesiastical Review
^ Council of Trent, session of 4 December 1563
^ These regions included those in which a variant of the Roman Rite, called the Sarum Rite, was in use for more than the minimum required time. On a few recent occasions Roman Catholic prelates have used this variant as an extraordinary form of celebrating Mass. But, like most of the other regions and the orders concerned, the Sarum Rite areas have adopted the standard Roman Missal. The most important non-Roman liturgies that continue in use are the Ambrosian Rite, the Mozarabic Rite and the Carthusian Rite.
^ Code of Canon Law, canon 928
^ Instruction Redemptionis Sacramentum, 112
^ a b Letter of Pope Benedict XVI
^ Pope Benedict spoke of it instead as "an" extraordinary form. While in English, "extraordinary" often has laudatory overtones, its meaning in canon law is illustrated by its use with reference, for instance, to "the extraordinary minister of holy communion" (cf. canon 910 §2 of the Code of Canon Law).
^ Summorum Pontificum, article 10 speaks of celebrations "iuxta formam antiquiorem ritus romani" (in accordance with the older form of the Roman Rite).
^ Summorum Pontificum, articles 2 and 4
^ Summorum Pontificum, article 5
^ Krmpotic, M.D. (1908). "Dalmatia". Catholic encyclopedia. Retrieved March 25, 2008. The right to use the Glagolitic  [sic] language at Mass with the Roman Rite has prevailed for many centuries in all the south-western Balkan countries, and has been sanctioned by long practice and by many popes. 
^ Japundžić, Marko (1997). "The Croatian Glagolitic Heritage". Croatian Academy of America. Retrieved March 25, 2008. In 1886 it arrived to the Principality of Montenegro, followed by the Kingdom of Serbia in 1914, and the Republic of Czechoslovakia in 1920, but only for feast days of the main patron saints. The 1935 concordat with the Kingdom of Yugoslavia anticipated the introduction of the Slavic liturgy for all Croatian regions and throughout the entire state. 
^ "Inter Oecumenici, Sacred Congregation of Rites". 2007. Retrieved March 25, 2008. 
^ Congregation for Divine Worship and the Discipline of the Sacrament (2004-04-23). "Redemptionis Sacramentum". Retrieved 2008-03-25. 
^ Thompson, Damian (2008-06-14). "Latin mass to return to England and Wales". The Daily Telegraph. Retrieved 2008-06-17. 
^ Medieval Sourcebook; Pope reformulates Tridentine rite's prayer for Jews
^ Letter to the Bishops on the occasion of the publication of Summorum Pontificum
^ a b c "Quo primum". Retrieved 2008-03-25. We decided to entrust this work to learned men of our selection. They very carefully collated all their work with the ancient codices in Our Vatican Library and with reliable, preserved or emended codices from elsewhere. Besides this, these men consulted the works of ancient and approved authors concerning the same sacred rites; and thus they have restored the Missal itself to the original form and rite of the holy Fathers. When this work has been gone over numerous times and further emended, after serious study and reflection, We commanded that the finished product be printed and published. 
^ The Mass of Vatican II
^ The Mass of the Consilium and the Mass of the Ages
^ God Was Worshipped Here Today
^ Meditation before Holy Mass
^ Is the Novus Ordo Mass Actually the Indult Mass?
^ Priories of the Order of Saint John of Jerusalem
^ The Mass of the Apostles
^ Cf. Extract from a Letter to a Philippine Mayor
^ Braga - Capital de Distrito
^ "Just after the Council of Trent, the study 'of ancient manuscripts in the Vatican library and elsewhere', as Saint Pius V attests in the Apostolic Constitution Quo primum, helped greatly in the correction of the Roman Missal. Since then, however, other ancient sources have been discovered and published and liturgical formularies of the Eastern Church have been studied. Accordingly, many have had the desire for these doctrinal and spiritual riches not to be stored away in the dark, but to be put into use for the enlightenment of the mind of Christians and for the nurture of their spirit" (Apostolic Constitution Missale Romanum).
^ ISBN 88-209-2547-8; publisher: Libreria Editrice Vaticana; introduction and appendix by Manlio Sodi and Achille Maria Triacca
^ Introduction to the reproduction of the editio princeps, pages XXVI-XXX
^ Introduction to the reproduction of the editio princeps, pages XXI
^ S. Cecilia in Trastevere, main altar, presbytery, ciborium
^ Helen Dietz, "The Biblical Roots of Church Orientation" in Sacred Architecture, vol. 10. Retrieved 20 July 2013.
^ Solemn Papal Mass. See further The Tridentine Mass by Paul Cavendish
^ Apostolic Constitution Si quid est
^ Missal in Catholic Encyclopedia
^ Divino afflatu
^ Mysterii Paschalis and Ordorecitandi website
^ Richard Breyer, "St. Joseph & the Mass" in Catholic Digest
^ Pope Benedict XVI's motu proprio Summorum Pontificum
^ "The Missal published by Paul VI and then republished in two subsequent editions by John Paul II, obviously is and continues to be the normal Form – the Forma ordinaria – of the Eucharistic Liturgy" (Pope Benedict XVI's letter to the bishops on the occasion of the publication of Summorum Pontificum).
^ Their dislike of the 1962 Missal is expressed for instance in a list of differences prepared by Daniel Dolan.
^ "The Collaborative International Dictionary of English v.0.48". 1913. Retrieved 2008-03-25. 
^ Chapman, John (1908). "Didache". Retrieved 2008-03-25. Let no one eat or drink of the Eucharist with you except those who have been baptized in the name of the Lord. 
^ It is an additional ceremony, not part of the Mass itself, and in the Tridentine Missal is given only in an appendix.
^ Text of Mass of the Catechumens
^ Rubrics V
^ Text in Latin and English
^ Summorum Pontificum, article 6
^ The Rubrics of the Missale Romanum 1962: VI. The Epistle, the Gradual, and everything else up to the Offertory
^ General Instruction of the Roman Missal, 66
^ Text of Mass of the Faithful
^  Herbermann, Charles, ed. (1913). "Pope St. Gregory I ("the Great")". Catholic Encyclopedia. New York: Robert Appleton Company. 
^ Santus
^ Mass of the Faithful - The Canon
^ Diptych
^ Definition of "oblation"
^ "Ab eadem parte Epistolae paretur cereus ad elevationem Sacramenti accendendus" (Rubricae generales Missalis, XX)
^ Mass of the Faithful - Closing Prayers
^ In pre-1962 editions of the Roman Missal, only the first four words, "Domine, non sum dignus", were to be said in the slightly audible voice.
^ Ritus servandus, X, 6 of the 1962 Missal
^ Latin Dictionary
^ Manlio Sodi, Achille Maria Triacca (editors), Missale Romanum: Editio Princeps (1570) (Libreria Editrice Vaticana 1988 ISBN 978-88-209-2547-5), pp. 27–36
^ Orationes ante Missam
^ Douay-Rheims Version
^ Orationes post Missam
^ Allocution Indictam ante of 30 June 1930, in Acta Apostolicae Sedis 22 (1930), page 301
^ Instruction Inter Oecumenici, 48 j
^ Pope St. Pius X said: "If you wish to hear Mass as it should be heard, you must follow with eye, heart, and mouth all that happens at the altar. Further, you must pray with the Priest the holy words said by him in the Name of Christ and which Christ says by him" (The Daily Missal and Liturgical Manual from the Editio Typica of the Roman Missal and Breviary, 1962, Baronius Press, London, 2004, p. 897).
^ They gave responses to "Kyrie eleison", "Dominus vobiscum", "Per omnia saecula saeculorum", the Gospel reading, the "Orate Fratres", "Sursum Corda", "Gratias agamus Domino Deo nostro", the conclusion of the Lord's Prayer, the "Pax Domini sit semper vobiscum" and the "Ite Missa est"
^  Herbermann, Charles, ed. (1913). "Liturgy of the Mass". Catholic Encyclopedia. New York: Robert Appleton Company. 
^ Conventual Mass (Mass of a religious community) on a Vigil, such as that of Easter, was celebrated after None, at which point the fast could be broken (see Rubricae generalis Missalis, XV, 2). Though None was in origin an afternoon prayer, it was then celebrated in the morning. Similarly, Lauds, which was originally a morning prayer, was commonly celebrated in choir on the evening before, as in the office of Tenebrae. "Private Masses" (Masses celebrated by a priest without a congregation) could, even on days of fast, be celebrated at any hour from dawn to noon (see Rubricae generalis Missalis, XV, 1). Most celebrations of the Easter Vigil were in the form of private Masses, since concelebration was not allowed.
^ The Pius X and John XXIII Missals Compared
^ Constitution on the Sacred Liturgy
^ Tres abhinc annos
^ Missale Romanum
^ Pope Benedict XVI, who has several times deplored departures on private initiative from the rite of Mass established in the 1970 revision of the Roman Missal has declared this contention unfounded, writing: "There is no contradiction between the two editions of the Roman Missal. In the history of the liturgy there is growth and progress, but no rupture. ... Needless to say, in order to experience full communion, the priests of the communities adhering to the former usage cannot, as a matter of principle, exclude celebrating according to the new books. The total exclusion of the new rite would not in fact be consistent with the recognition of its value and holiness" (Letter to the Bishops on the occasion of the publication of the Apostolic Letter motu proprio data Summorum Pontificum).
^ A Short History of the SSPX
^ Ottaviani letter
^ Ottaviani, Alfredo; Bacci, Antonio; Group of Roman Theologians. "The Ottaviani Intervention: A Critical Study of the New Mass". Catholic Tradition. Retrieved 21 November 2016. 
^ Talk on 19 November 1969
^ Talk on 26 November 1969
^ Quotation from Documentation Catholique, 1970; the full text of the letter in an English translation is given in The New "Ordo Missæ": A battle on two fronts
^ Je suis un témoin à charge contre mon temps
^ The Ottaviani Intervention - Part I, by Michael Davies
^ The Ottaviani Intervention - Part 1, by Michael Davies
^ "Special Supplement: The Ottaviani Intervention: A Critical Study of the Novus Ordo Missae". Triumph. 4 (12): 22A–22L. December 1969. Quoted in THE GREAT SACRILEGE by Fr. James F. Wathen 
^ Jones, Kenneth C. (January 2003). Index of Leading Catholic Indicators: The Church since Vatican II. Oriens Publishing. ISBN 0-9728688-0-1
^ Cf. World population
^ Collins, Roger (2009). Keepers of the Keys of Heaven: A History of the Papacy. Basic Books. pp. 488–489. ISBN 978-0-465-01195-7. 
^ English translation of Quattuor abhinc annos
^ Ecclesia Dei
^ Preface to the French edition of Die Reform der Römischen Liturgie by Klaus Gamber; partial English translation; cf. The Spirit of the Liturgy, San Francisco: Ignatius Press, 2000; and Looking Again at the Question of the Liturgy with Cardinal Ratzinger: Proceedings of the July 2001 Fontgombault Liturgical Conference, Farnborough, Hampshire: St. Michael's Abbey Press, 2002. For a Vatican condemnation of aberrant liturgical practices, see Redemptionis Sacramentum
^ Brian Mershon, "New French traditionalist priestly society founded," The Wanderer, September 18, 2006.
^ "French clerics rebel on Latin Mass," The Conservative Voice, October 29, 2006
^ Communiqué de la Fraternité Sacerdotale Saint Pie X
^ Text of the motu proprio Summorum Pontificum in Latin and English
^ Benedict XVI (2007-07-07). "Letter of His Holiness Benedict XVI to the Bishops on the occasion of the publication of the Apostolic Letter "motu proprio data" Summorum Pontificum on the use of the Roman liturgy prior to the reform of 1970". Libreria Editrice Vaticana. Retrieved 2008-03-24. 
^ Article 1 of the motu proprio. In his letter to the Bishops he said: "It is not appropriate to speak of these two versions of the Roman Missal as if they were 'two Rites'. Rather, it is a matter of a twofold use of one and the same rite."
^ Similarly, Clement VIII did not juridically abrogate the Missal of Pius V, nor did the other Popes who issued later typical editions of the Roman Missal before that of Paul VI (Urban VIII, Leo XIII, Benedict XV, John XXIII) juridically abrogate the previous editions. Even Pius V juridically abolished only those variants of the Roman Rite that had less than 200 years' antiquity.
^ Indeed, "Mass should not be celebrated without a minister or at least one of the faithful, except for a just and reasonable cause" (General Instruction of the Roman Missal, 254). Masses celebrated without the people were once called "private Masses", a term that fell out of favour in the mid-twentieth century: the 1960 Codex Rubricarum, which preceded the Second Vatican Council, declared: "The most sacred Sacrifice of the Mass celebrated according to the rites and regulations is an act of public worship offered to God in the name of Christ and the Church. Therefore, the term 'private Mass' should be avoided" (Rubricae Generales Missalis Romani, 269). Cf. Review of Mass without a Congregation: A Sign of Unity or Division?, by Fr Marian Szablewski CR.
^ In the letter to bishops by which he accompanied the motu proprio the Pope told them that the new regulations "do not in any way lessen your own authority and responsibility, either for the liturgy or for the pastoral care of your faithful." Cardinal Castrillón has stated: "The Pope has not changed the Code of Canon Law. The bishop is the moderator of the liturgy in his own diocese. But the Apostolic See is entitled to shape the sacred liturgy of the universal Church. And a bishop must act in harmony with the Apostolic See and must guarantee the rights of every believer, including that of being able to attend the mass of Saint Pius V, as extraordinary form of the rite" (30Days, June/July 2007).
^ Article 4 of the motu proprio
^ New Liturgical Movement: Important Clarifications
^ "Pope says old-rite Latin Mass should be on offer in every Catholic parish"
^ Article 5 §4 of the motu proprio says priests who use the Missal of Blessed John XXIII must not be juridically impeded.


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Tridentine Mass.


Full texts of Tridentine Roman Missals[edit]

1962 typical edition of the Roman Missal Accurately reproduced, but only in black and white. 78 Mb.
1920 typical edition of the Roman Missal, with feasts updated to the late 1920s
Missale Romanum published by Pustet, 1894 (1884 typical edition)
Roman Missal, published by Pustet, 1862 (1634 typical edition, updated to 1862)
Missale Romanum, 1577, (1570 typical edition)

Texts of parts of the Tridentine Missal (post-1604)[edit]

English translation of the Ritus servandus in celebratione Missae (The 1962 Missal left this text unaltered, but completely revised the Rubricae generales Missalis Romani. The English text, titled "Rubrics of the Missale Romanum 1962", is in fact a translation of the Ritus servandus, not of the Rubricae generales.)
Ordinary of the 1962 Roman Missal with MP3 Audio of Latin Text (Latin text with English translation)
Ordinary of the Mass, with English translation at sacred-texts.com (The text is presented as that of the 1962 edition, but the spelling of the Latin, e.g. "coelum", "quotidianum", use of the letter J, shows that, apart from the insertion of "sed et beati Ioseph eiusdem Virginis Sponsi" in the Canon of the Mass, it is really the 1920 text, identical with the 1962 text except for spelling and this insertion)
Ordinary of the Mass, with English translation (This text too is presented as that of the 1962 edition, but is the same hybrid text as in the previous site)
Term-by-term Ordinary of the Mass, with intratext grammatical notes and with English translation (The 1920 text, with "sed et beati Ioseph eiusdem Virginis Sponsi" inserted into the Canon)
An English translation of the Ordinary of the 1920/1962 Missals (the translation of the phrase "sed et beati Ioseph, eiusdem Virginis Sponsi", which marks a difference between the 1962 edition and the previous editions, is given between braces), side-by-side with the 1973 ICEL translation of the Ordinary of the 1970 Missal
F. X. Lasance, The New Roman Missal (1942) (a hand missal for the faithful)
The Roman Missal adapted to the use of the laity from the Missale Romanum incorporating rubrical changes by Pope St. Pius X in 1913
A Manual of Prayers for the Catholic Laity: The Official Prayerbook of the Catholic Church (1896) Official pew missalette adopted for American Catholics by the Third Plenary Council of Baltimore.
The Catholic's Vade Mecum: A Select Manual of Prayers for Daily Use An English Catholic prayer book and missalette published in 1850.
Roman Missal for the Use of the Laity in English and partly in Latin, published in London in 1806. Its Canon of the Mass includes the mention, by name, of the king.
The Saint John Fisher Missale Text and plainchant of the Order of Mass and other parts of the 1962 Roman Missal (e.g., propers of Sundays and First and Second Class feasts), interpolated with elements removed from the Roman Missal after 1900 but still used in many places, and with material from sources such as the pre-1570 English Sarum Missal, material that was thus never part of the Missal authorized by Pope Pius V (see Introduction).

History[edit]

Quo primum, promulgating the 1570 Roman Missal (Pope Pius V)
Cum santissimum, promulgating the 1604 Roman Missal (Pope Clement VIII)
Si quid est, promulgating the 1634 Roman Missal (Pope Urban VIII)
Apostolic Constitution Missale Romanum, promulgating the 1970 Roman Missal (Pope Paul VI)
Encyclical Mediator Dei
Liturgy of the Mass (article in Catholic Encyclopedia)
History of the 1570 Missale Romanum
Woods, Thomas E., Sacred Then and Sacred Now: The Return of the Old Latin Mass (Roman Catholic Books 2008 ISBN 978-0-9793540-2-1)
Hull, Geoffrey, The Banished Heart: Origins of Heteropraxis in the Catholic Church, 1995, rpt. T&T Clark/Continuum, London 2010. ISBN 9780567442208
Aillet, Marc, The old Mass and the new : explaining the motu proprio Summorum Pontificum of Pope Benedict XVI (Ignatius Press 2010 ISBN 978-1-58617-362-3)

Comparison with non-Roman Western rites and uses[edit]

Tridentine Ordinary of the Mass compared with the Lyonese, Bragan, Dominican, Carthusian, Carmelite, Ambrosian and Mozarabic
The ancient liturgy of the Church of England, according to the uses of Sarum, Bangor, York & Hereford and the modern Roman liturgy arranged in parallel columns Tridentine Ordinary of the Mass and Canon compared with the Medieval English uses of Sarum, Bangor, York and Hereford.

Media[edit]

Multimedia tutorial on the Tridentine Mass: Photos, Videos, and Audio
Audio and Explanation of Sacred Music - CatholicLatinMass.org
Audio files - Text of the Mass Latin Mass Society of Ireland.
Video of a 1941 Solemn High Mass narrated by Fulton Sheen
Video of a Missa Cantata, or sung Low Mass, offered on the Last Sunday after Pentecost at the Roman Catholic Parish of St. Nicholas of Chardonnet in Paris, France.
Video of a Votive Mass of the Blessed Virgin Mary offered as a Missa Cantata, or sung Low Mass, at the Roman Catholic Priory of St. Pius X in Warsaw, Poland.
Video of a Solemn High Mass celebrated at the SSPX Seminary of St. Cure d'Ars, Flavigny, France
Video of a Traditional Mass for Christmas, held at St. Roch's in West Bangor, Pa.
Another video of a Low Mass
Photographs of a Traditional (Tridentine) Mass
Forum dedicated to the Tridentine Mass
A Modern Tridentine Mass Wedding
The Extraordinary Form of the Mass - Explained (German)
Priests for the 3rd millennium (German)

Directories of Latin Masses[edit]

Ecclesia Dei's Latin Mass Directory, United States and Canada
WikkiMissa, world directory of Tridentine Mass
List of Tridentine Rite Masses in the US
List of Tridentine Rite Masses Worldwide







v
t
e


Tridentine Mass of the Catholic Church




Including the extraordinary form of the Roman Rite (1962)



Types



Chapter and conventual
Dialogue Mass
Low (Missa Cantata) and High Mass (Solemn)
Missa Sicca
Pontifical

Papal


Ritual Masses

Coronation (Papal)
Missa pro Defunctis
Nuptial


sine populo
Votive

Red







Order



Pre-Mass
Vesting prayers
Asperges me

Vidi aquam in Eastertide


Processional hymn


Mass of the Catechumens
Iudica me
Confiteor

mea culpa


Introit
Kyrie
Gloria in excelsis Deo
Collect
Lection
Gradual
Alleluia or Tract
Sequentia
Gospel
Homily


Mass of the Faithful
Credo

Niceno-Constantinopolitan Creed


Offertory

Lavabo
Orate fratres
Secret


Preface

Sursum corda
Sanctus
Hosanna


Roman Canon

oblation
epiclesis
Words of Institution
anamnesis
elevation
doxology


Pater Noster

embolism
doxology


Pax
Agnus Dei

Dona nobis pacem


Fraction
Holy Communion

Communion antiphon


Ablutions
Postcommunio
Dismissal

Ite, missa est or Benedicamus Domino


Last Gospel


Post-Mass
Leonine prayers
Recessional hymn


For funeral Mass
Dies Irae

Pie Iesu


Libera Me
Requiescant in pace
Absolution of the dead
In paradisum
De profundis





Participants



Acolyte

altar server


Bishop
Boat boy
Cantor or schola
Crucifer
Deacon
Laity
Lector
Master of ceremonies
Porter
Priest
Subdeacon





Altar



Altar cards
Altar crucifix
Altar rails
Ambo
Antependium
Credence table
Kneeler
Lavabo
Misericord
Piscina
Sacristy
Tabernacle





Altar cloths



Altar linens
Antependium
Burse
Chalice veil
Corporal
Pall
Purificator





Illumination



Altar candle
Altar candlestick
Paschal candle
Sanctuary lamp
Triple candlestick





Liturgical
objects



Altar bell
Aspergillum
Chalice
Ciborium
Collection basket
Cruet
Flabellum
Funghellino
Holy water
Incense

use


Manuterge
Paten
Processional cross
Pyx
Sacramental bread

wafer


Sacramental wine (or must)
Thurible
Water





Literature



Cæremoniale Episcoporum
Missale Romanum
Pontificale Romanum
Rituale Romanum





Vestments
(Pontifical/Papal)



Alb
Amice
Chasuble
Cincture
Cope
Crosier
Dalmatic
Episcopal gloves
Ecclesiastical ring
Episcopal sandals
Falda
Humeral veil
Liturgical colours
Mitre
Pallium
Papal fanon
Papal tiara
Pectoral cross
Stole
Sub-cinctorium
Superhumerale
Surplice
Tunicle
Vimpa





Music



Antiphon
Graduale Romanum
Gregorian chant
Hymn
Kyriale Romanum
Liber Usualis
Music for the Requiem Mass
Organ

voluntary


Organum
Polyphony
Reciting tone

Accentus
Recto tono


Tonary

Gregorian Antiphonary







Liturgical year
Calendar
(1954/1955/1960)



Advent
Christmastide
Epiphanytide
Septuagesima
Lent
Passiontide
Holy Week

Paschal Triduum


Eastertide
Ascensiontide
After Pentecost


Calendar of saints
Holy day of obligation
Moveable feast
Octaves


Ranking of liturgical days: Solemnity
Memorial
Commemoration
Feria





Discipline



Church etiquette
Closed communion
Communion and the developmentally disabled
Communion under both kinds
Denial of Communion

Canon 915


Eucharistic fast
First Communion
Genuflection
Headcover
Host desecration
Infant communion
Reserved sacrament
Sign of the Cross
Thanksgiving after Communion
Viaticum





Theology



Blessed Sacrament
Body and Blood of Christ
Corpus Christi (feast)
Crucifixion of Jesus and substitutionary atonement
Epiousios
Eucharistic miracle
Grace ex opere operato
In persona Christi
Historical roots of Catholic Eucharistic theology
Koinonia
Last Supper
Origin of the Eucharist
Priesthood of Melchizedek
Pro multis
Real presence
Transubstantiation





Concepts



Ad orientem
Canon law
Code of Rubrics
Concelebration
Dominus vobiscum
Ecclesiastical Latin
Good Friday prayer for the Jews
Intercession of saints
Ordinary & propers (common)
Oremus
Sunday

Lord's Day


Text and rubrics of the Roman Canon
Vulgate (Sixto-Clementine)

Latin Psalters







Related



Agape feast
Alternatim
Anaphora
Anima Christi
Aspersion
Catholic liturgy
Coetus Internationalis Patrum
Communities using the Tridentine Mass

Indult Catholic
traditionalist Catholic


Congregation for Divine Worship
Council of Trent
Deutsche Singmesse
Divine Office

Canonical hours
Choir dress
Roman Breviary


Eucharistic adoration & benediction

Holy Hour
Forty Hours' Devotion


Fasting and abstinence in the Roman Catholic Church
Fourth Council of the Lateran
French Organ Mass
Gospel Book
History of the Roman Canon
Latin liturgical rites
Latin Mass
Lex orandi, lex credendi
Litany
Liturgical Movement
Liturgical reforms of Pope Pius XII
Mass of Paul VI
Missal
Plenary indulgence
Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei
Pope Pius V
Preces
Pre-Tridentine Mass
Quattuor abhinc annos
Quo primum
Roman Catholic theology
Sacramentary
Sacraments of the Catholic Church
Spoon (liturgy)
Summorum Pontificum
Tra le sollecitudini
Western Rite Orthodoxy








 Catholicism portal










Links to related articles











v
t
e


Sacraments, rites, and liturgies of the Catholic Church



Sacraments



Baptism
Confirmation
Eucharist
Penance
Anointing of the Sick
Holy Orders
Matrimony








Mass



Low Mass
Missa Cantata
Solemn Mass
Pontifical High Mass
Papal Mass





Canonical
liturgical hours



Matins (nighttime)
Lauds (early morning)
Prime (first hour of daylight)
Terce (third hour)
Sext (noon)
Nones (ninth hour)
Vespers (sunset evening)
Compline (end of the day)





Other liturgical services



Asperges
Benediction of the Blessed Sacrament
Exorcism
Funeral

Requiem


Liturgy of the Hours





Liturgical literature



Antiphonary
Book of hours
Breviary
Gospel Book
Gradual
Lectionary
Martyrology
Psalter
Roman Missal
Roman Ritual
Sacramentary





Rites




Latin



Ambrosian Rite
Rite of Braga
Roman Rite

Mass of Paul VI
Extraordinary form
Anglican Use
Zaire Use







Eastern



Alexandrian Rite
Armenian Rite
Antiochene Rite
Byzantine Rite
East Syrian Rite
Mozarabic Rite
West Syrian Rite: Malankara Rite





Orders



Benedictine Rite
Carmelite Rite
Carthusian Rite
Cistercian Rite
Dominican Rite
Norbertine Rite





Defunct rites
and liturgies



African Rite
Aquileian Rite
Celtic Rite
Durham Rite
Gallican Rite
Use of Hereford
Missa Nautica
Missa Sicca
Missa Venatoria
Pre-Tridentine Mass
Use of York
Sarum Rite











 Catholicism portal












v
t
e


History of the Roman Rite Mass



Forms



Pre-Tridentine Mass
Tridentine Mass (Extraordinary form)
Mass of Paul VI (Ordinary form)








Calendars



Tridentine Calendar
General Roman Calendar of 1954
General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII
General Roman Calendar of 1960
General Roman Calendar (current)








 Catholicism portal












v
t
e


Traditionalist Catholicism




Movements advocating Catholic traditions less emphasised or abolished by the Second Vatican Council (1962–1965)



Groups and
movements





Part of the Roman Curia




Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei






In full communion
with the Holy See




Priestly Fraternity of St. Peter
Institute of Christ the King Sovereign Priest
Latin Mass Society of England and Wales
Personal Apostolic Administration of Saint John Mary Vianney
Institute of the Good Shepherd
Sons of the Most Holy Redeemer
Slaves of the Immaculate Heart of Mary
Fraternity of Saint Vincent Ferrer
Canons Regular of Saint John Cantius
Canons Regular of the New Jerusalem
Fœderatio Internationalis Juventutem
Fœderatio Internationalis Una Voce
Indult Catholics






Canonically irregular




Fraternité Notre-Dame
Society of Saint Pius X
SSPX Resistance






Sedevacantist




Conclavism
Sedeprivationism
Siri thesis
Congregation of Mary Immaculate Queen
Istituto Mater Boni Consilii
Society of St. Pius V








Doctrines,
rites and issues



Second Vatican Council
Modernism
Pascendi dominici gregis
Tridentine Mass
Mass of Paul VI
Summorum Pontificum
Ecumenism
Freedom of religion
Syllabus of Errors
Dignitatis humanae
Extra Ecclesiam nulla salus
"Papal Oath"





Prominent
people



Pope Pius X
Pope Pius XII
Pope Benedict XVI
Archbishop Marcel Lefebvre
Bishop Bernard Fellay
Bishop Richard Williamson
Bishop Antônio de Castro Mayer
Archbishop Ngô Đình Thục
Bishop Daniel Dolan
Fr. Gommar DePauw
Fr. Leonard Feeney
Joaquín Sáenz y Arriaga
Michael Davies








 Catholicism portal












v
t
e


Structure of the Mass of the Roman Rite of the Catholic Church



Forms



Pre-Tridentine Mass
Tridentine Mass

Extraordinary form


Mass of Paul VI





Types



Low Mass
Missa Cantata
Solemn Mass
Pontifical High Mass
Papal Mass
Ritual Masses

Blue Mass
Chapter and Conventual Mass
Coronation Mass
Nuptial Mass
Red Mass
Requiem Mass


sine populo
Votive Mass





Order of Mass





Pre-Mass




Vesting prayers in the sacristy
Asperges me

Vidi aquam in Eastertide








Liturgy of
the Word




Sign of the Cross
Psalm 43
Entrance Antiphon
Penitential Rite

Confiteor / Kyrie


Gloria
Dominus vobiscum
Collect

Oremus


First Reading
Responsorial Psalm or Gradual
Epistle
Alleluia

Gospel verse / sequence


Gospel
Homily
Credo

Niceno-Constantinopolitan Creed or Apostles' Creed


General Intercessions






Liturgy of
the Eucharist




Offertory

Orate fratres / prayer over the gifts


Preface

Sursum corda / Sanctus / Hosanna


Eucharistic Prayer/Canon of the Mass

oblation / epiclesis / Words of Institution / elevation / anamnesis
texts & rubrics
Roman Canon

History


Eucharistic Prayer II


Memorial Acclamation
Lord's Prayer

embolism / doxology


Pax
Sign of peace
Agnus Dei
Fraction
Holy Communion

Communion antiphon


Ablutions
Postcommunion
Dismissal

Ite, missa est / Benedicamus Domino


Last Gospel






Post-Mass




Leonine Prayers
Recessional hymn








Participants



Acolyte
Altar server

female


Bishop
Boat boy
Cantor
Choir
Crucifer
Deacon
Extraordinary minister of Holy Communion
Laity

Eucharistic Congress


Lector
Priest
Subdeacon
Usher





Parts of the
Sanctuary / Altar



Altar crucifix
Altar rails
Ambo
Communion bench
Credence table
Kneeler
Lavabo
Misericord
Piscina
Tabernacle





Altar cloths



Altar linens
Antependium
Burse
Chalice veil
Corporal
Lavabo towel
Pall
Purificator





Candles and lamps



Altar candle
Altar candlestick
Paschal candle
Sanctuary lamp
Triple candlestick
Votive candle





Liturgical objects



Altar bell
Aspergillum
Censer
Chalice
Ciborium
Collection basket
Cruet
Flabellum
Funghellino
Holy water
Incense

use


Manuterge
Paten
Processional cross
Pyx
Sacramental bread

wafer


Sacramental wine (or must)
Thurible
Water





Liturgical books
of the Roman Rite



Ceremonial of Bishops
Evangeliary

Gospel Book


Graduale
Lectionary
Roman Missal





Vestments



Alb
Amice
Chasuble
Dalmatic
Episcopal sandals
Liturgical colours
Headcover
Humeral veil
Pallium
Pontifical
Stole
Surplice
Tunicle
Vimpa





Liturgical year
(Roman Calendar)



Advent
Christmastide
Ordinary Time
Septuagesima
Lent
Passiontide
Holy Week

Paschal Triduum


Eastertide
Ascensiontide





Eucharistic
discipline



Abstemius
Anima Christi
Concelebration
Church etiquette
Closed communion
Communion and the developmentally disabled
Communion under both kinds
Denial of Communion

Canon 915


Eucharistic fast
First Communion
Frequent Communion
Genuflection
Host desecration
Infant communion
Intinction
Reserved sacrament
Thanksgiving after Communion
Viaticum





Eucharistic
theology



Body and Blood of Christ
Corpus Christi (feast)
Crucifixion of Jesus and substitutionary atonement
Epiousios
Grace ex opere operato
In persona Christi
Historical roots of Catholic Eucharistic theology
Koinonia
Last Supper
Mirae caritatis
Mysterium fidei (encyclical)
Origin of the Eucharist
Real presence
Transubstantiation
Year of the Eucharist
Stercoranism





Regulations
and concepts



Ad orientem & versus populum
Calendar of saints
Canon law
Code of Rubrics
Commemoration
Ecclesiastical Latin
General Instruction of the Roman Missal
Holy day of obligation
Intercession of saints
Ordinary & propers
Pro multis
Sunday

Lord's Day


Vernacular





Related



Agape feast
Catholic liturgy
Christian prayer

effects of prayer


Congregation for Divine Worship
Council of Trent
Ecclesia de Eucharistia
Eucharistic adoration & benediction

Dominicae Cenae / Holy Hour


Eucharistic miracle
Fermentum
Fourth Council of the Lateran
Gelineau psalmody
Gregorian chant
History of the Roman Canon
Lex orandi, lex credendi
Liturgical Movement
Liturgical reforms of Pope Pius XII
Mediator Dei
Missale Romanum (apostolic constitution)
Pope Paul VI
Catholic theology
Sacraments of the Catholic Church
Second Vatican Council

Sacrosanctum Concilium


Tridentine Mass
Summorum Pontificum
Tra le sollecitudini








 Catholicism portal















 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Tridentine_Mass&oldid=792722104"					
Categories: Tridentine MassCatholic liturgical ritesCatholic termsHidden categories: Articles incorporating a citation from the 1913 Catholic Encyclopedia with Wikisource referenceArticles containing Latin-language text 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БеларускаяCatalàČeštinaDeutschEspañolEsperantoFrançaisGaeilge한국어HrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaItalianoKiswahiliNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 28 July 2017, at 06:51.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Tridentine Mass - Wikipedia






















 






Tridentine Mass

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the forms of the Mass liturgy prior to 1570, see Pre-Tridentine Mass.




Elevation of the chalice after the consecration during a Solemn Mass


The Tridentine Mass, now officially often referred to as the Extraordinary Form of the Roman Rite ('Extraordinary Form for short; Latin: forma extraordinaria), is the Roman Rite Mass which appears in typical editions of the Roman Missal published from 1570 to 1962.[1] The most widely used Mass liturgy in the world until the introduction of the Mass of Paul VI in 1969, it is celebrated in ecclesiastical Latin.[2]
"Tridentine" is derived from the Latin Tridentinus, "related to the city of Tridentum" (modern-day Trent, Italy). In response to a decision of the Council of Trent,[3] Pope Pius V promulgated the 1570 Roman Missal, making it mandatory throughout the Latin Church, except in places and religious orders with missals from before 1370.[4] Despite being often described as "the (Traditional) Latin Mass", the Mass of Paul VI (the Novus Ordo Missae) that replaced it as the Ordinary Form of the Roman Rite has its official text in Latin and is sometimes celebrated in that language.[5][6]
In 2007, Pope Benedict XVI issued the motu proprio Summorum Pontificum, accompanied by a letter to the world's bishops authorizing use of the Tridentine Mass and Ritual for competent priests. The Pope stated that the 1962 edition of the Roman Missal is to be considered an "extraordinary form" (forma extraordinaria)[7] of the Roman Rite, of which the 1970 Mass of Paul VI is the ordinary, normal or standard form. Since that is the only authorized extraordinary form, some refer to the 1962 Tridentine Mass as "the extraordinary form" of the Mass.[8] The 1962 Tridentine Mass is sometimes referred to as the "usus antiquior" (older use) or "forma antiquior" (older form),[9] to differentiate it from the Mass of Paul VI, again in the sense of being the only one of the older forms for which authorization has been granted.
In Masses celebrated without the people, Latin Rite Catholic priests are free to use either the 1962 Tridentine missal or the Ordinary Form missal. These Masses "may—observing all the norms of law—also be attended by faithful who, of their own free will, ask to be admitted".[10] Permission to use the Tridentine Mass as parish liturgies may be given by the pastor or rector.[11]



Contents


1 Language
2 Terminology
3 Pope St. Pius V's revision of the liturgy
4 Historical variations

4.1 Typical editions of the Roman Missal
4.2 1962 Missal


5 Liturgical structure

5.1 Before Mass
5.2 Mass of the Catechumens

5.2.1 Prayers at the foot of the altar
5.2.2 Priest at the altar
5.2.3 Instruction


5.3 Mass of the Faithful

5.3.1 Offertory
5.3.2 Consecration
5.3.3 Elevation candle
5.3.4 Communion
5.3.5 Conclusion


5.4 Prayers of the priest before and after Mass
5.5 Leonine Prayers
5.6 Participation by the people


6 Different levels of celebration
7 Revision of the Roman Missal

7.1 Opposition to the latest revisions of the liturgy


8 Attitudes of Popes since the Second Vatican Council

8.1 Pope Paul VI
8.2 Pope John Paul II
8.3 Pope Benedict XVI


9 Present regulations
10 Present practice
11 See also
12 References
13 External links

13.1 Full texts of Tridentine Roman Missals
13.2 Texts of parts of the Tridentine Missal (post-1604)
13.3 History
13.4 Comparison with non-Roman Western rites and uses
13.5 Media
13.6 Directories of Latin Masses





Language[edit]
In most countries, the language used for celebrating the Tridentine Mass was (and is) Latin. However, in Dalmatia and parts of Istria in Croatia, the liturgy was celebrated in Church Slavonic, and authorisation for use of this language was extended to some other Slavic regions between 1886 and 1935.[12][13]
After the publication of the 1962 edition of the Roman Missal, the 1964 Instruction on implementing the Constitution on Sacred Liturgy of the Second Vatican Council laid down that "normally the epistle and gospel from the Mass of the day shall be read in the vernacular". Episcopal conferences were to decide, with the consent of the Holy See, what other parts, if any, of the Mass were to be celebrated in the vernacular.[14]
Outside the Roman Catholic Church, the vernacular language was introduced into the celebration of the Tridentine Mass by some Old Catholics and Anglo-Catholics with the introduction of the English Missal.
Some Western Rite Orthodox Christians, particularly in the Antiochian Orthodox Archdiocese of North America, use the Tridentine Mass in the vernacular with minor alterations under the title of the "Divine Liturgy of St. Gregory".
Most Old Catholics use the Tridentine Mass, either in the vernacular or in Latin.
Terminology[edit]




A pre-1969 Roman Rite high altar decorated with reredos and fixed on a three step platform, at which the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar are said. Leaning against the Tabernacle and two of the candlesticks are altar cards to remind the celebrant of the words when he is away from the missal


The Catholic Church uses the term extraordinary form of the Roman Rite Mass among other terms.[7] The most widespread term for the rite, other than "Tridentine Mass", is "Latin Mass". Likewise, the ordinary form of the Roman Rite Mass was promulgated in Latin and can be celebrated in that language.[15]
Occasionally the term "Gregorian Rite" is used when talking about the Tridentine Mass,[16][discuss] as is, more frequently, "Tridentine Rite".[17] Pope Benedict XVI declared it inappropriate to speak of the versions of the Roman Missal of before and after 1970 as if they were two rites. Rather, he said, it is a matter of a twofold use of one and the same rite.[18]
Traditionalist Catholics, whose best-known characteristic is an attachment to the Tridentine Mass, frequently refer to it as the "Traditional Mass" or the "Traditional Latin Mass". They describe as a "codifying" of the form of the Mass the preparation of Pius V's edition of the Roman Missal, of which he said that the experts to whom he had entrusted the work collated the existing text with ancient manuscripts and writings, restored it to "the original form and rite of the holy Fathers" and further emended it.[19] To distinguish this form of Mass from the Mass of Paul VI, traditionalist Catholics sometimes call it the "Mass of the Ages",[20][21][22][23][24][25] and say that it comes down to us "from the Church of the Apostles, and ultimately, indeed, from Him Who is its principal Priest and its spotless Victim".[26][27]
Pope St. Pius V's revision of the liturgy[edit]
At the time of the Council of Trent, the traditions preserved in printed and manuscript missals varied considerably, and standardization was sought both within individual dioceses and throughout the Latin West. Standardization was required also in order to prevent the introduction into the liturgy of Protestant ideas in the wake of the Protestant Reformation.
Pope St. Pius V accordingly imposed uniformity by law in 1570 with the papal bull "Quo primum", ordering use of the Roman Missal as revised by him.[19] He allowed only those rites that were at least 200 years old to survive the promulgation of his 1570 Missal. Several of the rites that remained in existence were progressively abandoned, though the Ambrosian rite survives in Milan, Italy and neighbouring areas, stretching even into Switzerland, and the Mozarabic rite remains in use to a limited extent in Toledo and Madrid, Spain. The Carmelite, Carthusian and Dominican religious orders kept their rites, but in the second half of the 20th century two of these three chose to adopt the Roman Rite. The rite of Braga, in northern Portugal, seems to have been practically abandoned: since 18 November 1971 that archdiocese authorizes its use only on an optional basis.[28]
Beginning in the late 17th century, France and neighbouring areas, such as Münster, Cologne and Trier in Germany, saw a flurry of independent missals published by bishops influenced by Jansenism and Gallicanism. This ended when Abbot Guéranger and others initiated in the 19th century a campaign to return to the Roman Missal.
Pius V's revision of the liturgy had as one of its declared aims the restoration of the Roman Missal "to the original form and rite of the holy Fathers".[19] Due to the relatively limited resources available to his scholars, this aim was in fact not realised.[29]
Three different printings of Pius V's Roman Missal, with minor variations, appeared in 1570, a folio and a quarto edition in Rome and a folio edition in Venice. A reproduction of what is considered to be the earliest, referred to therefore as the editio princeps, was produced in 1998.[30] In the course of the printing of the editio princeps, some corrections were made by pasting revised texts over parts of the already printed pages.[31] There were several printings again in the following year 1571, with various corrections of the text.[32]
Historical variations[edit]




Missale Romanum in Croatian Glagolitic script printed in 1483


In the Apostolic Constitution (papal bull) Quo primum, with which he prescribed use of his 1570 edition of the Roman Missal, Pius V decreed: "We order and enjoin that nothing must be added to Our recently published Missal, nothing omitted from it, nor anything whatsoever be changed within it." This of course did not exclude changes by a Pope, and Pope Pius V himself added to the Missal the feast of Our Lady of Victory, to celebrate the victory of Lepanto of 7 October 1571. His immediate successor, Pope Gregory XIII, changed the name of this feast to "The Most Holy Rosary of the Blessed Virgin Mary" and Pope John XXIII changed it to "Our Lady of the Rosary".
Pius V's work in severely reducing the number of feasts in the Roman Calendar (see this comparison) was very soon further undone by his successors. Feasts that he had abolished, such as those of the Presentation of Mary, Saint Anne and Saint Anthony of Padua, were restored even before Clement VIII's 1604 typical edition of the Missal was issued.
In the course of the following centuries new feasts were repeatedly added and the ranks of certain feasts were raised or lowered. A comparison between Pope Pius V's Tridentine Calendar and the General Roman Calendar of 1954 shows the changes made from 1570 to 1954. Pope Pius XII made a general revision in 1955, and Pope John XXIII made further general revisions in 1960 simplifying the terminology concerning the ranking of liturgical celebrations.
While keeping on 8 December what he called the feast of "the Conception of Blessed Mary" (omitting the word "Immaculate"), Pius V suppressed the existing special Mass for the feast, directing that the Mass for the Nativity of Mary (with the word "Nativity" replaced by "Conception") be used instead. Part of that earlier Mass was revived in the Mass that Pope Pius IX ordered to be used on the feast.
Typical editions of the Roman Missal[edit]




Altar of Santa Cecilia in Trastevere, as arranged in 1700:[33] one of many churches in Rome whose altar, placed at the western end of the church, was positioned so that the priest necessarily faced east, and so towards the people, when celebrating Mass[34]


In addition to such occasional changes, the Roman Missal was subjected to general revisions whenever a new "typical edition" (an official edition whose text was to be reproduced in printings by all publishers) was issued.
After Pius V's original Tridentine Roman Missal, the first new typical edition was promulgated in 1604 by Pope Clement VIII, who in 1592 had issued a revised edition of the Vulgate. The Bible texts in the Missal of Pope Pius V did not correspond exactly to the new Vulgate, and so Clement edited and revised Pope Pius V's Missal, making alterations both in the scriptural texts and in other matters. He abolished some prayers that the 1570 Missal obliged the priest to say on entering the church; shortened the two prayers to be said after the Confiteor; directed that the words "Haec quotiescumque feceritis, in meam memoriam facietis" ("Do this in memory of me") should not be said while displaying the chalice to the people after the consecration, but before doing so; inserted directions at several points of the Canon that the priest was to pronounce the words inaudibly; suppressed the rule that, at High Mass, the priest, even if not a bishop, was to give the final blessing with three signs of the cross; and rewrote the rubrics, introducing, for instance, the ringing of a small bell.[35]
The next typical edition was issued in 1634, when Pope Urban VIII made another general revision of the Roman Missal.[36]
There was no further typical edition until that of Pope Leo XIII in 1884.[37] It introduced only minor changes, not profound enough to merit having the papal bull of its promulgation included in the Missal, as the bulls of 1604 and 1634 were.
In 1911, with the bull Divino Afflatu,[38] Pope Pius X made significant changes in the rubrics. He died in 1914, so it fell to his successor Pope Benedict XV to issue a new typical edition incorporating his changes. This 1920 edition included a new section headed: "Additions and Changes in the Rubrics of the Missal in accordance with the Bull Divino afflatu and the Subsequent Decrees of the Sacred Congregation of Rites". This additional section was almost as long as the previous section on the "General Rubrics of the Missal", which continued to be printed unchanged.
Pope Pius XII radically revised the Palm Sunday and Easter Triduum liturgy, suppressed many vigils and octaves and made other alterations in the calendar (see General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII), reforms that were completed in Pope John XXIII's 1960 Code of Rubrics, which were incorporated in the final 1962 typical edition of the Tridentine Missal, replacing both Pius X's "Additions and Changes in the Rubrics of the Missal" and the earlier "General Rubrics of the Missal".
Changes made to the liturgy in 1965 and 1967 in the wake of decisions of the Second Vatican Council were not incorporated in the Roman Missal, but were reflected in the provisional vernacular translations produced when the language of the people began to be used in addition to Latin. This explains the references sometimes seen to "the 1965 Missal".
The General Roman Calendar was revised partially in 1955 and 1960 and completely in 1969 in Pope Paul VI's motu proprio Mysterii Paschalis, again reducing the number of feasts.[39]
1962 Missal[edit]
The Roman Missal issued by Pope John XXIII in 1962 differed from earlier editions in a number of ways.

It incorporated the change made by John XXIII in 1962, when he inserted into the canon of the Mass the name of Saint Joseph, the first change for centuries in the canon of the Mass.[40]
It incorporated major changes that Pope Pius XII made in 1955 in the liturgy of Palm Sunday and the Easter Triduum. These included:

Abolition of the ceremonies whereby the blessing of palms on Palm Sunday resembled a Mass, with Epistle, Gospel, Preface and Sanctus; suppression of the knocking three times on the closed doors before returning to the church after the blessing and distribution of the palms; omission of the prayers at the foot of the altar and of the Last Gospel.
On Holy Thursday the washing of feet was incorporated into the Mass instead of being an independent ceremony; if done by a bishop, 12 men, not 13, had their feet washed; the Mass itself was said in the evening instead of the morning and some of its prayers were removed or altered.
On Good Friday, elements that suggested the usual practices of the Mass were removed: the sacred ministers began the liturgy in alb and (for celebrant and deacon) black stoles, rather than respectively in black chasuble, dalmatic, and tunicle, as per a typical Mass; the sacred ministers donned their vestments (without maniples) only for the Solemn Intercessions, in which the celebrant wore a cope instead of a chasuble, and removed them for the adoration of the Cross; the sacred ministers changed to violet vestments (again, without maniples) for the distribution of Holy Communion; "Let us pray. Let us kneel. Arise" was added at the prayer for the Jews, and the adjective perfidis was removed (see Good Friday Prayer for the Jews); an afternoon Communion Service replaced the morning Mass of the Presanctified, at which the priest alone received the earlier-consecrated host, and drank unconsecrated wine into which a small portion of the consecrated host had been put.
The Easter Vigil was moved from Holy Saturday morning to the following nighttime; the use of a triple candle was abolished and other changes were made both to the initial ceremonies centred on the Paschal Candle and to other parts, such as the reduction from twelve to four of the prophecies read, and the introduction of a "renewal of baptismal promises" for the laity (notable for being the first time since the codification of the Missal of Pope Pius V that the vernacular was permitted to be used in such a manner).


It incorporated the rubrical changes made by Pope Pius XII's 1955 decree Cum nostra, which included:

Vigils were abolished except those of Easter, Christmas, Ascension, Pentecost, Saints Peter and Paul, Saint John the Baptist, and Saint Lawrence;
all octaves were abolished except those of Easter, Christmas and Pentecost;
no more than three collects were to be said at Low Mass and one at Solemn Mass.


Its calendar incorporated both the changes made by Pope Pius XII in 1955 (General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII) and those introduced by Pope John XXIII himself with his 1960 Code of Rubrics (General Roman Calendar of 1960). These included:

suppression of the "Solemnity of Saint Joseph, Spouse of the Blessed Virgin Mary" (Wednesday after the second Sunday after Easter) and its replacement by the feast of "Saint Joseph the Worker" (1 May);
removal of some duplicate feasts that appeared twice in earlier versions of the calendar, namely, the Chair of Saint Peter at Rome (18 January), the Finding of the Holy Cross (3 May), Saint John before the Latin Gate (6 May), the Apparition of Saint Michael (8 May), Saint Peter in Chains (1 August), and the Invention of the Relics of Saint Stephen (3 August);
addition of feasts such as that of the Queenship of Mary (31 May).


It replaced the Roman Missal's introductory sections, Rubricae generales Missalis (General Rubrics of the Missal) and Additiones et variationes in rubricis Missalis ad normam Bullae "Divino afflatu" et subsequentium S.R.C. Decretorum (Additions and alterations to the Rubrics of the Missal in line with the Bull Divino afflatu and the subsequent decrees of the Sacred Congregation of Rites), with the text of the General Rubrics and the General Rubrics of the Roman Missal parts of the 1960 Code of Rubrics.

Pope Benedict XVI authorized, under certain conditions, continued use of this 1962 edition of the Roman Missal as an extraordinary form of the Roman Rite,[41] alongside the later form, introduced in 1970, which is now the normal or ordinary form.[42] Pre-1962 forms of the Roman Rite, which some individuals and groups employ,[43] are not authorized for liturgical use.
Liturgical structure[edit]
The Mass is divided into two parts, the Mass of the Catechumens and the Mass of the Faithful. Catechumens, those being instructed in the faith,[44] were once dismissed after the first half, not having yet professed the faith. Profession of faith was considered essential for participation in the Eucharistic sacrifice.[45]
This rule of the Didache is still in effect. It is only one of the three conditions (baptism, right faith and right living) for admission to receiving Holy Communion that the Catholic Church has always applied and that were already mentioned in the early 2nd century by Saint Justin Martyr: "And this food is called among us the Eucharist, of which no one is allowed to partake but the man who believes that the things which we teach are true, and who has been washed with the washing that is for the remission of sins, and unto regeneration, and who is so living as Christ has enjoined" (First Apology, Chapter LXVI).
Before Mass[edit]

Asperges (Sprinkling with holy water, Psalm 51:9, 3) is an optional penitential rite that ordinarily precedes only the principal Mass on Sunday.[46] In the sacristy, a priest wearing an alb, if he is to celebrate the Mass, or surplice, if he is not the celebrant of the Mass, and vested with a stole, which is the color of the day if the priest is the celebrant of the Mass or purple if he is not the celebrant of the Mass, exorcises and blesses salt and water, then puts the blessed salt into the water by thrice sprinkling it in the form of a cross while saying once, "Commixtio salis et aquæ pariter fiat in nomine Patris, et Filii et Spiritus Sancti" (May a mixture of salt and water now be made in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Spirit). After that, the priest, vested in a cope of the color of the day, while the choir sings an antiphon and a verse of Psalm 50/51 or 117/118, sprinkles with the holy water the altar three times, and then the clergy and the congregation. This rite, if used, precedes the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar. During the Easter season, the "Asperges me..." verse is replaced by the "Vidi aquam..." verse, and "Alleluia" is added to the "Ostende nobis..." verse and to its response.

Following the Asperges, Mass begins.
Mass of the Catechumens[edit]
The first part is the Mass of the Catechumens.[47]
Prayers at the foot of the altar[edit]




Prayers at the foot of the altar


The sequence of Prayers at the foot of the altar is:

Sign of the cross


The priest, after processing in—at solemn Mass with deacon, and subdeacon, master of ceremonies and servers, and at other Masses with one or more servers—and at Low Mass placing the veiled chalice on the centre of the altar, makes the sign of the cross at the foot of the altar. At Solemn Mass, the chalice is placed beforehand on the credence table.


Psalm 42 (Psalm 43 MT, i.e. Masoretic numbering), known by its incipit Iudica me, is recited, except in Masses of the season during Passiontide and in Requiem Masses. It is preceded and followed by an antiphon of Psalm 42:4 (43:4 MT) "Introibo ad altare Dei, ad Deum qui lætificat iuventutem meam" (Translation: "I shall go in to the altar of God, the God who gives joy to my youth"), is recited by the priest, alternating with the deacon and subdeacon (if present) or servers.
Psalm 124:8 is recited:


Priest (makes the sign of the cross): "Our help is in the name of the Lord,"
Servers: "Who made heaven and earth."


The double form of a prayer of general confession of sins, known by its incipit Confiteor (I confess), is recited:


Priest (while bowing low): "Confíteor Deo omnipoténti, beátæ Maríæ semper Vírgini, beáto Michaéli Archángelo, beáto Ioanni Baptístæ, sanctis Apóstolis Petro et Paulo, ómnibus Sanctis, et vobis, fratres (tibi, Pater), quia peccávi nimis cogitatióne, verbo et ópere: (while striking the breast three times) mea culpa, mea culpa, mea máxima culpa. Ideo precor beátam Maríam semper Vírginem, beátum Michaélem Archángelum, beátum Ioánnem Baptístam, sanctos Apóstolos Petrum et Paulum, omnes Sanctos, et vos, fratres (te, Pater), oráre pro me ad Dóminum Deum nostrum."

(Translation: I confess to almighty God, to blessed Mary ever Virgin, to blessed Michael the archangel, to blessed John the Baptist, to the holy apostles Peter and Paul, to all the saints, and to you, brethren, that I have sinned exceedingly in thought, word, and deed through my fault, through my fault, through my most grievous fault. Therefore, I beseech blessed Mary ever Virgin ... and you, brethren, to pray to the Lord our God for me.)


The servers pray for the priest: "May Almighty God have mercy on thee, forgive thee thy sins, and bring thee to life everlasting." Then it is the ministers' or servers' turn to confess sinfulness and to ask for prayers. They use the same words as those used by the priest, except that they say "you, Father," in place of "you, brethren", and the priest responds with the same prayer that the servers have used for him (but using the plural number) plus an extra prayer.


Some verses are then said by priest and ministers (or servers), ending with the priest saying Oremus te Domine (Let us pray) After this he ascends to the altar, praying silently "Take away from us our iniquities" "that with pure minds we may worthily enter into the holy of holies", a reference to Exodus 26:33-34, 1 Kings 6:16, 1 Kings 8:6, 2 Chronicles 3:8, Ezekiel 41:4, and others. He places his joined hands on the edge of the altar, so that only the tips of the small fingers touch the front of it, and silently prays that, by the merits of the Saints whose relics are in the altar, God may pardon all his sins. At the words quorum relíquiæ hic sunt (whose relics are here), he spreads his hands and kisses the altar.

Priest at the altar[edit]




Dominus vobiscum ("The Lord be with you") before the Collect.
In the Tridentine Mass the priest should keep his eyes downcast at this point.[48]



Introit

The priest again makes the sign of the Cross while he begins to read the Introit, which is usually taken from a Psalm. Exceptions occur: e.g. the Introit for Easter Sunday is adapted from Wis 10:20-21, and the antiphon in Masses of the Blessed Virgin Mary was from the poet Sedulius. This evolved from the practice of singing a full Psalm, interspersed with the antiphon, during the entrance of the clergy, before the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar were added to the Mass in medieval times. This is indicated by the very name of "Introit".


Kyrie

This part of Mass is a linguistic marker of the origins of the Roman liturgy in Greek. "Kyrie, eleison; Christe, eleison; Kyrie, eleison." means "Lord, have mercy; Christ have mercy;..." Each phrase is said (or sung) three times.


Gloria in excelsis Deo

The first line of the Gloria[49] is taken from Lk 2:14. The Gloria is omitted during the penitential liturgical seasons of Advent, Septuagesima, Lent, and Passiontide, in which violet vestments are worn, but is used on feasts falling during such seasons, as well as on Holy Thursday. It is always omitted for a Requiem Mass.


The Collect

The priest turns toward the people and says, "Dominus vobiscum." The servers respond: "Et cum spiritu tuo." ("The Lord be with you." "And with thy spirit"). The Collect follows, a prayer not drawn directly from Scripture. It tends to reflect the season.



Instruction[edit]

The priest reads the Epistle, primarily an extract from the letters of St. Paul to various churches. In his motu proprio Summorum Pontificum, Pope Benedict XVI has permitted this to be read in the vernacular language when Mass is celebrated with the people.[50]
Between the Epistle and the Gospel two (rarely three) choir responses are sung or said. Usually these are a Gradual followed by an Alleluia; but between Septuagesima Sunday and Holy Saturday, or in a Requiem Mass or other penitential Mass the Alleluia is replaced by a Tract, and between Easter Sunday and Pentecost the Gradual is replaced by a second Alleluia. On a few exceptional occasions (most notably Easter, Pentecost, Corpus Christi, and in a Requiem Mass), a Sequence follows the Alleluia or Tract.

The Gradual is partly composed of a portion of a Psalm.


The Gospel reading, an extract from one of the four Gospels

Before the reading or chanting of the Gospel, the priest prays: "Cleanse my heart and my lips, O almighty God, who didst cleanse the lips of the prophet Isaias...", a reference to Isaiah 6:6. In this passage, after being cleansed by the angel, Isaiah was instructed to prophesy.


The Homily

The rite of Mass as revised by Pope Pius V (the Tridentine Mass) does not consider a sermon obligatory and speaks of it instead as merely optional: it presumes that the Creed, if it is to be said, will follow the Gospel immediately, but adds: "If, however, someone is to preach, the Homilist, after the Gospel has been finished, preaches, and when the sermon or moral address has been completed, the Credo is said, or if it is not to be said, the Offertory is sung."[51] By contrast the Roman Missal as revised by Pope Paul VI declares that the homily may not be omitted without a grave reason from Mass celebrated with the people attending on Sundays and Holy Days of Obligation and that it is recommended on other days.[52]


The Creed

This is the Nicene Creed, professing faith in God the Father, in God the Son, the Word made flesh, in God the Holy Ghost, and in the Holy Church. At the mention of the Incarnation, the celebrant and the congregation genuflect.



Mass of the Faithful[edit]
The second part is the Mass of the Faithful.[53]
Offertory[edit]

Offertory Verse

After greeting the people once more ("Dominus vobiscum/Et cum spiritu tuo") and giving the invitation to pray (Oremus), the priest enters upon the Mass of the Faithful, from which the non-baptized were once excluded. He reads the Offertory Verse, a short quotation from Holy Scripture which varies with the Mass of each day, with hands joined.


Offering of Bread and Wine

The priest offers the host, holding it on the paten at breast level and praying that, although he is unworthy, God may accept "this spotless host (or victim, the basic meaning of hostia in Latin) for his own innumerable sins, offences and neglects, for all those present, and for all faithful Christians living and dead, that it may avail unto salvation of himself and those mentioned. He then mixes a few drops of water with the wine, which will later become the Blood of Jesus, and holding the chalice so that the lip of the chalice is about the height of his lips, offers "the chalice of salvation", asking that it may "ascend with a sweet fragrance." He then prays a prayer of contrition adapted from Dan 3:39-40.


Incensing of the offerings and of the faithful

At a High Mass, the priest blesses the incense, then incenses the bread and wine. Among the prayers the priest says is Psalm 141:2-4: "Let my prayer, O Lord, be directed as incense in Thy sight;...", which is prayed as he incenses the altar. The priest then gives the thurible to the deacon, who incenses the priest, then the other ministers and the congregation.


Washing the hands

The priest prays Psalm 26:6-12: "I will wash my hands among the innocent..."


Prayer to the Most Holy Trinity

This prayer asks that the Divine Trinity may receive the oblation being made in remembrance of the passion, resurrection and ascension of Jesus and in honour of blessed Mary ever Virgin and the other saints, "that it may avail to their honour and our salvation: and that they may vouchsafe to intercede for us in heaven..."


Orate fratres, Suscipiat and Secret; Amen concludes Offertory

Here the priest turns to the congregation and says the first two words, "Orate, fratres," in an elevated tone and then turns around while finishing the exhortation in the secret tone. "Pray, Brethren, that my sacrifice and yours may be acceptable to God the Father almighty."
The altar servers respond with the Suscipiat to which the priest secretly responds, "Amen.": Suscipiat Dominus sacrificium de manibus tuis, ad laudem et gloriam nominis sui, ad utilitatem quoque nostram, totiusque ecclesiæ suae sanctæ. A translation in the English is: "May the Lord accept this sacrifice at your hands, to the praise and glory of His name, for our good and the good of all His Holy Church."
The Priest then says the day's Secret inaudibly, and concludes it with Per omnia sæcula sæculorum aloud.
The altar servers and (in dialogue Mass) the congregation respond: "Amen."



Consecration[edit]








Preface of the Canon

"The Roman Canon dates in essentials from before St. Gregory the Great, who died in 604, and who is credited with adding a phrase to it.[54] (See History of the Roman Canon.) It contains the main elements found in almost all rites, but in an unusual arrangement and it is unclear which part should be considered to be the Epiclesis.
Dominus vobiscum. Et cum spiritu tuo. Sursum corda. Habemus ad Dominum. Gratias agamus Domino Deo nostro. Dignum et iustum est. The first part can be seen above at the Collect; the rest means: Lift up your hearts. We lift them up to the Lord. Let us give thanks to the Lord our God. It is right and just.
Next a preface is prayed, indicating specific reasons for giving thanks to God. This leads to the Sanctus.[55]


Canon or rule of consecration[56]

Intercession (corresponding to the reading of the diptychs in the Byzantine Rite—a diptych is a two-leaf painting, carving or writing tablet.[57])

Here the priest prays for the living, that God may guard, unite and govern the Church together with the Pope and "all those who, holding to the truth, hand on the catholic and apostolic faith". Then specific living people are mentioned, and the congregation in the church. Next, Mary ever Virgin, Saint Joseph, the Apostles, and some Popes and other Martyrs are mentioned by name, as well as a generic "and all your Saints", in communion with whom prayer is offered.


Prayers preparatory to the consecration

A prayer that God may graciously accept the offering and "command that we be delivered from eternal damnation and counted among the flock of those you have chosen".


Consecration (transubstantiation) and major elevation




Elevation of the chalice during the Canon of the Mass at a Solemn Mass



The passage Lk 22:19-20 is key in this section. In Summa Theologiae III 78 3 Thomas Aquinas addresses the interspersed phrase, "the mystery of faith". On this phrase, see Mysterium fidei.


Oblation of the victim to God

An oblation is an offering;[58] the pure, holy, spotless victim is now offered, with a prayer that God may accept the offering and command his holy angel to carry the offering to God's altar on high, so that those who receive the Body and Blood of Christ "may be filled with every grace and heavenly blessing".


Remembrance of the Dead

The priest now prays for the dead ("those who have gone before us with the sign of faith and rest in the sleep of peace") and asks that they be granted a place of refreshment, light and peace. This is followed by a prayer that we be granted fellowship with the Saints. John the Baptist and fourteen martyrs, seven men and seven women, are mentioned by name.


End of the Canon and doxology with minor elevation

The concluding doxology is: "Through him, and with him, and in him, O God, almighty Father, in the unity of the Holy Spirit, all glory and honour is yours, for ever and ever." "Amen" ratifies the Canon prayer.





Elevation candle[edit]




Beuron Art School representation of an elevation candle, mistakenly placed at the Gospel side and upon the altar


Until 1960, the Tridentine form of the Roman Missal laid down that a candle should be placed at the Epistle side of the altar and that it should be lit at the showing of the consecrated sacrament to the people.[59] In practice, except in monasteries and on special occasions, this had fallen out of use long before Pope John XXIII replaced the section on the general rubrics of the Roman Missal with his Code of Rubrics, which no longer mentioned this custom. On this, see Elevation candle.
Communion[edit]




Before receiving Communion from the chalice, the priest makes the sign of the cross over himself, saying (in Latin): May the Blood of our Lord Jesus Christ keep my soul for eternal life. Amen.

























The Lord's Prayer and Libera nos[60]




The "Libera nos" is an extension of the Lord's Prayer developing the line "sed libera nos a malo" ("but deliver us from evil"). The priest prays that we may be delivered from all evils and that the Virgin Mary, Mother of God, together with the apostles and saints, may intercede to obtain for us peace in our day.




Fraction of the Host




During the preceding prayer, the priest breaks the consecrated Host into three parts, and after concluding the prayer drops the smallest part into the Chalice while praying that this commingling and consecration of the Body and Blood of Christ may "be to us who receive it effectual to life everlasting."




Agnus Dei




"Agnus Dei" means "Lamb of God". The priest then prays: "Lamb of God, who takest away the sins of the world, have mercy on us." He repeats this, and then adds: "Lamb of God, who takest away the sins of the world, grant us peace." The Mass of the Last Supper on Holy Thursday has "have mercy on us" all three times. In Requiem Masses, the petitions are "grant them rest" (twice), followed by "grant them eternal rest."


























The Pax

The priest asks Christ to look not at the priest's sins but at the faith of Christ's Church, and prays for peace and unity within the Church. Then, if a High Mass is being celebrated, he gives the sign of peace to the deacon, saying: "Peace be with you."


Prayers preparatory to the Communion

In the first of these two prayers for himself, the priests asks that by Holy Communion he may be freed from all his iniquities and evils, be made to adhere to the commandments of Jesus and never be separated from him. In the second he asks: "Let not the partaking of Thy Body, O Lord Jesus Christ...turn to my judgment and condemnation: but through Thy goodness may it be unto me a safeguard...."


Receiving of the Body and Blood of our Lord

The priest quietly says several prayers here, before receiving Communion. The first is said in a low voice while taking up the Host onto the paten. The second of them, spoken three times in a slightly audible voice,[61] while the priest holds the Host in his left hand and strikes his breast with his right, is based on Matthew 8:8: "Lord, I am not worthy...." Then, after having reverently consumed the Host, he takes up the chalice while in a low voice reciting Psalm 116:12-13: "What shall I render to the Lord, for all the things he hath rendered unto me? I will take the chalice of salvation; and I will call upon the name of the Lord." immediately adding Psalm 18:4: "Praising I will call upon the Lord: and I shall be saved from my enemies."







Priest on the "Ecce Agnus Dei - Behold the Lamb of God" in the people communion.





If the priest is to give Communion to others, he holds up a small host and says aloud: "Behold the Lamb of God ...", and three times: "Lord, I am not worthy ...". He then gives Communion, first making with the host the sign of the cross over each communicant, while saying: "May the Body of Our Lord Jesus Christ preserve your soul for eternal life. Amen."[62]



Conclusion[edit]




"Ite, missa est" sung by the deacon at a Solemn Mass.



Prayers during the Ablutions

The prayers now focus on what has been received, that "we may receive with a pure mind", "that no stain of sin may remain in me, whom these pure and holy sacraments have refreshed."


Communion Antiphon and Postcommunion

The communion antiphon is normally a portion of a Psalm. The Postcommunion Prayer is akin to the Collect in being an appropriate prayer not directly drawn from Scripture.


Ite Missa est; Blessing

"Go, it is the dismissal." The word "Mass" derives from this phrase.
After saying a silent prayer for himself, the priest then gives the people his blessing.
Prior to the revisions of Pope Pius XII and Pope John XXIII, the Ite Missa est was replaced with Benedicamus Domino ("Let us bless the Lord") on days in which the Gloria was not said and the rubrics required the priest to wear violet vestments (i.e., Masses of the season during Advent, Septuagesima, Lent and Passiontide; vigils; certain votive Masses). In the 1962 Missal, Benedicamus Domino is said only when the Mass is followed by another liturgical action, such as the Eucharistic Processions on Holy Thursday and Corpus Christi.
In Requiem Masses, the Ite Missa est is replaced with Requiescant in pace, with the response being "Amen" instead of Deo gratias.


The Last Gospel

The priest then reads the Last Gospel, the beginning of the Gospel of John, John 1:1-14, which recounts the Incarnation of the Son of God. On certain occasions, as for instance at the Day Mass on Christmas Day, another Gospel passage was read instead because that Gospel is read as the Gospel of the Mass, but Pope John XXIII's revision of the rubrics decreed that on those and on other occasions the Last Gospel should simply be omitted.



Prayers of the priest before and after Mass[edit]
The Tridentine Missal includes prayers for the priest to say before and after Mass.
In later editions of the Roman Missal, including that of 1962, the introductory heading of these prayers indicates that they are to be recited pro opportunitate (as circumstances allow),[63] which in practice means that they are merely optional and may be omitted. The original Tridentine Missal presents most of the prayers as obligatory, indicating as optional only a very long prayer attributed to Saint Ambrose (which later editions divide into seven sections, each to be recited on only one day of the week) and two other prayers attributed to Saint Ambrose and Saint Thomas Aquinas respectively.[64]
In addition to these three prayers, the original Tridentine Missal proposes for the priest to recite before he celebrates Mass the whole of Psalms 83–85, 115, 129 (the numbering is that of the Septuagint and Vulgate), and a series of collect-style prayers. Later editions add, after the three that in the original Missal are only optional, prayers to the Blessed Virgin, Saint Joseph, all the angels and saints, and the saint whose Mass is to be celebrated, but, as has been said, treats as optional all the prayers before Mass, even those originally given as obligatory.[65]
The original Tridentine Missal proposes for recitation by the priest after Mass three prayers, including the Adoro te devote. Later editions place before these three the Canticle of the Three Youths (Dan)[66] with three collects, and follow them with the Anima Christi and seven more prayers, treating as optional even the three prescribed in the original Tridentine Missal.[67]
Leonine Prayers[edit]
From 1884 to 1965, the Holy See prescribed the recitation after Low Mass of certain prayers, originally for the solution of the Roman Question and, after this problem was solved by the Lateran Treaty, "to permit tranquillity and freedom to profess the faith to be restored to the afflicted people of Russia".[68]
These prayers are known as the Leonine Prayers because it was Pope Leo XIII who on 6 January 1884 ordered their recitation throughout the world. In what had been the Papal States, they were already in use since 1859.
The prayers comprised three Ave Marias, one Salve Regina followed by a versicle and response, and a collect prayer that, from 1886 on, asked for the conversion of sinners and "the freedom and exaltation of Holy Mother the Church", and, again from 1886 on, a prayer to Saint Michael. In 1904, Pope Pius X added a thrice-repeated "Most Sacred Heart of Jesus, have mercy on us."
In 1964, with effect from 7 March 1965, the Holy See ended the obligation to recite the Leonine Prayers after Low Mass.[69] However, the Leonine Prayers are sometimes still recited after present-day celebrations of Tridentine Mass, although they are not included even in the 1962 edition of the Tridentine Missal.
Participation by the people[edit]




Nuptial Low Mass






Distribution of Communion at a Tridentine Mass: typically, the faithful kneel and receive in the mouth and women wear a headcovering.


The participation of the congregation at the Tridentine Mass is interior, involving eye and heart, and exterior by mouth.[70]
Except in the Dialogue Mass form, which arose about 1910 and led to a more active exterior participation of the congregation, the people present at the Tridentine Mass do not recite out loud the prayers of the Mass. Only the server or servers join with the priest in reciting the prayers at the foot of the altar (which include the Confiteor) and in speaking the other responses.[71] Most of the prayers that the priest says are spoken inaudibly, including almost all the Mass of the Faithful: the offertory prayers, the Canon of the Mass (except for the preface and the final doxology), and (apart from the Agnus Dei) those between the Lord's Prayer and the postcommunion.
At a Solemn Mass or Missa Cantata, a choir sings the servers' responses, except for the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar. The choir sings the Introit, the Kyrie, the Gloria, the Gradual, the Tract or Alleluia, the Credo, the Offertory and Communion antiphons, the Sanctus, and the Agnus Dei. Of these, only the five that form part of the Ordinary of the Mass are usually sung at a Missa Cantata. In addition to the Gregorian Chant music for these, polyphonic compositions exist, some quite elaborate. The priest largely says quietly the words of the chants and then recites other prayers while the choir continues the chant.
Different levels of celebration[edit]
There are various forms of celebration of the Tridentine Mass:

Pontifical High Mass: celebrated by a bishop accompanied by an assisting priest, deacon, subdeacon, thurifer, acolytes and other ministers, under the guidance of a priest acting as Master of Ceremonies. Most often the specific parts assigned to deacon and subdeacon are performed by priests. The parts that are said aloud are all chanted, except that the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar, which before the reform of Pope Pius V were said in the sacristy, are said quietly by the bishop with the deacon and the subdeacon, while the choir sings the Introit. The main difference between a pontifical and an ordinary High Mass is that the bishop remains at his throne almost all the time until the offertory.
Solemn or High Mass (Latin: Missa solemnis): offered by a priest accompanied by a deacon and subdeacon and the other ministers mentioned above.
Missa Cantata (Latin for "sung mass"): celebrated by a priest without deacon and subdeacon, and thus a form of Low Mass, but with some parts (the three variable prayers, the Scripture readings, Preface, Pater Noster, and Ite Missa Est) sung by the priest, and other parts (Introit, Kyrie, Gloria, Gradual, Tract or Alleluia, Credo, Offertory Antiphon, Sanctus and Benedictus, Agnus Dei, and Communion Antiphon) sung by the choir. Incense may be used exactly as at a Solemn Mass with the exception of incensing the celebrant after the Gospel which is not done.
Low Mass: the priest sings no part of the Mass, though in some places a choir or the congregation sings, during the Mass, hymns not always directly related to the Mass.

In its article "The Liturgy of the Mass", the 1917 Catholic Encyclopedia describes how, when concelebration ceased to be practised in Western Europe, Low Mass became distinguished from High Mass:[72]

The separate celebrations then involved the building of many altars in one church and the reduction of the ritual to the simplest possible form. The deacon and subdeacon were in this case dispensed with; the celebrant took their part as well as his own. One server took the part of the choir and of all the other ministers, everything was said instead of being sung, the incense and kiss of peace were omitted. So we have the well-known rite of low Mass (missa privata). This then reacted on high Mass (missa solemnis), so that at high Mass too the celebrant himself recites everything, even though it be sung by the deacon, subdeacon, or choir.

On the origin of the "Missa Cantata", the same source gives the following information:

... high Mass is the norm; it is only in the complete rite with deacon and subdeacon that the ceremonies can be understood. Thus, the rubrics of the Ordinary of the Mass always suppose that the Mass is high. Low Mass, said by a priest alone with one server, is a shortened and simplified form of the same thing. Its ritual can be explained only by a reference to high Mass. For instance, the celebrant goes over to the north side of the altar to read the Gospel, because that is the side to which the deacon goes in procession at high Mass; he turns round always by the right, because at high Mass he should not turn his back to the deacon and so on. A sung Mass (missa Cantata) is a modern compromise. It is really a low Mass, since the essence of high Mass is not the music but the deacon and subdeacon. Only in churches which have no ordained person except one priest, and in which high Mass is thus impossible, is it allowed to celebrate the Mass (on Sundays and feasts) with most of the adornment borrowed from high Mass, with singing and (generally) with incense.

Revision of the Roman Missal[edit]
Pius XII began in earnest the work of revising the Roman Missal with a thorough revision of the rites of Holy Week, which, after an experimental period beginning in 1951, was made obligatory in 1955. The Mass that used to be said on Holy Thursday morning was moved to the evening, necessitating a change in the rule that previously had required fasting from midnight. The Good Friday service was moved to the afternoon, Holy Communion was no longer reserved for the priest alone (as before, hosts consecrated at the Holy Thursday Mass were used) and the priest no longer received part of the host in unconsecrated wine. The Easter Vigil service that used to be held in morning of Holy Saturday[73] was moved to the night that leads to Easter Sunday and many changes were made to the content.
In 1960, Pope John XXIII (1958–1963) ordered the suppression of the word "perfidis" ("unbelieving" i.e. not believing in Jesus), applied to the Jews, in the rites for Good Friday. He revised the rubrics to the Order of Mass and the Breviary. Two years later, in 1962, he made some more minor modifications on the occasion of publishing a new typical edition of the Roman Missal. This is the edition authorized for use by virtue of the Quattuor abhinc annos indult (see below, under Present status of the Tridentine Mass). Among the other changes he made and that were included in the 1962 Missal were: adding St. Joseph's name to the Roman Canon; eliminating the second Confiteor before Communion; suppressing 10 feasts, such as St. Peter's Chair in Rome (or, more accurately, combining both feasts of St Peter's Chair into one, as they originally had been); incorporating the abolition of 4 festal octaves and 9 vigils of feasts and other changes made by Pope Pius XII; and modifying rubrics especially for Solemn High Masses.[74] Among the names that disappeared from the Roman Missal was that of St Philomena: her liturgical celebration had never been admitted to the General Roman Calendar, but from 1920 it had been included (with an indication that the Mass was to be taken entirely from the common) in the section headed "Masses for some places", i.e. only those places for which it had been specially authorized; but her name had already in 1961 been ordered to be removed from all liturgical calendars.
On 4 December 1963, the Second Vatican Council decreed in Chapter II of its Constitution on the Sacred Liturgy Sacrosanctum Concilium:[75]

"[T]he rite of the Mass is to be revised ... the rites are to be simplified, due care being taken to preserve their substance. Parts which with the passage of time came to be duplicated, or were added with little advantage, are to be omitted. Other parts which suffered loss through accidents of history are to be restored to the vigor they had in the days of the holy Fathers, as may seem useful or necessary. The treasures of the Bible are to be opened up more lavishly so that a richer fare may be provided for the faithful at the table of God’s word ... A suitable place may be allotted to the vernacular in Masses which are celebrated with the people ... communion under both kinds may be granted when the bishops think fit...as, for instance, to the newly ordained in the Mass of their sacred ordination, to the newly professed in the Mass of their religious profession, and to the newly baptized in the Mass which follows their baptism..."

The instruction Inter Oecumenici of 26 September 1964 initiated the application to the Mass of the decisions that the Council had taken less than a year before. Permission was given for use, only in Mass celebrated with the people, of the vernacular language, especially in the Biblical readings and the reintroduced Prayers of the Faithful, but, "until the whole of the Ordinary of the Mass has been revised," in the chants (Kyrie, Gloria, Creed, Sanctus, Agnus Dei, and the entrance, offertory and communion antiphons) and in the parts that involved dialogue with the people, and in the Our Father, which the people could now recite entirely together with the priest. Most Episcopal Conferences quickly approved interim vernacular translations, generally different from country to country, and, after having them confirmed by the Holy See, published them in 1965. Other changes included the omission of Psalm 43 (42) at the start of Mass and the Last Gospel at the end, both of which Pope Pius V had first inserted into the Missal (having previously been private prayers said by the priest in the sacristy), and the Leonine Prayers of Pope Leo XIII. The Canon of the Mass, which continued to be recited silently, was kept in Latin.
Three years later, the instruction Tres abhinc annos[76] of 4 May 1967 gave permission for use of the vernacular even in the Canon of the Mass, and allowed it to be said audibly and even, in part, to be chanted; the vernacular could be used even at Mass celebrated without the people being present. Use of the maniple was made optional, and at three ceremonies at which the cope was previously the obligatory vestment the chasuble could be used instead.
Pope Paul VI continued implementation of the Council's directives, ordering with Apostolic Constitution Missale Romanum[77] of Holy Thursday, 3 April 1969, publication of a new official edition of the Roman Missal, which appeared (in Latin) in 1970.
Opposition to the latest revisions of the liturgy[edit]
Some Traditionalist Catholics reject to a greater or lesser extent the changes made since 1950 (see Traditionalist Catholic). None advocate returning to the original (1570) form of the liturgy, though some may perhaps wish a re-establishment of its form before Pius X's revision of the rubrics in 1911. Some do refuse to accept the 1955 changes in the liturgy of Palm Sunday and the Easter Triduum and in the liturgical calendar (see General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII), and instead use the General Roman Calendar as in 1954. Others accept the 1955 changes by Pius XII, but not those of Pope John XXIII. Others again, in accordance with the authorization granted by Pope Benedict XVI in Summorum Pontificum, use the Missal and calendar as it was in 1962.
Some of them argue that, unlike earlier reforms, the revision of 1969-1970 which replaced the Tridentine Mass with the Mass of Pope Paul VI represented a major break with the past. They consider that the content of the revised liturgy is, in Catholic terms, seriously deficient and defective; some hold that it is displeasing to God, and that no Catholic should attend it.[78]
When a preliminary text of two of the sections of the revised Missal was published in 1969, Archbishop Marcel Lefebvre gathered a group of twelve theologians, who, under his direction,[79] wrote a study of the text. They stated that it "represents, both as a whole and in its details, a striking departure from the Catholic theology of the Mass as it was formulated in Session 22 of the Council of Trent".[80] Cardinal Alfredo Ottaviani, a former Prefect of the Sacred Congregation for the Doctrine of the Faith, supported this study with a letter of 25 September 1969 to Pope Paul VI. Cardinal Antonio Bacci signed the same letter. The critical study became known as "the Ottaviani Intervention".[81] Cardinal Ottaviani subsequently stated in writing that he had not intended his letter to be made public, and that Pope Paul VI's doctrinal exposition, on 19 November[82] and 26 November 1969,[83] of the revised liturgy in its definitive form meant that "no one can be genuinely scandalised any more".[84] Jean Madiran, a critic of Vatican II[85] and founder-editor of the French journal Itinéraires, claimed that this letter was fraudulently presented to the elderly and already blind cardinal for his signature by his secretary, Monsignor (and future Cardinal) Gilberto Agustoni, and that Agustoni resigned shortly afterwards.[86] This allegation remains unproven, and Madiran himself was not an eyewitness of the alleged deception.[87]
In October 1967, a meeting of the Synod of Bishops had already given its opinion on a still earlier draft. Of the 187 members, 78 approved it as it stood, 62 approved it but suggested various modifications, 4 abstained, and 47 voted against.[88]
From the 1960s onwards, Western countries have experienced a drop in Mass attendance (in the United States, from 75% of Catholics attending in 1958 to 25% attending by 2002). These same countries saw a decline in seminary enrollments and in the number of priests (in the United States, from 1,575 ordinations in 1954 to 450 in 2002), and a general erosion of belief in the doctrines of the Catholic faith. Opponents of the revision of the Mass liturgy argue, citing opinion poll evidence in their support, that the revision contributed to this decline.[89] Others, pointing, among other considerations, to the fact that, globally, there are more priests and seminarians now than in previous years (in 1970, there were 72,991 major seminarians worldwide, in 2002, there were 113,199, an increase of 55%, at a time, however, when there was an increase of global population of 64%),[90] suggest that the apparent decline of Catholic practice in the West is due to the general influence of secularism and liberalism on Western societies rather than to developments within the Catholic Church.
Attitudes of Popes since the Second Vatican Council[edit]
Pope Paul VI[edit]
Following the introduction of the Mass of Paul VI in 1969-1970, the Holy See granted a significant number of permissions for the use of the former liturgy. For example, elderly priests were not required to switch to celebrating the new form. In England and Wales, occasional celebrations of the Tridentine Mass were allowed in virtue of what became known as the "Agatha Christie indult". However, there was no general worldwide legal framework allowing for the celebration of the rite. Following the rise of the Traditionalist Catholic movement in the 1970s, Pope Paul VI reportedly declined to liberalise its use further on the grounds that it had become a politically charged symbol associated with opposition to his policies.[91]
Pope John Paul II[edit]
In 1984, the Holy See sent a letter known as Quattuor abhinc annos to the presidents of the world's Episcopal Conferences. This document empowered diocesan bishops to authorise, on certain conditions, celebrations of the Tridentine Mass for priests and laypeople who requested them.[92] In 1988, following the excommunication of Archbishop Marcel Lefebvre and four bishops that he had consecrated, the Pope issued a further document, a motu proprio known as Ecclesia Dei,[93] which stated that "respect must everywhere be shown for the feelings of all those who are attached to the Latin liturgical tradition". The Pope urged bishops to give "a wide and generous application" to the provisions of Quattuor abhinc annos, and established the Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei to oversee relations between Rome and Traditionalist Catholics.
The Holy See itself granted authorisation to use the Tridentine Mass to a significant number of priests and priestly societies, such as the Priestly Fraternity of St. Peter, the Institute of Christ the King Sovereign Priest, and the Personal Apostolic Administration of Saint John Mary Vianney. Some diocesan bishops, however, declined to authorise celebrations within their dioceses, or did so only to a limited extent. In some cases, the difficulty was that those seeking the permission were hostile to the church authorities. Other refusals of permission were alleged to have stemmed from certain bishops' disapproval in principle of celebrations of the Tridentine liturgy.
Pope Benedict XVI[edit]
As a cardinal, Joseph Ratzinger was regarded as having a particular interest in the liturgy, and as being favourable towards the older rite of Mass. He famously criticized the erratic way in which, contrary to official policy, many priests celebrated the revised rite.[94]
In September 2006, the Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei established the Institute of the Good Shepherd, made up of former members of the Society of St. Pius X, in Bordeaux, France, with permission to use the Tridentine liturgy.[95] This step was met with some discontent from French clergy, and thirty priests wrote an open letter to the Pope.[96] Consistently with its previous policy, the Society of St Pius X rejected the move.[97]
Following repeated rumours that the use of the Tridentine Mass would be liberalised, the Pope issued a motu proprio called Summorum Pontificum on 7 July 2007,[98] together with an accompanying letter to the world's Bishops.[99] The Pope declared that "the Roman Missal promulgated by Paul VI is the ordinary expression of the lex orandi (law of prayer) of the Catholic Church of the Latin rite. Nevertheless, the Roman Missal promulgated by St. Pius V and reissued by St. John XXIII is to be considered as an extraordinary expression of that same 'Lex orandi'".[100] He further stated that "the 1962 Missal ... was never juridically abrogated".[101] He replaced with new rules those of Quattuor Abhinc Annos on use of the older form: essentially, authorization for using the 1962 form for parish Masses and those celebrated on public occasions such as a wedding is devolved from the local bishop to the priest in charge of a church, and any priest of the Latin Rite may use the 1962 Roman Missal in "Masses celebrated without the people", a term that does not exclude attendance by other worshippers, lay or clergy.[102] While requests by groups of Catholics wishing to use the Tridentine liturgy in parish Masses are to be dealt with by the parish priest (or the rector of the church) rather than, as before, by the local bishop, the Pope and Cardinal Darío Castrillón have stated that the bishops' authority is not thereby undermined.[103]
Present regulations[edit]
The regulations set out in Summorum Pontificum provide that:

In Masses celebrated "without the people", every Latin Rite priest may use either the 1962 Roman Missal or that of Paul VI except during the Easter Triduum (when Masses without participation by the people are no longer allowed). Celebrations of Mass in this form (formerly referred to as "private Masses") may, as before, be attended by laypeople who ask to be admitted.[104]
In parish Masses, where there is a stable group of laypeople who adhere to the earlier liturgical tradition, the parish priest should willingly accept their requests to be allowed to celebrate the Mass according to the 1962 Missal, and should ensure that their welfare harmonises with the ordinary pastoral care of the parish, under the guidance of the bishop in accordance with canon 392 of the Code of Canon Law, avoiding discord and favouring the unity of the Church.

Mass may be celebrated using the 1962 Missal on working days, while on Sundays and feast days one such celebration may be held.
For priests and laypeople who request it, the parish priest should allow celebrations of the 1962 form on special occasions such as weddings, funerals, and pilgrimages.


Communities belonging to institutes of consecrated life and societies of apostolic life which wish to use the 1962 Missal for conventual or "community" celebration in their oratories may do so.

With letter 13/2007 of 20 January 2010 the Pontifical Council Ecclesia Dei responded positively to a question whether a parish priest (pastor) or another priest may on his own initiative publicly celebrate the extraordinary form, along with the customary regular use of the new form, "so that the faithful, both young and old, can familiarize themselves with the old rites and benefit from their perceptible beauty and transcendence". Although the Council accompanied this response with the observation that a stable group of the faithful attached to the older form has a right to assist at Mass in the extraordinary form, a website that published the response interpreted it as not requiring the existence of such a stable group.[105]
Present practice[edit]
The publication of Summorum Pontificum has led to an increase in the number of regularly scheduled public Tridentine Masses. On 14 June 2008 Cardinal Darío Castrillón Hoyos told a London press conference that Pope Benedict wants every parish to offer both the old and the new forms for Sunday Mass.[106]
The cardinal said that the Vatican was preparing to instruct seminaries to teach all students the Tridentine form of the Roman Rite. The complexity of the rubrics makes it difficult for priests accustomed to the simpler modern form to celebrate the Tridentine form properly, and it is unclear how many have the required knowledge.
Some Traditionalist Catholic priests and organisations, holding that no official permission is required to use any form of the Tridentine Mass, celebrate it without regularizing their situation,[107] and sometimes using editions of the Roman Missal earlier than the 1962 edition approved in Summorum Pontificum.
In order to provide for priests who celebrate the Tridentine Mass, publishers have issued facsimiles or reprintings of old missals. There were two new printings of the 1962 Tridentine Missal in 2004: one, with the imprimatur of Bishop Fabian Bruskewitz of Lincoln, Nebraska, by Baronius Press in association with the Priestly Fraternity of St. Peter; the other by the Society of St. Pius X's publishing house, Angelus Press. There was a new printing of a facsimile 1962 Tridentine Altar Missal in 2008 by PCP books. Some other missals reproduced date from before 1955 and so do not have the revised Holy Week rites promulgated by Pope Pius XII. They are used by traditionalists who reject Pius XII's liturgical changes. As well as such altar missals for use by the priest, old hand missals for those attending Mass have been reproduced, including a St Bonaventure Press facsimile of a pre-1955 edition of the St Andrew's Missal.
See also[edit]

List of communities using the Tridentine Mass
Sacred language
Western Rite Orthodoxy

References[edit]


^ In this context, "typical edition" means the officially approved edition to whose text other printings are obliged to conform.
^ Angelus A. De Marco, O.F.M., "Liturgical Languages" in The American Ecclesiastical Review
^ Council of Trent, session of 4 December 1563
^ These regions included those in which a variant of the Roman Rite, called the Sarum Rite, was in use for more than the minimum required time. On a few recent occasions Roman Catholic prelates have used this variant as an extraordinary form of celebrating Mass. But, like most of the other regions and the orders concerned, the Sarum Rite areas have adopted the standard Roman Missal. The most important non-Roman liturgies that continue in use are the Ambrosian Rite, the Mozarabic Rite and the Carthusian Rite.
^ Code of Canon Law, canon 928
^ Instruction Redemptionis Sacramentum, 112
^ a b Letter of Pope Benedict XVI
^ Pope Benedict spoke of it instead as "an" extraordinary form. While in English, "extraordinary" often has laudatory overtones, its meaning in canon law is illustrated by its use with reference, for instance, to "the extraordinary minister of holy communion" (cf. canon 910 §2 of the Code of Canon Law).
^ Summorum Pontificum, article 10 speaks of celebrations "iuxta formam antiquiorem ritus romani" (in accordance with the older form of the Roman Rite).
^ Summorum Pontificum, articles 2 and 4
^ Summorum Pontificum, article 5
^ Krmpotic, M.D. (1908). "Dalmatia". Catholic encyclopedia. Retrieved March 25, 2008. The right to use the Glagolitic  [sic] language at Mass with the Roman Rite has prevailed for many centuries in all the south-western Balkan countries, and has been sanctioned by long practice and by many popes. 
^ Japundžić, Marko (1997). "The Croatian Glagolitic Heritage". Croatian Academy of America. Retrieved March 25, 2008. In 1886 it arrived to the Principality of Montenegro, followed by the Kingdom of Serbia in 1914, and the Republic of Czechoslovakia in 1920, but only for feast days of the main patron saints. The 1935 concordat with the Kingdom of Yugoslavia anticipated the introduction of the Slavic liturgy for all Croatian regions and throughout the entire state. 
^ "Inter Oecumenici, Sacred Congregation of Rites". 2007. Retrieved March 25, 2008. 
^ Congregation for Divine Worship and the Discipline of the Sacrament (2004-04-23). "Redemptionis Sacramentum". Retrieved 2008-03-25. 
^ Thompson, Damian (2008-06-14). "Latin mass to return to England and Wales". The Daily Telegraph. Retrieved 2008-06-17. 
^ Medieval Sourcebook; Pope reformulates Tridentine rite's prayer for Jews
^ Letter to the Bishops on the occasion of the publication of Summorum Pontificum
^ a b c "Quo primum". Retrieved 2008-03-25. We decided to entrust this work to learned men of our selection. They very carefully collated all their work with the ancient codices in Our Vatican Library and with reliable, preserved or emended codices from elsewhere. Besides this, these men consulted the works of ancient and approved authors concerning the same sacred rites; and thus they have restored the Missal itself to the original form and rite of the holy Fathers. When this work has been gone over numerous times and further emended, after serious study and reflection, We commanded that the finished product be printed and published. 
^ The Mass of Vatican II
^ The Mass of the Consilium and the Mass of the Ages
^ God Was Worshipped Here Today
^ Meditation before Holy Mass
^ Is the Novus Ordo Mass Actually the Indult Mass?
^ Priories of the Order of Saint John of Jerusalem
^ The Mass of the Apostles
^ Cf. Extract from a Letter to a Philippine Mayor
^ Braga - Capital de Distrito
^ "Just after the Council of Trent, the study 'of ancient manuscripts in the Vatican library and elsewhere', as Saint Pius V attests in the Apostolic Constitution Quo primum, helped greatly in the correction of the Roman Missal. Since then, however, other ancient sources have been discovered and published and liturgical formularies of the Eastern Church have been studied. Accordingly, many have had the desire for these doctrinal and spiritual riches not to be stored away in the dark, but to be put into use for the enlightenment of the mind of Christians and for the nurture of their spirit" (Apostolic Constitution Missale Romanum).
^ ISBN 88-209-2547-8; publisher: Libreria Editrice Vaticana; introduction and appendix by Manlio Sodi and Achille Maria Triacca
^ Introduction to the reproduction of the editio princeps, pages XXVI-XXX
^ Introduction to the reproduction of the editio princeps, pages XXI
^ S. Cecilia in Trastevere, main altar, presbytery, ciborium
^ Helen Dietz, "The Biblical Roots of Church Orientation" in Sacred Architecture, vol. 10. Retrieved 20 July 2013.
^ Solemn Papal Mass. See further The Tridentine Mass by Paul Cavendish
^ Apostolic Constitution Si quid est
^ Missal in Catholic Encyclopedia
^ Divino afflatu
^ Mysterii Paschalis and Ordorecitandi website
^ Richard Breyer, "St. Joseph & the Mass" in Catholic Digest
^ Pope Benedict XVI's motu proprio Summorum Pontificum
^ "The Missal published by Paul VI and then republished in two subsequent editions by John Paul II, obviously is and continues to be the normal Form – the Forma ordinaria – of the Eucharistic Liturgy" (Pope Benedict XVI's letter to the bishops on the occasion of the publication of Summorum Pontificum).
^ Their dislike of the 1962 Missal is expressed for instance in a list of differences prepared by Daniel Dolan.
^ "The Collaborative International Dictionary of English v.0.48". 1913. Retrieved 2008-03-25. 
^ Chapman, John (1908). "Didache". Retrieved 2008-03-25. Let no one eat or drink of the Eucharist with you except those who have been baptized in the name of the Lord. 
^ It is an additional ceremony, not part of the Mass itself, and in the Tridentine Missal is given only in an appendix.
^ Text of Mass of the Catechumens
^ Rubrics V
^ Text in Latin and English
^ Summorum Pontificum, article 6
^ The Rubrics of the Missale Romanum 1962: VI. The Epistle, the Gradual, and everything else up to the Offertory
^ General Instruction of the Roman Missal, 66
^ Text of Mass of the Faithful
^  Herbermann, Charles, ed. (1913). "Pope St. Gregory I ("the Great")". Catholic Encyclopedia. New York: Robert Appleton Company. 
^ Santus
^ Mass of the Faithful - The Canon
^ Diptych
^ Definition of "oblation"
^ "Ab eadem parte Epistolae paretur cereus ad elevationem Sacramenti accendendus" (Rubricae generales Missalis, XX)
^ Mass of the Faithful - Closing Prayers
^ In pre-1962 editions of the Roman Missal, only the first four words, "Domine, non sum dignus", were to be said in the slightly audible voice.
^ Ritus servandus, X, 6 of the 1962 Missal
^ Latin Dictionary
^ Manlio Sodi, Achille Maria Triacca (editors), Missale Romanum: Editio Princeps (1570) (Libreria Editrice Vaticana 1988 ISBN 978-88-209-2547-5), pp. 27–36
^ Orationes ante Missam
^ Douay-Rheims Version
^ Orationes post Missam
^ Allocution Indictam ante of 30 June 1930, in Acta Apostolicae Sedis 22 (1930), page 301
^ Instruction Inter Oecumenici, 48 j
^ Pope St. Pius X said: "If you wish to hear Mass as it should be heard, you must follow with eye, heart, and mouth all that happens at the altar. Further, you must pray with the Priest the holy words said by him in the Name of Christ and which Christ says by him" (The Daily Missal and Liturgical Manual from the Editio Typica of the Roman Missal and Breviary, 1962, Baronius Press, London, 2004, p. 897).
^ They gave responses to "Kyrie eleison", "Dominus vobiscum", "Per omnia saecula saeculorum", the Gospel reading, the "Orate Fratres", "Sursum Corda", "Gratias agamus Domino Deo nostro", the conclusion of the Lord's Prayer, the "Pax Domini sit semper vobiscum" and the "Ite Missa est"
^  Herbermann, Charles, ed. (1913). "Liturgy of the Mass". Catholic Encyclopedia. New York: Robert Appleton Company. 
^ Conventual Mass (Mass of a religious community) on a Vigil, such as that of Easter, was celebrated after None, at which point the fast could be broken (see Rubricae generalis Missalis, XV, 2). Though None was in origin an afternoon prayer, it was then celebrated in the morning. Similarly, Lauds, which was originally a morning prayer, was commonly celebrated in choir on the evening before, as in the office of Tenebrae. "Private Masses" (Masses celebrated by a priest without a congregation) could, even on days of fast, be celebrated at any hour from dawn to noon (see Rubricae generalis Missalis, XV, 1). Most celebrations of the Easter Vigil were in the form of private Masses, since concelebration was not allowed.
^ The Pius X and John XXIII Missals Compared
^ Constitution on the Sacred Liturgy
^ Tres abhinc annos
^ Missale Romanum
^ Pope Benedict XVI, who has several times deplored departures on private initiative from the rite of Mass established in the 1970 revision of the Roman Missal has declared this contention unfounded, writing: "There is no contradiction between the two editions of the Roman Missal. In the history of the liturgy there is growth and progress, but no rupture. ... Needless to say, in order to experience full communion, the priests of the communities adhering to the former usage cannot, as a matter of principle, exclude celebrating according to the new books. The total exclusion of the new rite would not in fact be consistent with the recognition of its value and holiness" (Letter to the Bishops on the occasion of the publication of the Apostolic Letter motu proprio data Summorum Pontificum).
^ A Short History of the SSPX
^ Ottaviani letter
^ Ottaviani, Alfredo; Bacci, Antonio; Group of Roman Theologians. "The Ottaviani Intervention: A Critical Study of the New Mass". Catholic Tradition. Retrieved 21 November 2016. 
^ Talk on 19 November 1969
^ Talk on 26 November 1969
^ Quotation from Documentation Catholique, 1970; the full text of the letter in an English translation is given in The New "Ordo Missæ": A battle on two fronts
^ Je suis un témoin à charge contre mon temps
^ The Ottaviani Intervention - Part I, by Michael Davies
^ The Ottaviani Intervention - Part 1, by Michael Davies
^ "Special Supplement: The Ottaviani Intervention: A Critical Study of the Novus Ordo Missae". Triumph. 4 (12): 22A–22L. December 1969. Quoted in THE GREAT SACRILEGE by Fr. James F. Wathen 
^ Jones, Kenneth C. (January 2003). Index of Leading Catholic Indicators: The Church since Vatican II. Oriens Publishing. ISBN 0-9728688-0-1
^ Cf. World population
^ Collins, Roger (2009). Keepers of the Keys of Heaven: A History of the Papacy. Basic Books. pp. 488–489. ISBN 978-0-465-01195-7. 
^ English translation of Quattuor abhinc annos
^ Ecclesia Dei
^ Preface to the French edition of Die Reform der Römischen Liturgie by Klaus Gamber; partial English translation; cf. The Spirit of the Liturgy, San Francisco: Ignatius Press, 2000; and Looking Again at the Question of the Liturgy with Cardinal Ratzinger: Proceedings of the July 2001 Fontgombault Liturgical Conference, Farnborough, Hampshire: St. Michael's Abbey Press, 2002. For a Vatican condemnation of aberrant liturgical practices, see Redemptionis Sacramentum
^ Brian Mershon, "New French traditionalist priestly society founded," The Wanderer, September 18, 2006.
^ "French clerics rebel on Latin Mass," The Conservative Voice, October 29, 2006
^ Communiqué de la Fraternité Sacerdotale Saint Pie X
^ Text of the motu proprio Summorum Pontificum in Latin and English
^ Benedict XVI (2007-07-07). "Letter of His Holiness Benedict XVI to the Bishops on the occasion of the publication of the Apostolic Letter "motu proprio data" Summorum Pontificum on the use of the Roman liturgy prior to the reform of 1970". Libreria Editrice Vaticana. Retrieved 2008-03-24. 
^ Article 1 of the motu proprio. In his letter to the Bishops he said: "It is not appropriate to speak of these two versions of the Roman Missal as if they were 'two Rites'. Rather, it is a matter of a twofold use of one and the same rite."
^ Similarly, Clement VIII did not juridically abrogate the Missal of Pius V, nor did the other Popes who issued later typical editions of the Roman Missal before that of Paul VI (Urban VIII, Leo XIII, Benedict XV, John XXIII) juridically abrogate the previous editions. Even Pius V juridically abolished only those variants of the Roman Rite that had less than 200 years' antiquity.
^ Indeed, "Mass should not be celebrated without a minister or at least one of the faithful, except for a just and reasonable cause" (General Instruction of the Roman Missal, 254). Masses celebrated without the people were once called "private Masses", a term that fell out of favour in the mid-twentieth century: the 1960 Codex Rubricarum, which preceded the Second Vatican Council, declared: "The most sacred Sacrifice of the Mass celebrated according to the rites and regulations is an act of public worship offered to God in the name of Christ and the Church. Therefore, the term 'private Mass' should be avoided" (Rubricae Generales Missalis Romani, 269). Cf. Review of Mass without a Congregation: A Sign of Unity or Division?, by Fr Marian Szablewski CR.
^ In the letter to bishops by which he accompanied the motu proprio the Pope told them that the new regulations "do not in any way lessen your own authority and responsibility, either for the liturgy or for the pastoral care of your faithful." Cardinal Castrillón has stated: "The Pope has not changed the Code of Canon Law. The bishop is the moderator of the liturgy in his own diocese. But the Apostolic See is entitled to shape the sacred liturgy of the universal Church. And a bishop must act in harmony with the Apostolic See and must guarantee the rights of every believer, including that of being able to attend the mass of Saint Pius V, as extraordinary form of the rite" (30Days, June/July 2007).
^ Article 4 of the motu proprio
^ New Liturgical Movement: Important Clarifications
^ "Pope says old-rite Latin Mass should be on offer in every Catholic parish"
^ Article 5 §4 of the motu proprio says priests who use the Missal of Blessed John XXIII must not be juridically impeded.


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Tridentine Mass.


Full texts of Tridentine Roman Missals[edit]

1962 typical edition of the Roman Missal Accurately reproduced, but only in black and white. 78 Mb.
1920 typical edition of the Roman Missal, with feasts updated to the late 1920s
Missale Romanum published by Pustet, 1894 (1884 typical edition)
Roman Missal, published by Pustet, 1862 (1634 typical edition, updated to 1862)
Missale Romanum, 1577, (1570 typical edition)

Texts of parts of the Tridentine Missal (post-1604)[edit]

English translation of the Ritus servandus in celebratione Missae (The 1962 Missal left this text unaltered, but completely revised the Rubricae generales Missalis Romani. The English text, titled "Rubrics of the Missale Romanum 1962", is in fact a translation of the Ritus servandus, not of the Rubricae generales.)
Ordinary of the 1962 Roman Missal with MP3 Audio of Latin Text (Latin text with English translation)
Ordinary of the Mass, with English translation at sacred-texts.com (The text is presented as that of the 1962 edition, but the spelling of the Latin, e.g. "coelum", "quotidianum", use of the letter J, shows that, apart from the insertion of "sed et beati Ioseph eiusdem Virginis Sponsi" in the Canon of the Mass, it is really the 1920 text, identical with the 1962 text except for spelling and this insertion)
Ordinary of the Mass, with English translation (This text too is presented as that of the 1962 edition, but is the same hybrid text as in the previous site)
Term-by-term Ordinary of the Mass, with intratext grammatical notes and with English translation (The 1920 text, with "sed et beati Ioseph eiusdem Virginis Sponsi" inserted into the Canon)
An English translation of the Ordinary of the 1920/1962 Missals (the translation of the phrase "sed et beati Ioseph, eiusdem Virginis Sponsi", which marks a difference between the 1962 edition and the previous editions, is given between braces), side-by-side with the 1973 ICEL translation of the Ordinary of the 1970 Missal
F. X. Lasance, The New Roman Missal (1942) (a hand missal for the faithful)
The Roman Missal adapted to the use of the laity from the Missale Romanum incorporating rubrical changes by Pope St. Pius X in 1913
A Manual of Prayers for the Catholic Laity: The Official Prayerbook of the Catholic Church (1896) Official pew missalette adopted for American Catholics by the Third Plenary Council of Baltimore.
The Catholic's Vade Mecum: A Select Manual of Prayers for Daily Use An English Catholic prayer book and missalette published in 1850.
Roman Missal for the Use of the Laity in English and partly in Latin, published in London in 1806. Its Canon of the Mass includes the mention, by name, of the king.
The Saint John Fisher Missale Text and plainchant of the Order of Mass and other parts of the 1962 Roman Missal (e.g., propers of Sundays and First and Second Class feasts), interpolated with elements removed from the Roman Missal after 1900 but still used in many places, and with material from sources such as the pre-1570 English Sarum Missal, material that was thus never part of the Missal authorized by Pope Pius V (see Introduction).

History[edit]

Quo primum, promulgating the 1570 Roman Missal (Pope Pius V)
Cum santissimum, promulgating the 1604 Roman Missal (Pope Clement VIII)
Si quid est, promulgating the 1634 Roman Missal (Pope Urban VIII)
Apostolic Constitution Missale Romanum, promulgating the 1970 Roman Missal (Pope Paul VI)
Encyclical Mediator Dei
Liturgy of the Mass (article in Catholic Encyclopedia)
History of the 1570 Missale Romanum
Woods, Thomas E., Sacred Then and Sacred Now: The Return of the Old Latin Mass (Roman Catholic Books 2008 ISBN 978-0-9793540-2-1)
Hull, Geoffrey, The Banished Heart: Origins of Heteropraxis in the Catholic Church, 1995, rpt. T&T Clark/Continuum, London 2010. ISBN 9780567442208
Aillet, Marc, The old Mass and the new : explaining the motu proprio Summorum Pontificum of Pope Benedict XVI (Ignatius Press 2010 ISBN 978-1-58617-362-3)

Comparison with non-Roman Western rites and uses[edit]

Tridentine Ordinary of the Mass compared with the Lyonese, Bragan, Dominican, Carthusian, Carmelite, Ambrosian and Mozarabic
The ancient liturgy of the Church of England, according to the uses of Sarum, Bangor, York & Hereford and the modern Roman liturgy arranged in parallel columns Tridentine Ordinary of the Mass and Canon compared with the Medieval English uses of Sarum, Bangor, York and Hereford.

Media[edit]

Multimedia tutorial on the Tridentine Mass: Photos, Videos, and Audio
Audio and Explanation of Sacred Music - CatholicLatinMass.org
Audio files - Text of the Mass Latin Mass Society of Ireland.
Video of a 1941 Solemn High Mass narrated by Fulton Sheen
Video of a Missa Cantata, or sung Low Mass, offered on the Last Sunday after Pentecost at the Roman Catholic Parish of St. Nicholas of Chardonnet in Paris, France.
Video of a Votive Mass of the Blessed Virgin Mary offered as a Missa Cantata, or sung Low Mass, at the Roman Catholic Priory of St. Pius X in Warsaw, Poland.
Video of a Solemn High Mass celebrated at the SSPX Seminary of St. Cure d'Ars, Flavigny, France
Video of a Traditional Mass for Christmas, held at St. Roch's in West Bangor, Pa.
Another video of a Low Mass
Photographs of a Traditional (Tridentine) Mass
Forum dedicated to the Tridentine Mass
A Modern Tridentine Mass Wedding
The Extraordinary Form of the Mass - Explained (German)
Priests for the 3rd millennium (German)

Directories of Latin Masses[edit]

Ecclesia Dei's Latin Mass Directory, United States and Canada
WikkiMissa, world directory of Tridentine Mass
List of Tridentine Rite Masses in the US
List of Tridentine Rite Masses Worldwide







v
t
e


Tridentine Mass of the Catholic Church




Including the extraordinary form of the Roman Rite (1962)



Types



Chapter and conventual
Dialogue Mass
Low (Missa Cantata) and High Mass (Solemn)
Missa Sicca
Pontifical

Papal


Ritual Masses

Coronation (Papal)
Missa pro Defunctis
Nuptial


sine populo
Votive

Red







Order



Pre-Mass
Vesting prayers
Asperges me

Vidi aquam in Eastertide


Processional hymn


Mass of the Catechumens
Iudica me
Confiteor

mea culpa


Introit
Kyrie
Gloria in excelsis Deo
Collect
Lection
Gradual
Alleluia or Tract
Sequentia
Gospel
Homily


Mass of the Faithful
Credo

Niceno-Constantinopolitan Creed


Offertory

Lavabo
Orate fratres
Secret


Preface

Sursum corda
Sanctus
Hosanna


Roman Canon

oblation
epiclesis
Words of Institution
anamnesis
elevation
doxology


Pater Noster

embolism
doxology


Pax
Agnus Dei

Dona nobis pacem


Fraction
Holy Communion

Communion antiphon


Ablutions
Postcommunio
Dismissal

Ite, missa est or Benedicamus Domino


Last Gospel


Post-Mass
Leonine prayers
Recessional hymn


For funeral Mass
Dies Irae

Pie Iesu


Libera Me
Requiescant in pace
Absolution of the dead
In paradisum
De profundis





Participants



Acolyte

altar server


Bishop
Boat boy
Cantor or schola
Crucifer
Deacon
Laity
Lector
Master of ceremonies
Porter
Priest
Subdeacon





Altar



Altar cards
Altar crucifix
Altar rails
Ambo
Antependium
Credence table
Kneeler
Lavabo
Misericord
Piscina
Sacristy
Tabernacle





Altar cloths



Altar linens
Antependium
Burse
Chalice veil
Corporal
Pall
Purificator





Illumination



Altar candle
Altar candlestick
Paschal candle
Sanctuary lamp
Triple candlestick





Liturgical
objects



Altar bell
Aspergillum
Chalice
Ciborium
Collection basket
Cruet
Flabellum
Funghellino
Holy water
Incense

use


Manuterge
Paten
Processional cross
Pyx
Sacramental bread

wafer


Sacramental wine (or must)
Thurible
Water





Literature



Cæremoniale Episcoporum
Missale Romanum
Pontificale Romanum
Rituale Romanum





Vestments
(Pontifical/Papal)



Alb
Amice
Chasuble
Cincture
Cope
Crosier
Dalmatic
Episcopal gloves
Ecclesiastical ring
Episcopal sandals
Falda
Humeral veil
Liturgical colours
Mitre
Pallium
Papal fanon
Papal tiara
Pectoral cross
Stole
Sub-cinctorium
Superhumerale
Surplice
Tunicle
Vimpa





Music



Antiphon
Graduale Romanum
Gregorian chant
Hymn
Kyriale Romanum
Liber Usualis
Music for the Requiem Mass
Organ

voluntary


Organum
Polyphony
Reciting tone

Accentus
Recto tono


Tonary

Gregorian Antiphonary







Liturgical year
Calendar
(1954/1955/1960)



Advent
Christmastide
Epiphanytide
Septuagesima
Lent
Passiontide
Holy Week

Paschal Triduum


Eastertide
Ascensiontide
After Pentecost


Calendar of saints
Holy day of obligation
Moveable feast
Octaves


Ranking of liturgical days: Solemnity
Memorial
Commemoration
Feria





Discipline



Church etiquette
Closed communion
Communion and the developmentally disabled
Communion under both kinds
Denial of Communion

Canon 915


Eucharistic fast
First Communion
Genuflection
Headcover
Host desecration
Infant communion
Reserved sacrament
Sign of the Cross
Thanksgiving after Communion
Viaticum





Theology



Blessed Sacrament
Body and Blood of Christ
Corpus Christi (feast)
Crucifixion of Jesus and substitutionary atonement
Epiousios
Eucharistic miracle
Grace ex opere operato
In persona Christi
Historical roots of Catholic Eucharistic theology
Koinonia
Last Supper
Origin of the Eucharist
Priesthood of Melchizedek
Pro multis
Real presence
Transubstantiation





Concepts



Ad orientem
Canon law
Code of Rubrics
Concelebration
Dominus vobiscum
Ecclesiastical Latin
Good Friday prayer for the Jews
Intercession of saints
Ordinary & propers (common)
Oremus
Sunday

Lord's Day


Text and rubrics of the Roman Canon
Vulgate (Sixto-Clementine)

Latin Psalters







Related



Agape feast
Alternatim
Anaphora
Anima Christi
Aspersion
Catholic liturgy
Coetus Internationalis Patrum
Communities using the Tridentine Mass

Indult Catholic
traditionalist Catholic


Congregation for Divine Worship
Council of Trent
Deutsche Singmesse
Divine Office

Canonical hours
Choir dress
Roman Breviary


Eucharistic adoration & benediction

Holy Hour
Forty Hours' Devotion


Fasting and abstinence in the Roman Catholic Church
Fourth Council of the Lateran
French Organ Mass
Gospel Book
History of the Roman Canon
Latin liturgical rites
Latin Mass
Lex orandi, lex credendi
Litany
Liturgical Movement
Liturgical reforms of Pope Pius XII
Mass of Paul VI
Missal
Plenary indulgence
Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei
Pope Pius V
Preces
Pre-Tridentine Mass
Quattuor abhinc annos
Quo primum
Roman Catholic theology
Sacramentary
Sacraments of the Catholic Church
Spoon (liturgy)
Summorum Pontificum
Tra le sollecitudini
Western Rite Orthodoxy








 Catholicism portal










Links to related articles











v
t
e


Sacraments, rites, and liturgies of the Catholic Church



Sacraments



Baptism
Confirmation
Eucharist
Penance
Anointing of the Sick
Holy Orders
Matrimony








Mass



Low Mass
Missa Cantata
Solemn Mass
Pontifical High Mass
Papal Mass





Canonical
liturgical hours



Matins (nighttime)
Lauds (early morning)
Prime (first hour of daylight)
Terce (third hour)
Sext (noon)
Nones (ninth hour)
Vespers (sunset evening)
Compline (end of the day)





Other liturgical services



Asperges
Benediction of the Blessed Sacrament
Exorcism
Funeral

Requiem


Liturgy of the Hours





Liturgical literature



Antiphonary
Book of hours
Breviary
Gospel Book
Gradual
Lectionary
Martyrology
Psalter
Roman Missal
Roman Ritual
Sacramentary





Rites




Latin



Ambrosian Rite
Rite of Braga
Roman Rite

Mass of Paul VI
Extraordinary form
Anglican Use
Zaire Use







Eastern



Alexandrian Rite
Armenian Rite
Antiochene Rite
Byzantine Rite
East Syrian Rite
Mozarabic Rite
West Syrian Rite: Malankara Rite





Orders



Benedictine Rite
Carmelite Rite
Carthusian Rite
Cistercian Rite
Dominican Rite
Norbertine Rite





Defunct rites
and liturgies



African Rite
Aquileian Rite
Celtic Rite
Durham Rite
Gallican Rite
Use of Hereford
Missa Nautica
Missa Sicca
Missa Venatoria
Pre-Tridentine Mass
Use of York
Sarum Rite











 Catholicism portal












v
t
e


History of the Roman Rite Mass



Forms



Pre-Tridentine Mass
Tridentine Mass (Extraordinary form)
Mass of Paul VI (Ordinary form)








Calendars



Tridentine Calendar
General Roman Calendar of 1954
General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII
General Roman Calendar of 1960
General Roman Calendar (current)








 Catholicism portal












v
t
e


Traditionalist Catholicism




Movements advocating Catholic traditions less emphasised or abolished by the Second Vatican Council (1962–1965)



Groups and
movements





Part of the Roman Curia




Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei






In full communion
with the Holy See




Priestly Fraternity of St. Peter
Institute of Christ the King Sovereign Priest
Latin Mass Society of England and Wales
Personal Apostolic Administration of Saint John Mary Vianney
Institute of the Good Shepherd
Sons of the Most Holy Redeemer
Slaves of the Immaculate Heart of Mary
Fraternity of Saint Vincent Ferrer
Canons Regular of Saint John Cantius
Canons Regular of the New Jerusalem
Fœderatio Internationalis Juventutem
Fœderatio Internationalis Una Voce
Indult Catholics






Canonically irregular




Fraternité Notre-Dame
Society of Saint Pius X
SSPX Resistance






Sedevacantist




Conclavism
Sedeprivationism
Siri thesis
Congregation of Mary Immaculate Queen
Istituto Mater Boni Consilii
Society of St. Pius V








Doctrines,
rites and issues



Second Vatican Council
Modernism
Pascendi dominici gregis
Tridentine Mass
Mass of Paul VI
Summorum Pontificum
Ecumenism
Freedom of religion
Syllabus of Errors
Dignitatis humanae
Extra Ecclesiam nulla salus
"Papal Oath"





Prominent
people



Pope Pius X
Pope Pius XII
Pope Benedict XVI
Archbishop Marcel Lefebvre
Bishop Bernard Fellay
Bishop Richard Williamson
Bishop Antônio de Castro Mayer
Archbishop Ngô Đình Thục
Bishop Daniel Dolan
Fr. Gommar DePauw
Fr. Leonard Feeney
Joaquín Sáenz y Arriaga
Michael Davies








 Catholicism portal












v
t
e


Structure of the Mass of the Roman Rite of the Catholic Church



Forms



Pre-Tridentine Mass
Tridentine Mass

Extraordinary form


Mass of Paul VI





Types



Low Mass
Missa Cantata
Solemn Mass
Pontifical High Mass
Papal Mass
Ritual Masses

Blue Mass
Chapter and Conventual Mass
Coronation Mass
Nuptial Mass
Red Mass
Requiem Mass


sine populo
Votive Mass





Order of Mass





Pre-Mass




Vesting prayers in the sacristy
Asperges me

Vidi aquam in Eastertide








Liturgy of
the Word




Sign of the Cross
Psalm 43
Entrance Antiphon
Penitential Rite

Confiteor / Kyrie


Gloria
Dominus vobiscum
Collect

Oremus


First Reading
Responsorial Psalm or Gradual
Epistle
Alleluia

Gospel verse / sequence


Gospel
Homily
Credo

Niceno-Constantinopolitan Creed or Apostles' Creed


General Intercessions






Liturgy of
the Eucharist




Offertory

Orate fratres / prayer over the gifts


Preface

Sursum corda / Sanctus / Hosanna


Eucharistic Prayer/Canon of the Mass

oblation / epiclesis / Words of Institution / elevation / anamnesis
texts & rubrics
Roman Canon

History


Eucharistic Prayer II


Memorial Acclamation
Lord's Prayer

embolism / doxology


Pax
Sign of peace
Agnus Dei
Fraction
Holy Communion

Communion antiphon


Ablutions
Postcommunion
Dismissal

Ite, missa est / Benedicamus Domino


Last Gospel






Post-Mass




Leonine Prayers
Recessional hymn








Participants



Acolyte
Altar server

female


Bishop
Boat boy
Cantor
Choir
Crucifer
Deacon
Extraordinary minister of Holy Communion
Laity

Eucharistic Congress


Lector
Priest
Subdeacon
Usher





Parts of the
Sanctuary / Altar



Altar crucifix
Altar rails
Ambo
Communion bench
Credence table
Kneeler
Lavabo
Misericord
Piscina
Tabernacle





Altar cloths



Altar linens
Antependium
Burse
Chalice veil
Corporal
Lavabo towel
Pall
Purificator





Candles and lamps



Altar candle
Altar candlestick
Paschal candle
Sanctuary lamp
Triple candlestick
Votive candle





Liturgical objects



Altar bell
Aspergillum
Censer
Chalice
Ciborium
Collection basket
Cruet
Flabellum
Funghellino
Holy water
Incense

use


Manuterge
Paten
Processional cross
Pyx
Sacramental bread

wafer


Sacramental wine (or must)
Thurible
Water





Liturgical books
of the Roman Rite



Ceremonial of Bishops
Evangeliary

Gospel Book


Graduale
Lectionary
Roman Missal





Vestments



Alb
Amice
Chasuble
Dalmatic
Episcopal sandals
Liturgical colours
Headcover
Humeral veil
Pallium
Pontifical
Stole
Surplice
Tunicle
Vimpa





Liturgical year
(Roman Calendar)



Advent
Christmastide
Ordinary Time
Septuagesima
Lent
Passiontide
Holy Week

Paschal Triduum


Eastertide
Ascensiontide





Eucharistic
discipline



Abstemius
Anima Christi
Concelebration
Church etiquette
Closed communion
Communion and the developmentally disabled
Communion under both kinds
Denial of Communion

Canon 915


Eucharistic fast
First Communion
Frequent Communion
Genuflection
Host desecration
Infant communion
Intinction
Reserved sacrament
Thanksgiving after Communion
Viaticum





Eucharistic
theology



Body and Blood of Christ
Corpus Christi (feast)
Crucifixion of Jesus and substitutionary atonement
Epiousios
Grace ex opere operato
In persona Christi
Historical roots of Catholic Eucharistic theology
Koinonia
Last Supper
Mirae caritatis
Mysterium fidei (encyclical)
Origin of the Eucharist
Real presence
Transubstantiation
Year of the Eucharist
Stercoranism





Regulations
and concepts



Ad orientem & versus populum
Calendar of saints
Canon law
Code of Rubrics
Commemoration
Ecclesiastical Latin
General Instruction of the Roman Missal
Holy day of obligation
Intercession of saints
Ordinary & propers
Pro multis
Sunday

Lord's Day


Vernacular





Related



Agape feast
Catholic liturgy
Christian prayer

effects of prayer


Congregation for Divine Worship
Council of Trent
Ecclesia de Eucharistia
Eucharistic adoration & benediction

Dominicae Cenae / Holy Hour


Eucharistic miracle
Fermentum
Fourth Council of the Lateran
Gelineau psalmody
Gregorian chant
History of the Roman Canon
Lex orandi, lex credendi
Liturgical Movement
Liturgical reforms of Pope Pius XII
Mediator Dei
Missale Romanum (apostolic constitution)
Pope Paul VI
Catholic theology
Sacraments of the Catholic Church
Second Vatican Council

Sacrosanctum Concilium


Tridentine Mass
Summorum Pontificum
Tra le sollecitudini








 Catholicism portal















 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Tridentine_Mass&oldid=792722104"					
Categories: Tridentine MassCatholic liturgical ritesCatholic termsHidden categories: Articles incorporating a citation from the 1913 Catholic Encyclopedia with Wikisource referenceArticles containing Latin-language text 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БеларускаяCatalàČeštinaDeutschEspañolEsperantoFrançaisGaeilge한국어HrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaItalianoKiswahiliNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 28 July 2017, at 06:51.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Tridentine Mass - Wikipedia






















 






Tridentine Mass

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the forms of the Mass liturgy prior to 1570, see Pre-Tridentine Mass.




Elevation of the chalice after the consecration during a Solemn Mass


The Tridentine Mass, now officially often referred to as the Extraordinary Form of the Roman Rite ('Extraordinary Form for short; Latin: forma extraordinaria), is the Roman Rite Mass which appears in typical editions of the Roman Missal published from 1570 to 1962.[1] The most widely used Mass liturgy in the world until the introduction of the Mass of Paul VI in 1969, it is celebrated in ecclesiastical Latin.[2]
"Tridentine" is derived from the Latin Tridentinus, "related to the city of Tridentum" (modern-day Trent, Italy). In response to a decision of the Council of Trent,[3] Pope Pius V promulgated the 1570 Roman Missal, making it mandatory throughout the Latin Church, except in places and religious orders with missals from before 1370.[4] Despite being often described as "the (Traditional) Latin Mass", the Mass of Paul VI (the Novus Ordo Missae) that replaced it as the Ordinary Form of the Roman Rite has its official text in Latin and is sometimes celebrated in that language.[5][6]
In 2007, Pope Benedict XVI issued the motu proprio Summorum Pontificum, accompanied by a letter to the world's bishops authorizing use of the Tridentine Mass and Ritual for competent priests. The Pope stated that the 1962 edition of the Roman Missal is to be considered an "extraordinary form" (forma extraordinaria)[7] of the Roman Rite, of which the 1970 Mass of Paul VI is the ordinary, normal or standard form. Since that is the only authorized extraordinary form, some refer to the 1962 Tridentine Mass as "the extraordinary form" of the Mass.[8] The 1962 Tridentine Mass is sometimes referred to as the "usus antiquior" (older use) or "forma antiquior" (older form),[9] to differentiate it from the Mass of Paul VI, again in the sense of being the only one of the older forms for which authorization has been granted.
In Masses celebrated without the people, Latin Rite Catholic priests are free to use either the 1962 Tridentine missal or the Ordinary Form missal. These Masses "may—observing all the norms of law—also be attended by faithful who, of their own free will, ask to be admitted".[10] Permission to use the Tridentine Mass as parish liturgies may be given by the pastor or rector.[11]



Contents


1 Language
2 Terminology
3 Pope St. Pius V's revision of the liturgy
4 Historical variations

4.1 Typical editions of the Roman Missal
4.2 1962 Missal


5 Liturgical structure

5.1 Before Mass
5.2 Mass of the Catechumens

5.2.1 Prayers at the foot of the altar
5.2.2 Priest at the altar
5.2.3 Instruction


5.3 Mass of the Faithful

5.3.1 Offertory
5.3.2 Consecration
5.3.3 Elevation candle
5.3.4 Communion
5.3.5 Conclusion


5.4 Prayers of the priest before and after Mass
5.5 Leonine Prayers
5.6 Participation by the people


6 Different levels of celebration
7 Revision of the Roman Missal

7.1 Opposition to the latest revisions of the liturgy


8 Attitudes of Popes since the Second Vatican Council

8.1 Pope Paul VI
8.2 Pope John Paul II
8.3 Pope Benedict XVI


9 Present regulations
10 Present practice
11 See also
12 References
13 External links

13.1 Full texts of Tridentine Roman Missals
13.2 Texts of parts of the Tridentine Missal (post-1604)
13.3 History
13.4 Comparison with non-Roman Western rites and uses
13.5 Media
13.6 Directories of Latin Masses





Language[edit]
In most countries, the language used for celebrating the Tridentine Mass was (and is) Latin. However, in Dalmatia and parts of Istria in Croatia, the liturgy was celebrated in Church Slavonic, and authorisation for use of this language was extended to some other Slavic regions between 1886 and 1935.[12][13]
After the publication of the 1962 edition of the Roman Missal, the 1964 Instruction on implementing the Constitution on Sacred Liturgy of the Second Vatican Council laid down that "normally the epistle and gospel from the Mass of the day shall be read in the vernacular". Episcopal conferences were to decide, with the consent of the Holy See, what other parts, if any, of the Mass were to be celebrated in the vernacular.[14]
Outside the Roman Catholic Church, the vernacular language was introduced into the celebration of the Tridentine Mass by some Old Catholics and Anglo-Catholics with the introduction of the English Missal.
Some Western Rite Orthodox Christians, particularly in the Antiochian Orthodox Archdiocese of North America, use the Tridentine Mass in the vernacular with minor alterations under the title of the "Divine Liturgy of St. Gregory".
Most Old Catholics use the Tridentine Mass, either in the vernacular or in Latin.
Terminology[edit]




A pre-1969 Roman Rite high altar decorated with reredos and fixed on a three step platform, at which the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar are said. Leaning against the Tabernacle and two of the candlesticks are altar cards to remind the celebrant of the words when he is away from the missal


The Catholic Church uses the term extraordinary form of the Roman Rite Mass among other terms.[7] The most widespread term for the rite, other than "Tridentine Mass", is "Latin Mass". Likewise, the ordinary form of the Roman Rite Mass was promulgated in Latin and can be celebrated in that language.[15]
Occasionally the term "Gregorian Rite" is used when talking about the Tridentine Mass,[16][discuss] as is, more frequently, "Tridentine Rite".[17] Pope Benedict XVI declared it inappropriate to speak of the versions of the Roman Missal of before and after 1970 as if they were two rites. Rather, he said, it is a matter of a twofold use of one and the same rite.[18]
Traditionalist Catholics, whose best-known characteristic is an attachment to the Tridentine Mass, frequently refer to it as the "Traditional Mass" or the "Traditional Latin Mass". They describe as a "codifying" of the form of the Mass the preparation of Pius V's edition of the Roman Missal, of which he said that the experts to whom he had entrusted the work collated the existing text with ancient manuscripts and writings, restored it to "the original form and rite of the holy Fathers" and further emended it.[19] To distinguish this form of Mass from the Mass of Paul VI, traditionalist Catholics sometimes call it the "Mass of the Ages",[20][21][22][23][24][25] and say that it comes down to us "from the Church of the Apostles, and ultimately, indeed, from Him Who is its principal Priest and its spotless Victim".[26][27]
Pope St. Pius V's revision of the liturgy[edit]
At the time of the Council of Trent, the traditions preserved in printed and manuscript missals varied considerably, and standardization was sought both within individual dioceses and throughout the Latin West. Standardization was required also in order to prevent the introduction into the liturgy of Protestant ideas in the wake of the Protestant Reformation.
Pope St. Pius V accordingly imposed uniformity by law in 1570 with the papal bull "Quo primum", ordering use of the Roman Missal as revised by him.[19] He allowed only those rites that were at least 200 years old to survive the promulgation of his 1570 Missal. Several of the rites that remained in existence were progressively abandoned, though the Ambrosian rite survives in Milan, Italy and neighbouring areas, stretching even into Switzerland, and the Mozarabic rite remains in use to a limited extent in Toledo and Madrid, Spain. The Carmelite, Carthusian and Dominican religious orders kept their rites, but in the second half of the 20th century two of these three chose to adopt the Roman Rite. The rite of Braga, in northern Portugal, seems to have been practically abandoned: since 18 November 1971 that archdiocese authorizes its use only on an optional basis.[28]
Beginning in the late 17th century, France and neighbouring areas, such as Münster, Cologne and Trier in Germany, saw a flurry of independent missals published by bishops influenced by Jansenism and Gallicanism. This ended when Abbot Guéranger and others initiated in the 19th century a campaign to return to the Roman Missal.
Pius V's revision of the liturgy had as one of its declared aims the restoration of the Roman Missal "to the original form and rite of the holy Fathers".[19] Due to the relatively limited resources available to his scholars, this aim was in fact not realised.[29]
Three different printings of Pius V's Roman Missal, with minor variations, appeared in 1570, a folio and a quarto edition in Rome and a folio edition in Venice. A reproduction of what is considered to be the earliest, referred to therefore as the editio princeps, was produced in 1998.[30] In the course of the printing of the editio princeps, some corrections were made by pasting revised texts over parts of the already printed pages.[31] There were several printings again in the following year 1571, with various corrections of the text.[32]
Historical variations[edit]




Missale Romanum in Croatian Glagolitic script printed in 1483


In the Apostolic Constitution (papal bull) Quo primum, with which he prescribed use of his 1570 edition of the Roman Missal, Pius V decreed: "We order and enjoin that nothing must be added to Our recently published Missal, nothing omitted from it, nor anything whatsoever be changed within it." This of course did not exclude changes by a Pope, and Pope Pius V himself added to the Missal the feast of Our Lady of Victory, to celebrate the victory of Lepanto of 7 October 1571. His immediate successor, Pope Gregory XIII, changed the name of this feast to "The Most Holy Rosary of the Blessed Virgin Mary" and Pope John XXIII changed it to "Our Lady of the Rosary".
Pius V's work in severely reducing the number of feasts in the Roman Calendar (see this comparison) was very soon further undone by his successors. Feasts that he had abolished, such as those of the Presentation of Mary, Saint Anne and Saint Anthony of Padua, were restored even before Clement VIII's 1604 typical edition of the Missal was issued.
In the course of the following centuries new feasts were repeatedly added and the ranks of certain feasts were raised or lowered. A comparison between Pope Pius V's Tridentine Calendar and the General Roman Calendar of 1954 shows the changes made from 1570 to 1954. Pope Pius XII made a general revision in 1955, and Pope John XXIII made further general revisions in 1960 simplifying the terminology concerning the ranking of liturgical celebrations.
While keeping on 8 December what he called the feast of "the Conception of Blessed Mary" (omitting the word "Immaculate"), Pius V suppressed the existing special Mass for the feast, directing that the Mass for the Nativity of Mary (with the word "Nativity" replaced by "Conception") be used instead. Part of that earlier Mass was revived in the Mass that Pope Pius IX ordered to be used on the feast.
Typical editions of the Roman Missal[edit]




Altar of Santa Cecilia in Trastevere, as arranged in 1700:[33] one of many churches in Rome whose altar, placed at the western end of the church, was positioned so that the priest necessarily faced east, and so towards the people, when celebrating Mass[34]


In addition to such occasional changes, the Roman Missal was subjected to general revisions whenever a new "typical edition" (an official edition whose text was to be reproduced in printings by all publishers) was issued.
After Pius V's original Tridentine Roman Missal, the first new typical edition was promulgated in 1604 by Pope Clement VIII, who in 1592 had issued a revised edition of the Vulgate. The Bible texts in the Missal of Pope Pius V did not correspond exactly to the new Vulgate, and so Clement edited and revised Pope Pius V's Missal, making alterations both in the scriptural texts and in other matters. He abolished some prayers that the 1570 Missal obliged the priest to say on entering the church; shortened the two prayers to be said after the Confiteor; directed that the words "Haec quotiescumque feceritis, in meam memoriam facietis" ("Do this in memory of me") should not be said while displaying the chalice to the people after the consecration, but before doing so; inserted directions at several points of the Canon that the priest was to pronounce the words inaudibly; suppressed the rule that, at High Mass, the priest, even if not a bishop, was to give the final blessing with three signs of the cross; and rewrote the rubrics, introducing, for instance, the ringing of a small bell.[35]
The next typical edition was issued in 1634, when Pope Urban VIII made another general revision of the Roman Missal.[36]
There was no further typical edition until that of Pope Leo XIII in 1884.[37] It introduced only minor changes, not profound enough to merit having the papal bull of its promulgation included in the Missal, as the bulls of 1604 and 1634 were.
In 1911, with the bull Divino Afflatu,[38] Pope Pius X made significant changes in the rubrics. He died in 1914, so it fell to his successor Pope Benedict XV to issue a new typical edition incorporating his changes. This 1920 edition included a new section headed: "Additions and Changes in the Rubrics of the Missal in accordance with the Bull Divino afflatu and the Subsequent Decrees of the Sacred Congregation of Rites". This additional section was almost as long as the previous section on the "General Rubrics of the Missal", which continued to be printed unchanged.
Pope Pius XII radically revised the Palm Sunday and Easter Triduum liturgy, suppressed many vigils and octaves and made other alterations in the calendar (see General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII), reforms that were completed in Pope John XXIII's 1960 Code of Rubrics, which were incorporated in the final 1962 typical edition of the Tridentine Missal, replacing both Pius X's "Additions and Changes in the Rubrics of the Missal" and the earlier "General Rubrics of the Missal".
Changes made to the liturgy in 1965 and 1967 in the wake of decisions of the Second Vatican Council were not incorporated in the Roman Missal, but were reflected in the provisional vernacular translations produced when the language of the people began to be used in addition to Latin. This explains the references sometimes seen to "the 1965 Missal".
The General Roman Calendar was revised partially in 1955 and 1960 and completely in 1969 in Pope Paul VI's motu proprio Mysterii Paschalis, again reducing the number of feasts.[39]
1962 Missal[edit]
The Roman Missal issued by Pope John XXIII in 1962 differed from earlier editions in a number of ways.

It incorporated the change made by John XXIII in 1962, when he inserted into the canon of the Mass the name of Saint Joseph, the first change for centuries in the canon of the Mass.[40]
It incorporated major changes that Pope Pius XII made in 1955 in the liturgy of Palm Sunday and the Easter Triduum. These included:

Abolition of the ceremonies whereby the blessing of palms on Palm Sunday resembled a Mass, with Epistle, Gospel, Preface and Sanctus; suppression of the knocking three times on the closed doors before returning to the church after the blessing and distribution of the palms; omission of the prayers at the foot of the altar and of the Last Gospel.
On Holy Thursday the washing of feet was incorporated into the Mass instead of being an independent ceremony; if done by a bishop, 12 men, not 13, had their feet washed; the Mass itself was said in the evening instead of the morning and some of its prayers were removed or altered.
On Good Friday, elements that suggested the usual practices of the Mass were removed: the sacred ministers began the liturgy in alb and (for celebrant and deacon) black stoles, rather than respectively in black chasuble, dalmatic, and tunicle, as per a typical Mass; the sacred ministers donned their vestments (without maniples) only for the Solemn Intercessions, in which the celebrant wore a cope instead of a chasuble, and removed them for the adoration of the Cross; the sacred ministers changed to violet vestments (again, without maniples) for the distribution of Holy Communion; "Let us pray. Let us kneel. Arise" was added at the prayer for the Jews, and the adjective perfidis was removed (see Good Friday Prayer for the Jews); an afternoon Communion Service replaced the morning Mass of the Presanctified, at which the priest alone received the earlier-consecrated host, and drank unconsecrated wine into which a small portion of the consecrated host had been put.
The Easter Vigil was moved from Holy Saturday morning to the following nighttime; the use of a triple candle was abolished and other changes were made both to the initial ceremonies centred on the Paschal Candle and to other parts, such as the reduction from twelve to four of the prophecies read, and the introduction of a "renewal of baptismal promises" for the laity (notable for being the first time since the codification of the Missal of Pope Pius V that the vernacular was permitted to be used in such a manner).


It incorporated the rubrical changes made by Pope Pius XII's 1955 decree Cum nostra, which included:

Vigils were abolished except those of Easter, Christmas, Ascension, Pentecost, Saints Peter and Paul, Saint John the Baptist, and Saint Lawrence;
all octaves were abolished except those of Easter, Christmas and Pentecost;
no more than three collects were to be said at Low Mass and one at Solemn Mass.


Its calendar incorporated both the changes made by Pope Pius XII in 1955 (General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII) and those introduced by Pope John XXIII himself with his 1960 Code of Rubrics (General Roman Calendar of 1960). These included:

suppression of the "Solemnity of Saint Joseph, Spouse of the Blessed Virgin Mary" (Wednesday after the second Sunday after Easter) and its replacement by the feast of "Saint Joseph the Worker" (1 May);
removal of some duplicate feasts that appeared twice in earlier versions of the calendar, namely, the Chair of Saint Peter at Rome (18 January), the Finding of the Holy Cross (3 May), Saint John before the Latin Gate (6 May), the Apparition of Saint Michael (8 May), Saint Peter in Chains (1 August), and the Invention of the Relics of Saint Stephen (3 August);
addition of feasts such as that of the Queenship of Mary (31 May).


It replaced the Roman Missal's introductory sections, Rubricae generales Missalis (General Rubrics of the Missal) and Additiones et variationes in rubricis Missalis ad normam Bullae "Divino afflatu" et subsequentium S.R.C. Decretorum (Additions and alterations to the Rubrics of the Missal in line with the Bull Divino afflatu and the subsequent decrees of the Sacred Congregation of Rites), with the text of the General Rubrics and the General Rubrics of the Roman Missal parts of the 1960 Code of Rubrics.

Pope Benedict XVI authorized, under certain conditions, continued use of this 1962 edition of the Roman Missal as an extraordinary form of the Roman Rite,[41] alongside the later form, introduced in 1970, which is now the normal or ordinary form.[42] Pre-1962 forms of the Roman Rite, which some individuals and groups employ,[43] are not authorized for liturgical use.
Liturgical structure[edit]
The Mass is divided into two parts, the Mass of the Catechumens and the Mass of the Faithful. Catechumens, those being instructed in the faith,[44] were once dismissed after the first half, not having yet professed the faith. Profession of faith was considered essential for participation in the Eucharistic sacrifice.[45]
This rule of the Didache is still in effect. It is only one of the three conditions (baptism, right faith and right living) for admission to receiving Holy Communion that the Catholic Church has always applied and that were already mentioned in the early 2nd century by Saint Justin Martyr: "And this food is called among us the Eucharist, of which no one is allowed to partake but the man who believes that the things which we teach are true, and who has been washed with the washing that is for the remission of sins, and unto regeneration, and who is so living as Christ has enjoined" (First Apology, Chapter LXVI).
Before Mass[edit]

Asperges (Sprinkling with holy water, Psalm 51:9, 3) is an optional penitential rite that ordinarily precedes only the principal Mass on Sunday.[46] In the sacristy, a priest wearing an alb, if he is to celebrate the Mass, or surplice, if he is not the celebrant of the Mass, and vested with a stole, which is the color of the day if the priest is the celebrant of the Mass or purple if he is not the celebrant of the Mass, exorcises and blesses salt and water, then puts the blessed salt into the water by thrice sprinkling it in the form of a cross while saying once, "Commixtio salis et aquæ pariter fiat in nomine Patris, et Filii et Spiritus Sancti" (May a mixture of salt and water now be made in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Spirit). After that, the priest, vested in a cope of the color of the day, while the choir sings an antiphon and a verse of Psalm 50/51 or 117/118, sprinkles with the holy water the altar three times, and then the clergy and the congregation. This rite, if used, precedes the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar. During the Easter season, the "Asperges me..." verse is replaced by the "Vidi aquam..." verse, and "Alleluia" is added to the "Ostende nobis..." verse and to its response.

Following the Asperges, Mass begins.
Mass of the Catechumens[edit]
The first part is the Mass of the Catechumens.[47]
Prayers at the foot of the altar[edit]




Prayers at the foot of the altar


The sequence of Prayers at the foot of the altar is:

Sign of the cross


The priest, after processing in—at solemn Mass with deacon, and subdeacon, master of ceremonies and servers, and at other Masses with one or more servers—and at Low Mass placing the veiled chalice on the centre of the altar, makes the sign of the cross at the foot of the altar. At Solemn Mass, the chalice is placed beforehand on the credence table.


Psalm 42 (Psalm 43 MT, i.e. Masoretic numbering), known by its incipit Iudica me, is recited, except in Masses of the season during Passiontide and in Requiem Masses. It is preceded and followed by an antiphon of Psalm 42:4 (43:4 MT) "Introibo ad altare Dei, ad Deum qui lætificat iuventutem meam" (Translation: "I shall go in to the altar of God, the God who gives joy to my youth"), is recited by the priest, alternating with the deacon and subdeacon (if present) or servers.
Psalm 124:8 is recited:


Priest (makes the sign of the cross): "Our help is in the name of the Lord,"
Servers: "Who made heaven and earth."


The double form of a prayer of general confession of sins, known by its incipit Confiteor (I confess), is recited:


Priest (while bowing low): "Confíteor Deo omnipoténti, beátæ Maríæ semper Vírgini, beáto Michaéli Archángelo, beáto Ioanni Baptístæ, sanctis Apóstolis Petro et Paulo, ómnibus Sanctis, et vobis, fratres (tibi, Pater), quia peccávi nimis cogitatióne, verbo et ópere: (while striking the breast three times) mea culpa, mea culpa, mea máxima culpa. Ideo precor beátam Maríam semper Vírginem, beátum Michaélem Archángelum, beátum Ioánnem Baptístam, sanctos Apóstolos Petrum et Paulum, omnes Sanctos, et vos, fratres (te, Pater), oráre pro me ad Dóminum Deum nostrum."

(Translation: I confess to almighty God, to blessed Mary ever Virgin, to blessed Michael the archangel, to blessed John the Baptist, to the holy apostles Peter and Paul, to all the saints, and to you, brethren, that I have sinned exceedingly in thought, word, and deed through my fault, through my fault, through my most grievous fault. Therefore, I beseech blessed Mary ever Virgin ... and you, brethren, to pray to the Lord our God for me.)


The servers pray for the priest: "May Almighty God have mercy on thee, forgive thee thy sins, and bring thee to life everlasting." Then it is the ministers' or servers' turn to confess sinfulness and to ask for prayers. They use the same words as those used by the priest, except that they say "you, Father," in place of "you, brethren", and the priest responds with the same prayer that the servers have used for him (but using the plural number) plus an extra prayer.


Some verses are then said by priest and ministers (or servers), ending with the priest saying Oremus te Domine (Let us pray) After this he ascends to the altar, praying silently "Take away from us our iniquities" "that with pure minds we may worthily enter into the holy of holies", a reference to Exodus 26:33-34, 1 Kings 6:16, 1 Kings 8:6, 2 Chronicles 3:8, Ezekiel 41:4, and others. He places his joined hands on the edge of the altar, so that only the tips of the small fingers touch the front of it, and silently prays that, by the merits of the Saints whose relics are in the altar, God may pardon all his sins. At the words quorum relíquiæ hic sunt (whose relics are here), he spreads his hands and kisses the altar.

Priest at the altar[edit]




Dominus vobiscum ("The Lord be with you") before the Collect.
In the Tridentine Mass the priest should keep his eyes downcast at this point.[48]



Introit

The priest again makes the sign of the Cross while he begins to read the Introit, which is usually taken from a Psalm. Exceptions occur: e.g. the Introit for Easter Sunday is adapted from Wis 10:20-21, and the antiphon in Masses of the Blessed Virgin Mary was from the poet Sedulius. This evolved from the practice of singing a full Psalm, interspersed with the antiphon, during the entrance of the clergy, before the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar were added to the Mass in medieval times. This is indicated by the very name of "Introit".


Kyrie

This part of Mass is a linguistic marker of the origins of the Roman liturgy in Greek. "Kyrie, eleison; Christe, eleison; Kyrie, eleison." means "Lord, have mercy; Christ have mercy;..." Each phrase is said (or sung) three times.


Gloria in excelsis Deo

The first line of the Gloria[49] is taken from Lk 2:14. The Gloria is omitted during the penitential liturgical seasons of Advent, Septuagesima, Lent, and Passiontide, in which violet vestments are worn, but is used on feasts falling during such seasons, as well as on Holy Thursday. It is always omitted for a Requiem Mass.


The Collect

The priest turns toward the people and says, "Dominus vobiscum." The servers respond: "Et cum spiritu tuo." ("The Lord be with you." "And with thy spirit"). The Collect follows, a prayer not drawn directly from Scripture. It tends to reflect the season.



Instruction[edit]

The priest reads the Epistle, primarily an extract from the letters of St. Paul to various churches. In his motu proprio Summorum Pontificum, Pope Benedict XVI has permitted this to be read in the vernacular language when Mass is celebrated with the people.[50]
Between the Epistle and the Gospel two (rarely three) choir responses are sung or said. Usually these are a Gradual followed by an Alleluia; but between Septuagesima Sunday and Holy Saturday, or in a Requiem Mass or other penitential Mass the Alleluia is replaced by a Tract, and between Easter Sunday and Pentecost the Gradual is replaced by a second Alleluia. On a few exceptional occasions (most notably Easter, Pentecost, Corpus Christi, and in a Requiem Mass), a Sequence follows the Alleluia or Tract.

The Gradual is partly composed of a portion of a Psalm.


The Gospel reading, an extract from one of the four Gospels

Before the reading or chanting of the Gospel, the priest prays: "Cleanse my heart and my lips, O almighty God, who didst cleanse the lips of the prophet Isaias...", a reference to Isaiah 6:6. In this passage, after being cleansed by the angel, Isaiah was instructed to prophesy.


The Homily

The rite of Mass as revised by Pope Pius V (the Tridentine Mass) does not consider a sermon obligatory and speaks of it instead as merely optional: it presumes that the Creed, if it is to be said, will follow the Gospel immediately, but adds: "If, however, someone is to preach, the Homilist, after the Gospel has been finished, preaches, and when the sermon or moral address has been completed, the Credo is said, or if it is not to be said, the Offertory is sung."[51] By contrast the Roman Missal as revised by Pope Paul VI declares that the homily may not be omitted without a grave reason from Mass celebrated with the people attending on Sundays and Holy Days of Obligation and that it is recommended on other days.[52]


The Creed

This is the Nicene Creed, professing faith in God the Father, in God the Son, the Word made flesh, in God the Holy Ghost, and in the Holy Church. At the mention of the Incarnation, the celebrant and the congregation genuflect.



Mass of the Faithful[edit]
The second part is the Mass of the Faithful.[53]
Offertory[edit]

Offertory Verse

After greeting the people once more ("Dominus vobiscum/Et cum spiritu tuo") and giving the invitation to pray (Oremus), the priest enters upon the Mass of the Faithful, from which the non-baptized were once excluded. He reads the Offertory Verse, a short quotation from Holy Scripture which varies with the Mass of each day, with hands joined.


Offering of Bread and Wine

The priest offers the host, holding it on the paten at breast level and praying that, although he is unworthy, God may accept "this spotless host (or victim, the basic meaning of hostia in Latin) for his own innumerable sins, offences and neglects, for all those present, and for all faithful Christians living and dead, that it may avail unto salvation of himself and those mentioned. He then mixes a few drops of water with the wine, which will later become the Blood of Jesus, and holding the chalice so that the lip of the chalice is about the height of his lips, offers "the chalice of salvation", asking that it may "ascend with a sweet fragrance." He then prays a prayer of contrition adapted from Dan 3:39-40.


Incensing of the offerings and of the faithful

At a High Mass, the priest blesses the incense, then incenses the bread and wine. Among the prayers the priest says is Psalm 141:2-4: "Let my prayer, O Lord, be directed as incense in Thy sight;...", which is prayed as he incenses the altar. The priest then gives the thurible to the deacon, who incenses the priest, then the other ministers and the congregation.


Washing the hands

The priest prays Psalm 26:6-12: "I will wash my hands among the innocent..."


Prayer to the Most Holy Trinity

This prayer asks that the Divine Trinity may receive the oblation being made in remembrance of the passion, resurrection and ascension of Jesus and in honour of blessed Mary ever Virgin and the other saints, "that it may avail to their honour and our salvation: and that they may vouchsafe to intercede for us in heaven..."


Orate fratres, Suscipiat and Secret; Amen concludes Offertory

Here the priest turns to the congregation and says the first two words, "Orate, fratres," in an elevated tone and then turns around while finishing the exhortation in the secret tone. "Pray, Brethren, that my sacrifice and yours may be acceptable to God the Father almighty."
The altar servers respond with the Suscipiat to which the priest secretly responds, "Amen.": Suscipiat Dominus sacrificium de manibus tuis, ad laudem et gloriam nominis sui, ad utilitatem quoque nostram, totiusque ecclesiæ suae sanctæ. A translation in the English is: "May the Lord accept this sacrifice at your hands, to the praise and glory of His name, for our good and the good of all His Holy Church."
The Priest then says the day's Secret inaudibly, and concludes it with Per omnia sæcula sæculorum aloud.
The altar servers and (in dialogue Mass) the congregation respond: "Amen."



Consecration[edit]








Preface of the Canon

"The Roman Canon dates in essentials from before St. Gregory the Great, who died in 604, and who is credited with adding a phrase to it.[54] (See History of the Roman Canon.) It contains the main elements found in almost all rites, but in an unusual arrangement and it is unclear which part should be considered to be the Epiclesis.
Dominus vobiscum. Et cum spiritu tuo. Sursum corda. Habemus ad Dominum. Gratias agamus Domino Deo nostro. Dignum et iustum est. The first part can be seen above at the Collect; the rest means: Lift up your hearts. We lift them up to the Lord. Let us give thanks to the Lord our God. It is right and just.
Next a preface is prayed, indicating specific reasons for giving thanks to God. This leads to the Sanctus.[55]


Canon or rule of consecration[56]

Intercession (corresponding to the reading of the diptychs in the Byzantine Rite—a diptych is a two-leaf painting, carving or writing tablet.[57])

Here the priest prays for the living, that God may guard, unite and govern the Church together with the Pope and "all those who, holding to the truth, hand on the catholic and apostolic faith". Then specific living people are mentioned, and the congregation in the church. Next, Mary ever Virgin, Saint Joseph, the Apostles, and some Popes and other Martyrs are mentioned by name, as well as a generic "and all your Saints", in communion with whom prayer is offered.


Prayers preparatory to the consecration

A prayer that God may graciously accept the offering and "command that we be delivered from eternal damnation and counted among the flock of those you have chosen".


Consecration (transubstantiation) and major elevation




Elevation of the chalice during the Canon of the Mass at a Solemn Mass



The passage Lk 22:19-20 is key in this section. In Summa Theologiae III 78 3 Thomas Aquinas addresses the interspersed phrase, "the mystery of faith". On this phrase, see Mysterium fidei.


Oblation of the victim to God

An oblation is an offering;[58] the pure, holy, spotless victim is now offered, with a prayer that God may accept the offering and command his holy angel to carry the offering to God's altar on high, so that those who receive the Body and Blood of Christ "may be filled with every grace and heavenly blessing".


Remembrance of the Dead

The priest now prays for the dead ("those who have gone before us with the sign of faith and rest in the sleep of peace") and asks that they be granted a place of refreshment, light and peace. This is followed by a prayer that we be granted fellowship with the Saints. John the Baptist and fourteen martyrs, seven men and seven women, are mentioned by name.


End of the Canon and doxology with minor elevation

The concluding doxology is: "Through him, and with him, and in him, O God, almighty Father, in the unity of the Holy Spirit, all glory and honour is yours, for ever and ever." "Amen" ratifies the Canon prayer.





Elevation candle[edit]




Beuron Art School representation of an elevation candle, mistakenly placed at the Gospel side and upon the altar


Until 1960, the Tridentine form of the Roman Missal laid down that a candle should be placed at the Epistle side of the altar and that it should be lit at the showing of the consecrated sacrament to the people.[59] In practice, except in monasteries and on special occasions, this had fallen out of use long before Pope John XXIII replaced the section on the general rubrics of the Roman Missal with his Code of Rubrics, which no longer mentioned this custom. On this, see Elevation candle.
Communion[edit]




Before receiving Communion from the chalice, the priest makes the sign of the cross over himself, saying (in Latin): May the Blood of our Lord Jesus Christ keep my soul for eternal life. Amen.

























The Lord's Prayer and Libera nos[60]




The "Libera nos" is an extension of the Lord's Prayer developing the line "sed libera nos a malo" ("but deliver us from evil"). The priest prays that we may be delivered from all evils and that the Virgin Mary, Mother of God, together with the apostles and saints, may intercede to obtain for us peace in our day.




Fraction of the Host




During the preceding prayer, the priest breaks the consecrated Host into three parts, and after concluding the prayer drops the smallest part into the Chalice while praying that this commingling and consecration of the Body and Blood of Christ may "be to us who receive it effectual to life everlasting."




Agnus Dei




"Agnus Dei" means "Lamb of God". The priest then prays: "Lamb of God, who takest away the sins of the world, have mercy on us." He repeats this, and then adds: "Lamb of God, who takest away the sins of the world, grant us peace." The Mass of the Last Supper on Holy Thursday has "have mercy on us" all three times. In Requiem Masses, the petitions are "grant them rest" (twice), followed by "grant them eternal rest."


























The Pax

The priest asks Christ to look not at the priest's sins but at the faith of Christ's Church, and prays for peace and unity within the Church. Then, if a High Mass is being celebrated, he gives the sign of peace to the deacon, saying: "Peace be with you."


Prayers preparatory to the Communion

In the first of these two prayers for himself, the priests asks that by Holy Communion he may be freed from all his iniquities and evils, be made to adhere to the commandments of Jesus and never be separated from him. In the second he asks: "Let not the partaking of Thy Body, O Lord Jesus Christ...turn to my judgment and condemnation: but through Thy goodness may it be unto me a safeguard...."


Receiving of the Body and Blood of our Lord

The priest quietly says several prayers here, before receiving Communion. The first is said in a low voice while taking up the Host onto the paten. The second of them, spoken three times in a slightly audible voice,[61] while the priest holds the Host in his left hand and strikes his breast with his right, is based on Matthew 8:8: "Lord, I am not worthy...." Then, after having reverently consumed the Host, he takes up the chalice while in a low voice reciting Psalm 116:12-13: "What shall I render to the Lord, for all the things he hath rendered unto me? I will take the chalice of salvation; and I will call upon the name of the Lord." immediately adding Psalm 18:4: "Praising I will call upon the Lord: and I shall be saved from my enemies."







Priest on the "Ecce Agnus Dei - Behold the Lamb of God" in the people communion.





If the priest is to give Communion to others, he holds up a small host and says aloud: "Behold the Lamb of God ...", and three times: "Lord, I am not worthy ...". He then gives Communion, first making with the host the sign of the cross over each communicant, while saying: "May the Body of Our Lord Jesus Christ preserve your soul for eternal life. Amen."[62]



Conclusion[edit]




"Ite, missa est" sung by the deacon at a Solemn Mass.



Prayers during the Ablutions

The prayers now focus on what has been received, that "we may receive with a pure mind", "that no stain of sin may remain in me, whom these pure and holy sacraments have refreshed."


Communion Antiphon and Postcommunion

The communion antiphon is normally a portion of a Psalm. The Postcommunion Prayer is akin to the Collect in being an appropriate prayer not directly drawn from Scripture.


Ite Missa est; Blessing

"Go, it is the dismissal." The word "Mass" derives from this phrase.
After saying a silent prayer for himself, the priest then gives the people his blessing.
Prior to the revisions of Pope Pius XII and Pope John XXIII, the Ite Missa est was replaced with Benedicamus Domino ("Let us bless the Lord") on days in which the Gloria was not said and the rubrics required the priest to wear violet vestments (i.e., Masses of the season during Advent, Septuagesima, Lent and Passiontide; vigils; certain votive Masses). In the 1962 Missal, Benedicamus Domino is said only when the Mass is followed by another liturgical action, such as the Eucharistic Processions on Holy Thursday and Corpus Christi.
In Requiem Masses, the Ite Missa est is replaced with Requiescant in pace, with the response being "Amen" instead of Deo gratias.


The Last Gospel

The priest then reads the Last Gospel, the beginning of the Gospel of John, John 1:1-14, which recounts the Incarnation of the Son of God. On certain occasions, as for instance at the Day Mass on Christmas Day, another Gospel passage was read instead because that Gospel is read as the Gospel of the Mass, but Pope John XXIII's revision of the rubrics decreed that on those and on other occasions the Last Gospel should simply be omitted.



Prayers of the priest before and after Mass[edit]
The Tridentine Missal includes prayers for the priest to say before and after Mass.
In later editions of the Roman Missal, including that of 1962, the introductory heading of these prayers indicates that they are to be recited pro opportunitate (as circumstances allow),[63] which in practice means that they are merely optional and may be omitted. The original Tridentine Missal presents most of the prayers as obligatory, indicating as optional only a very long prayer attributed to Saint Ambrose (which later editions divide into seven sections, each to be recited on only one day of the week) and two other prayers attributed to Saint Ambrose and Saint Thomas Aquinas respectively.[64]
In addition to these three prayers, the original Tridentine Missal proposes for the priest to recite before he celebrates Mass the whole of Psalms 83–85, 115, 129 (the numbering is that of the Septuagint and Vulgate), and a series of collect-style prayers. Later editions add, after the three that in the original Missal are only optional, prayers to the Blessed Virgin, Saint Joseph, all the angels and saints, and the saint whose Mass is to be celebrated, but, as has been said, treats as optional all the prayers before Mass, even those originally given as obligatory.[65]
The original Tridentine Missal proposes for recitation by the priest after Mass three prayers, including the Adoro te devote. Later editions place before these three the Canticle of the Three Youths (Dan)[66] with three collects, and follow them with the Anima Christi and seven more prayers, treating as optional even the three prescribed in the original Tridentine Missal.[67]
Leonine Prayers[edit]
From 1884 to 1965, the Holy See prescribed the recitation after Low Mass of certain prayers, originally for the solution of the Roman Question and, after this problem was solved by the Lateran Treaty, "to permit tranquillity and freedom to profess the faith to be restored to the afflicted people of Russia".[68]
These prayers are known as the Leonine Prayers because it was Pope Leo XIII who on 6 January 1884 ordered their recitation throughout the world. In what had been the Papal States, they were already in use since 1859.
The prayers comprised three Ave Marias, one Salve Regina followed by a versicle and response, and a collect prayer that, from 1886 on, asked for the conversion of sinners and "the freedom and exaltation of Holy Mother the Church", and, again from 1886 on, a prayer to Saint Michael. In 1904, Pope Pius X added a thrice-repeated "Most Sacred Heart of Jesus, have mercy on us."
In 1964, with effect from 7 March 1965, the Holy See ended the obligation to recite the Leonine Prayers after Low Mass.[69] However, the Leonine Prayers are sometimes still recited after present-day celebrations of Tridentine Mass, although they are not included even in the 1962 edition of the Tridentine Missal.
Participation by the people[edit]




Nuptial Low Mass






Distribution of Communion at a Tridentine Mass: typically, the faithful kneel and receive in the mouth and women wear a headcovering.


The participation of the congregation at the Tridentine Mass is interior, involving eye and heart, and exterior by mouth.[70]
Except in the Dialogue Mass form, which arose about 1910 and led to a more active exterior participation of the congregation, the people present at the Tridentine Mass do not recite out loud the prayers of the Mass. Only the server or servers join with the priest in reciting the prayers at the foot of the altar (which include the Confiteor) and in speaking the other responses.[71] Most of the prayers that the priest says are spoken inaudibly, including almost all the Mass of the Faithful: the offertory prayers, the Canon of the Mass (except for the preface and the final doxology), and (apart from the Agnus Dei) those between the Lord's Prayer and the postcommunion.
At a Solemn Mass or Missa Cantata, a choir sings the servers' responses, except for the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar. The choir sings the Introit, the Kyrie, the Gloria, the Gradual, the Tract or Alleluia, the Credo, the Offertory and Communion antiphons, the Sanctus, and the Agnus Dei. Of these, only the five that form part of the Ordinary of the Mass are usually sung at a Missa Cantata. In addition to the Gregorian Chant music for these, polyphonic compositions exist, some quite elaborate. The priest largely says quietly the words of the chants and then recites other prayers while the choir continues the chant.
Different levels of celebration[edit]
There are various forms of celebration of the Tridentine Mass:

Pontifical High Mass: celebrated by a bishop accompanied by an assisting priest, deacon, subdeacon, thurifer, acolytes and other ministers, under the guidance of a priest acting as Master of Ceremonies. Most often the specific parts assigned to deacon and subdeacon are performed by priests. The parts that are said aloud are all chanted, except that the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar, which before the reform of Pope Pius V were said in the sacristy, are said quietly by the bishop with the deacon and the subdeacon, while the choir sings the Introit. The main difference between a pontifical and an ordinary High Mass is that the bishop remains at his throne almost all the time until the offertory.
Solemn or High Mass (Latin: Missa solemnis): offered by a priest accompanied by a deacon and subdeacon and the other ministers mentioned above.
Missa Cantata (Latin for "sung mass"): celebrated by a priest without deacon and subdeacon, and thus a form of Low Mass, but with some parts (the three variable prayers, the Scripture readings, Preface, Pater Noster, and Ite Missa Est) sung by the priest, and other parts (Introit, Kyrie, Gloria, Gradual, Tract or Alleluia, Credo, Offertory Antiphon, Sanctus and Benedictus, Agnus Dei, and Communion Antiphon) sung by the choir. Incense may be used exactly as at a Solemn Mass with the exception of incensing the celebrant after the Gospel which is not done.
Low Mass: the priest sings no part of the Mass, though in some places a choir or the congregation sings, during the Mass, hymns not always directly related to the Mass.

In its article "The Liturgy of the Mass", the 1917 Catholic Encyclopedia describes how, when concelebration ceased to be practised in Western Europe, Low Mass became distinguished from High Mass:[72]

The separate celebrations then involved the building of many altars in one church and the reduction of the ritual to the simplest possible form. The deacon and subdeacon were in this case dispensed with; the celebrant took their part as well as his own. One server took the part of the choir and of all the other ministers, everything was said instead of being sung, the incense and kiss of peace were omitted. So we have the well-known rite of low Mass (missa privata). This then reacted on high Mass (missa solemnis), so that at high Mass too the celebrant himself recites everything, even though it be sung by the deacon, subdeacon, or choir.

On the origin of the "Missa Cantata", the same source gives the following information:

... high Mass is the norm; it is only in the complete rite with deacon and subdeacon that the ceremonies can be understood. Thus, the rubrics of the Ordinary of the Mass always suppose that the Mass is high. Low Mass, said by a priest alone with one server, is a shortened and simplified form of the same thing. Its ritual can be explained only by a reference to high Mass. For instance, the celebrant goes over to the north side of the altar to read the Gospel, because that is the side to which the deacon goes in procession at high Mass; he turns round always by the right, because at high Mass he should not turn his back to the deacon and so on. A sung Mass (missa Cantata) is a modern compromise. It is really a low Mass, since the essence of high Mass is not the music but the deacon and subdeacon. Only in churches which have no ordained person except one priest, and in which high Mass is thus impossible, is it allowed to celebrate the Mass (on Sundays and feasts) with most of the adornment borrowed from high Mass, with singing and (generally) with incense.

Revision of the Roman Missal[edit]
Pius XII began in earnest the work of revising the Roman Missal with a thorough revision of the rites of Holy Week, which, after an experimental period beginning in 1951, was made obligatory in 1955. The Mass that used to be said on Holy Thursday morning was moved to the evening, necessitating a change in the rule that previously had required fasting from midnight. The Good Friday service was moved to the afternoon, Holy Communion was no longer reserved for the priest alone (as before, hosts consecrated at the Holy Thursday Mass were used) and the priest no longer received part of the host in unconsecrated wine. The Easter Vigil service that used to be held in morning of Holy Saturday[73] was moved to the night that leads to Easter Sunday and many changes were made to the content.
In 1960, Pope John XXIII (1958–1963) ordered the suppression of the word "perfidis" ("unbelieving" i.e. not believing in Jesus), applied to the Jews, in the rites for Good Friday. He revised the rubrics to the Order of Mass and the Breviary. Two years later, in 1962, he made some more minor modifications on the occasion of publishing a new typical edition of the Roman Missal. This is the edition authorized for use by virtue of the Quattuor abhinc annos indult (see below, under Present status of the Tridentine Mass). Among the other changes he made and that were included in the 1962 Missal were: adding St. Joseph's name to the Roman Canon; eliminating the second Confiteor before Communion; suppressing 10 feasts, such as St. Peter's Chair in Rome (or, more accurately, combining both feasts of St Peter's Chair into one, as they originally had been); incorporating the abolition of 4 festal octaves and 9 vigils of feasts and other changes made by Pope Pius XII; and modifying rubrics especially for Solemn High Masses.[74] Among the names that disappeared from the Roman Missal was that of St Philomena: her liturgical celebration had never been admitted to the General Roman Calendar, but from 1920 it had been included (with an indication that the Mass was to be taken entirely from the common) in the section headed "Masses for some places", i.e. only those places for which it had been specially authorized; but her name had already in 1961 been ordered to be removed from all liturgical calendars.
On 4 December 1963, the Second Vatican Council decreed in Chapter II of its Constitution on the Sacred Liturgy Sacrosanctum Concilium:[75]

"[T]he rite of the Mass is to be revised ... the rites are to be simplified, due care being taken to preserve their substance. Parts which with the passage of time came to be duplicated, or were added with little advantage, are to be omitted. Other parts which suffered loss through accidents of history are to be restored to the vigor they had in the days of the holy Fathers, as may seem useful or necessary. The treasures of the Bible are to be opened up more lavishly so that a richer fare may be provided for the faithful at the table of God’s word ... A suitable place may be allotted to the vernacular in Masses which are celebrated with the people ... communion under both kinds may be granted when the bishops think fit...as, for instance, to the newly ordained in the Mass of their sacred ordination, to the newly professed in the Mass of their religious profession, and to the newly baptized in the Mass which follows their baptism..."

The instruction Inter Oecumenici of 26 September 1964 initiated the application to the Mass of the decisions that the Council had taken less than a year before. Permission was given for use, only in Mass celebrated with the people, of the vernacular language, especially in the Biblical readings and the reintroduced Prayers of the Faithful, but, "until the whole of the Ordinary of the Mass has been revised," in the chants (Kyrie, Gloria, Creed, Sanctus, Agnus Dei, and the entrance, offertory and communion antiphons) and in the parts that involved dialogue with the people, and in the Our Father, which the people could now recite entirely together with the priest. Most Episcopal Conferences quickly approved interim vernacular translations, generally different from country to country, and, after having them confirmed by the Holy See, published them in 1965. Other changes included the omission of Psalm 43 (42) at the start of Mass and the Last Gospel at the end, both of which Pope Pius V had first inserted into the Missal (having previously been private prayers said by the priest in the sacristy), and the Leonine Prayers of Pope Leo XIII. The Canon of the Mass, which continued to be recited silently, was kept in Latin.
Three years later, the instruction Tres abhinc annos[76] of 4 May 1967 gave permission for use of the vernacular even in the Canon of the Mass, and allowed it to be said audibly and even, in part, to be chanted; the vernacular could be used even at Mass celebrated without the people being present. Use of the maniple was made optional, and at three ceremonies at which the cope was previously the obligatory vestment the chasuble could be used instead.
Pope Paul VI continued implementation of the Council's directives, ordering with Apostolic Constitution Missale Romanum[77] of Holy Thursday, 3 April 1969, publication of a new official edition of the Roman Missal, which appeared (in Latin) in 1970.
Opposition to the latest revisions of the liturgy[edit]
Some Traditionalist Catholics reject to a greater or lesser extent the changes made since 1950 (see Traditionalist Catholic). None advocate returning to the original (1570) form of the liturgy, though some may perhaps wish a re-establishment of its form before Pius X's revision of the rubrics in 1911. Some do refuse to accept the 1955 changes in the liturgy of Palm Sunday and the Easter Triduum and in the liturgical calendar (see General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII), and instead use the General Roman Calendar as in 1954. Others accept the 1955 changes by Pius XII, but not those of Pope John XXIII. Others again, in accordance with the authorization granted by Pope Benedict XVI in Summorum Pontificum, use the Missal and calendar as it was in 1962.
Some of them argue that, unlike earlier reforms, the revision of 1969-1970 which replaced the Tridentine Mass with the Mass of Pope Paul VI represented a major break with the past. They consider that the content of the revised liturgy is, in Catholic terms, seriously deficient and defective; some hold that it is displeasing to God, and that no Catholic should attend it.[78]
When a preliminary text of two of the sections of the revised Missal was published in 1969, Archbishop Marcel Lefebvre gathered a group of twelve theologians, who, under his direction,[79] wrote a study of the text. They stated that it "represents, both as a whole and in its details, a striking departure from the Catholic theology of the Mass as it was formulated in Session 22 of the Council of Trent".[80] Cardinal Alfredo Ottaviani, a former Prefect of the Sacred Congregation for the Doctrine of the Faith, supported this study with a letter of 25 September 1969 to Pope Paul VI. Cardinal Antonio Bacci signed the same letter. The critical study became known as "the Ottaviani Intervention".[81] Cardinal Ottaviani subsequently stated in writing that he had not intended his letter to be made public, and that Pope Paul VI's doctrinal exposition, on 19 November[82] and 26 November 1969,[83] of the revised liturgy in its definitive form meant that "no one can be genuinely scandalised any more".[84] Jean Madiran, a critic of Vatican II[85] and founder-editor of the French journal Itinéraires, claimed that this letter was fraudulently presented to the elderly and already blind cardinal for his signature by his secretary, Monsignor (and future Cardinal) Gilberto Agustoni, and that Agustoni resigned shortly afterwards.[86] This allegation remains unproven, and Madiran himself was not an eyewitness of the alleged deception.[87]
In October 1967, a meeting of the Synod of Bishops had already given its opinion on a still earlier draft. Of the 187 members, 78 approved it as it stood, 62 approved it but suggested various modifications, 4 abstained, and 47 voted against.[88]
From the 1960s onwards, Western countries have experienced a drop in Mass attendance (in the United States, from 75% of Catholics attending in 1958 to 25% attending by 2002). These same countries saw a decline in seminary enrollments and in the number of priests (in the United States, from 1,575 ordinations in 1954 to 450 in 2002), and a general erosion of belief in the doctrines of the Catholic faith. Opponents of the revision of the Mass liturgy argue, citing opinion poll evidence in their support, that the revision contributed to this decline.[89] Others, pointing, among other considerations, to the fact that, globally, there are more priests and seminarians now than in previous years (in 1970, there were 72,991 major seminarians worldwide, in 2002, there were 113,199, an increase of 55%, at a time, however, when there was an increase of global population of 64%),[90] suggest that the apparent decline of Catholic practice in the West is due to the general influence of secularism and liberalism on Western societies rather than to developments within the Catholic Church.
Attitudes of Popes since the Second Vatican Council[edit]
Pope Paul VI[edit]
Following the introduction of the Mass of Paul VI in 1969-1970, the Holy See granted a significant number of permissions for the use of the former liturgy. For example, elderly priests were not required to switch to celebrating the new form. In England and Wales, occasional celebrations of the Tridentine Mass were allowed in virtue of what became known as the "Agatha Christie indult". However, there was no general worldwide legal framework allowing for the celebration of the rite. Following the rise of the Traditionalist Catholic movement in the 1970s, Pope Paul VI reportedly declined to liberalise its use further on the grounds that it had become a politically charged symbol associated with opposition to his policies.[91]
Pope John Paul II[edit]
In 1984, the Holy See sent a letter known as Quattuor abhinc annos to the presidents of the world's Episcopal Conferences. This document empowered diocesan bishops to authorise, on certain conditions, celebrations of the Tridentine Mass for priests and laypeople who requested them.[92] In 1988, following the excommunication of Archbishop Marcel Lefebvre and four bishops that he had consecrated, the Pope issued a further document, a motu proprio known as Ecclesia Dei,[93] which stated that "respect must everywhere be shown for the feelings of all those who are attached to the Latin liturgical tradition". The Pope urged bishops to give "a wide and generous application" to the provisions of Quattuor abhinc annos, and established the Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei to oversee relations between Rome and Traditionalist Catholics.
The Holy See itself granted authorisation to use the Tridentine Mass to a significant number of priests and priestly societies, such as the Priestly Fraternity of St. Peter, the Institute of Christ the King Sovereign Priest, and the Personal Apostolic Administration of Saint John Mary Vianney. Some diocesan bishops, however, declined to authorise celebrations within their dioceses, or did so only to a limited extent. In some cases, the difficulty was that those seeking the permission were hostile to the church authorities. Other refusals of permission were alleged to have stemmed from certain bishops' disapproval in principle of celebrations of the Tridentine liturgy.
Pope Benedict XVI[edit]
As a cardinal, Joseph Ratzinger was regarded as having a particular interest in the liturgy, and as being favourable towards the older rite of Mass. He famously criticized the erratic way in which, contrary to official policy, many priests celebrated the revised rite.[94]
In September 2006, the Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei established the Institute of the Good Shepherd, made up of former members of the Society of St. Pius X, in Bordeaux, France, with permission to use the Tridentine liturgy.[95] This step was met with some discontent from French clergy, and thirty priests wrote an open letter to the Pope.[96] Consistently with its previous policy, the Society of St Pius X rejected the move.[97]
Following repeated rumours that the use of the Tridentine Mass would be liberalised, the Pope issued a motu proprio called Summorum Pontificum on 7 July 2007,[98] together with an accompanying letter to the world's Bishops.[99] The Pope declared that "the Roman Missal promulgated by Paul VI is the ordinary expression of the lex orandi (law of prayer) of the Catholic Church of the Latin rite. Nevertheless, the Roman Missal promulgated by St. Pius V and reissued by St. John XXIII is to be considered as an extraordinary expression of that same 'Lex orandi'".[100] He further stated that "the 1962 Missal ... was never juridically abrogated".[101] He replaced with new rules those of Quattuor Abhinc Annos on use of the older form: essentially, authorization for using the 1962 form for parish Masses and those celebrated on public occasions such as a wedding is devolved from the local bishop to the priest in charge of a church, and any priest of the Latin Rite may use the 1962 Roman Missal in "Masses celebrated without the people", a term that does not exclude attendance by other worshippers, lay or clergy.[102] While requests by groups of Catholics wishing to use the Tridentine liturgy in parish Masses are to be dealt with by the parish priest (or the rector of the church) rather than, as before, by the local bishop, the Pope and Cardinal Darío Castrillón have stated that the bishops' authority is not thereby undermined.[103]
Present regulations[edit]
The regulations set out in Summorum Pontificum provide that:

In Masses celebrated "without the people", every Latin Rite priest may use either the 1962 Roman Missal or that of Paul VI except during the Easter Triduum (when Masses without participation by the people are no longer allowed). Celebrations of Mass in this form (formerly referred to as "private Masses") may, as before, be attended by laypeople who ask to be admitted.[104]
In parish Masses, where there is a stable group of laypeople who adhere to the earlier liturgical tradition, the parish priest should willingly accept their requests to be allowed to celebrate the Mass according to the 1962 Missal, and should ensure that their welfare harmonises with the ordinary pastoral care of the parish, under the guidance of the bishop in accordance with canon 392 of the Code of Canon Law, avoiding discord and favouring the unity of the Church.

Mass may be celebrated using the 1962 Missal on working days, while on Sundays and feast days one such celebration may be held.
For priests and laypeople who request it, the parish priest should allow celebrations of the 1962 form on special occasions such as weddings, funerals, and pilgrimages.


Communities belonging to institutes of consecrated life and societies of apostolic life which wish to use the 1962 Missal for conventual or "community" celebration in their oratories may do so.

With letter 13/2007 of 20 January 2010 the Pontifical Council Ecclesia Dei responded positively to a question whether a parish priest (pastor) or another priest may on his own initiative publicly celebrate the extraordinary form, along with the customary regular use of the new form, "so that the faithful, both young and old, can familiarize themselves with the old rites and benefit from their perceptible beauty and transcendence". Although the Council accompanied this response with the observation that a stable group of the faithful attached to the older form has a right to assist at Mass in the extraordinary form, a website that published the response interpreted it as not requiring the existence of such a stable group.[105]
Present practice[edit]
The publication of Summorum Pontificum has led to an increase in the number of regularly scheduled public Tridentine Masses. On 14 June 2008 Cardinal Darío Castrillón Hoyos told a London press conference that Pope Benedict wants every parish to offer both the old and the new forms for Sunday Mass.[106]
The cardinal said that the Vatican was preparing to instruct seminaries to teach all students the Tridentine form of the Roman Rite. The complexity of the rubrics makes it difficult for priests accustomed to the simpler modern form to celebrate the Tridentine form properly, and it is unclear how many have the required knowledge.
Some Traditionalist Catholic priests and organisations, holding that no official permission is required to use any form of the Tridentine Mass, celebrate it without regularizing their situation,[107] and sometimes using editions of the Roman Missal earlier than the 1962 edition approved in Summorum Pontificum.
In order to provide for priests who celebrate the Tridentine Mass, publishers have issued facsimiles or reprintings of old missals. There were two new printings of the 1962 Tridentine Missal in 2004: one, with the imprimatur of Bishop Fabian Bruskewitz of Lincoln, Nebraska, by Baronius Press in association with the Priestly Fraternity of St. Peter; the other by the Society of St. Pius X's publishing house, Angelus Press. There was a new printing of a facsimile 1962 Tridentine Altar Missal in 2008 by PCP books. Some other missals reproduced date from before 1955 and so do not have the revised Holy Week rites promulgated by Pope Pius XII. They are used by traditionalists who reject Pius XII's liturgical changes. As well as such altar missals for use by the priest, old hand missals for those attending Mass have been reproduced, including a St Bonaventure Press facsimile of a pre-1955 edition of the St Andrew's Missal.
See also[edit]

List of communities using the Tridentine Mass
Sacred language
Western Rite Orthodoxy

References[edit]


^ In this context, "typical edition" means the officially approved edition to whose text other printings are obliged to conform.
^ Angelus A. De Marco, O.F.M., "Liturgical Languages" in The American Ecclesiastical Review
^ Council of Trent, session of 4 December 1563
^ These regions included those in which a variant of the Roman Rite, called the Sarum Rite, was in use for more than the minimum required time. On a few recent occasions Roman Catholic prelates have used this variant as an extraordinary form of celebrating Mass. But, like most of the other regions and the orders concerned, the Sarum Rite areas have adopted the standard Roman Missal. The most important non-Roman liturgies that continue in use are the Ambrosian Rite, the Mozarabic Rite and the Carthusian Rite.
^ Code of Canon Law, canon 928
^ Instruction Redemptionis Sacramentum, 112
^ a b Letter of Pope Benedict XVI
^ Pope Benedict spoke of it instead as "an" extraordinary form. While in English, "extraordinary" often has laudatory overtones, its meaning in canon law is illustrated by its use with reference, for instance, to "the extraordinary minister of holy communion" (cf. canon 910 §2 of the Code of Canon Law).
^ Summorum Pontificum, article 10 speaks of celebrations "iuxta formam antiquiorem ritus romani" (in accordance with the older form of the Roman Rite).
^ Summorum Pontificum, articles 2 and 4
^ Summorum Pontificum, article 5
^ Krmpotic, M.D. (1908). "Dalmatia". Catholic encyclopedia. Retrieved March 25, 2008. The right to use the Glagolitic  [sic] language at Mass with the Roman Rite has prevailed for many centuries in all the south-western Balkan countries, and has been sanctioned by long practice and by many popes. 
^ Japundžić, Marko (1997). "The Croatian Glagolitic Heritage". Croatian Academy of America. Retrieved March 25, 2008. In 1886 it arrived to the Principality of Montenegro, followed by the Kingdom of Serbia in 1914, and the Republic of Czechoslovakia in 1920, but only for feast days of the main patron saints. The 1935 concordat with the Kingdom of Yugoslavia anticipated the introduction of the Slavic liturgy for all Croatian regions and throughout the entire state. 
^ "Inter Oecumenici, Sacred Congregation of Rites". 2007. Retrieved March 25, 2008. 
^ Congregation for Divine Worship and the Discipline of the Sacrament (2004-04-23). "Redemptionis Sacramentum". Retrieved 2008-03-25. 
^ Thompson, Damian (2008-06-14). "Latin mass to return to England and Wales". The Daily Telegraph. Retrieved 2008-06-17. 
^ Medieval Sourcebook; Pope reformulates Tridentine rite's prayer for Jews
^ Letter to the Bishops on the occasion of the publication of Summorum Pontificum
^ a b c "Quo primum". Retrieved 2008-03-25. We decided to entrust this work to learned men of our selection. They very carefully collated all their work with the ancient codices in Our Vatican Library and with reliable, preserved or emended codices from elsewhere. Besides this, these men consulted the works of ancient and approved authors concerning the same sacred rites; and thus they have restored the Missal itself to the original form and rite of the holy Fathers. When this work has been gone over numerous times and further emended, after serious study and reflection, We commanded that the finished product be printed and published. 
^ The Mass of Vatican II
^ The Mass of the Consilium and the Mass of the Ages
^ God Was Worshipped Here Today
^ Meditation before Holy Mass
^ Is the Novus Ordo Mass Actually the Indult Mass?
^ Priories of the Order of Saint John of Jerusalem
^ The Mass of the Apostles
^ Cf. Extract from a Letter to a Philippine Mayor
^ Braga - Capital de Distrito
^ "Just after the Council of Trent, the study 'of ancient manuscripts in the Vatican library and elsewhere', as Saint Pius V attests in the Apostolic Constitution Quo primum, helped greatly in the correction of the Roman Missal. Since then, however, other ancient sources have been discovered and published and liturgical formularies of the Eastern Church have been studied. Accordingly, many have had the desire for these doctrinal and spiritual riches not to be stored away in the dark, but to be put into use for the enlightenment of the mind of Christians and for the nurture of their spirit" (Apostolic Constitution Missale Romanum).
^ ISBN 88-209-2547-8; publisher: Libreria Editrice Vaticana; introduction and appendix by Manlio Sodi and Achille Maria Triacca
^ Introduction to the reproduction of the editio princeps, pages XXVI-XXX
^ Introduction to the reproduction of the editio princeps, pages XXI
^ S. Cecilia in Trastevere, main altar, presbytery, ciborium
^ Helen Dietz, "The Biblical Roots of Church Orientation" in Sacred Architecture, vol. 10. Retrieved 20 July 2013.
^ Solemn Papal Mass. See further The Tridentine Mass by Paul Cavendish
^ Apostolic Constitution Si quid est
^ Missal in Catholic Encyclopedia
^ Divino afflatu
^ Mysterii Paschalis and Ordorecitandi website
^ Richard Breyer, "St. Joseph & the Mass" in Catholic Digest
^ Pope Benedict XVI's motu proprio Summorum Pontificum
^ "The Missal published by Paul VI and then republished in two subsequent editions by John Paul II, obviously is and continues to be the normal Form – the Forma ordinaria – of the Eucharistic Liturgy" (Pope Benedict XVI's letter to the bishops on the occasion of the publication of Summorum Pontificum).
^ Their dislike of the 1962 Missal is expressed for instance in a list of differences prepared by Daniel Dolan.
^ "The Collaborative International Dictionary of English v.0.48". 1913. Retrieved 2008-03-25. 
^ Chapman, John (1908). "Didache". Retrieved 2008-03-25. Let no one eat or drink of the Eucharist with you except those who have been baptized in the name of the Lord. 
^ It is an additional ceremony, not part of the Mass itself, and in the Tridentine Missal is given only in an appendix.
^ Text of Mass of the Catechumens
^ Rubrics V
^ Text in Latin and English
^ Summorum Pontificum, article 6
^ The Rubrics of the Missale Romanum 1962: VI. The Epistle, the Gradual, and everything else up to the Offertory
^ General Instruction of the Roman Missal, 66
^ Text of Mass of the Faithful
^  Herbermann, Charles, ed. (1913). "Pope St. Gregory I ("the Great")". Catholic Encyclopedia. New York: Robert Appleton Company. 
^ Santus
^ Mass of the Faithful - The Canon
^ Diptych
^ Definition of "oblation"
^ "Ab eadem parte Epistolae paretur cereus ad elevationem Sacramenti accendendus" (Rubricae generales Missalis, XX)
^ Mass of the Faithful - Closing Prayers
^ In pre-1962 editions of the Roman Missal, only the first four words, "Domine, non sum dignus", were to be said in the slightly audible voice.
^ Ritus servandus, X, 6 of the 1962 Missal
^ Latin Dictionary
^ Manlio Sodi, Achille Maria Triacca (editors), Missale Romanum: Editio Princeps (1570) (Libreria Editrice Vaticana 1988 ISBN 978-88-209-2547-5), pp. 27–36
^ Orationes ante Missam
^ Douay-Rheims Version
^ Orationes post Missam
^ Allocution Indictam ante of 30 June 1930, in Acta Apostolicae Sedis 22 (1930), page 301
^ Instruction Inter Oecumenici, 48 j
^ Pope St. Pius X said: "If you wish to hear Mass as it should be heard, you must follow with eye, heart, and mouth all that happens at the altar. Further, you must pray with the Priest the holy words said by him in the Name of Christ and which Christ says by him" (The Daily Missal and Liturgical Manual from the Editio Typica of the Roman Missal and Breviary, 1962, Baronius Press, London, 2004, p. 897).
^ They gave responses to "Kyrie eleison", "Dominus vobiscum", "Per omnia saecula saeculorum", the Gospel reading, the "Orate Fratres", "Sursum Corda", "Gratias agamus Domino Deo nostro", the conclusion of the Lord's Prayer, the "Pax Domini sit semper vobiscum" and the "Ite Missa est"
^  Herbermann, Charles, ed. (1913). "Liturgy of the Mass". Catholic Encyclopedia. New York: Robert Appleton Company. 
^ Conventual Mass (Mass of a religious community) on a Vigil, such as that of Easter, was celebrated after None, at which point the fast could be broken (see Rubricae generalis Missalis, XV, 2). Though None was in origin an afternoon prayer, it was then celebrated in the morning. Similarly, Lauds, which was originally a morning prayer, was commonly celebrated in choir on the evening before, as in the office of Tenebrae. "Private Masses" (Masses celebrated by a priest without a congregation) could, even on days of fast, be celebrated at any hour from dawn to noon (see Rubricae generalis Missalis, XV, 1). Most celebrations of the Easter Vigil were in the form of private Masses, since concelebration was not allowed.
^ The Pius X and John XXIII Missals Compared
^ Constitution on the Sacred Liturgy
^ Tres abhinc annos
^ Missale Romanum
^ Pope Benedict XVI, who has several times deplored departures on private initiative from the rite of Mass established in the 1970 revision of the Roman Missal has declared this contention unfounded, writing: "There is no contradiction between the two editions of the Roman Missal. In the history of the liturgy there is growth and progress, but no rupture. ... Needless to say, in order to experience full communion, the priests of the communities adhering to the former usage cannot, as a matter of principle, exclude celebrating according to the new books. The total exclusion of the new rite would not in fact be consistent with the recognition of its value and holiness" (Letter to the Bishops on the occasion of the publication of the Apostolic Letter motu proprio data Summorum Pontificum).
^ A Short History of the SSPX
^ Ottaviani letter
^ Ottaviani, Alfredo; Bacci, Antonio; Group of Roman Theologians. "The Ottaviani Intervention: A Critical Study of the New Mass". Catholic Tradition. Retrieved 21 November 2016. 
^ Talk on 19 November 1969
^ Talk on 26 November 1969
^ Quotation from Documentation Catholique, 1970; the full text of the letter in an English translation is given in The New "Ordo Missæ": A battle on two fronts
^ Je suis un témoin à charge contre mon temps
^ The Ottaviani Intervention - Part I, by Michael Davies
^ The Ottaviani Intervention - Part 1, by Michael Davies
^ "Special Supplement: The Ottaviani Intervention: A Critical Study of the Novus Ordo Missae". Triumph. 4 (12): 22A–22L. December 1969. Quoted in THE GREAT SACRILEGE by Fr. James F. Wathen 
^ Jones, Kenneth C. (January 2003). Index of Leading Catholic Indicators: The Church since Vatican II. Oriens Publishing. ISBN 0-9728688-0-1
^ Cf. World population
^ Collins, Roger (2009). Keepers of the Keys of Heaven: A History of the Papacy. Basic Books. pp. 488–489. ISBN 978-0-465-01195-7. 
^ English translation of Quattuor abhinc annos
^ Ecclesia Dei
^ Preface to the French edition of Die Reform der Römischen Liturgie by Klaus Gamber; partial English translation; cf. The Spirit of the Liturgy, San Francisco: Ignatius Press, 2000; and Looking Again at the Question of the Liturgy with Cardinal Ratzinger: Proceedings of the July 2001 Fontgombault Liturgical Conference, Farnborough, Hampshire: St. Michael's Abbey Press, 2002. For a Vatican condemnation of aberrant liturgical practices, see Redemptionis Sacramentum
^ Brian Mershon, "New French traditionalist priestly society founded," The Wanderer, September 18, 2006.
^ "French clerics rebel on Latin Mass," The Conservative Voice, October 29, 2006
^ Communiqué de la Fraternité Sacerdotale Saint Pie X
^ Text of the motu proprio Summorum Pontificum in Latin and English
^ Benedict XVI (2007-07-07). "Letter of His Holiness Benedict XVI to the Bishops on the occasion of the publication of the Apostolic Letter "motu proprio data" Summorum Pontificum on the use of the Roman liturgy prior to the reform of 1970". Libreria Editrice Vaticana. Retrieved 2008-03-24. 
^ Article 1 of the motu proprio. In his letter to the Bishops he said: "It is not appropriate to speak of these two versions of the Roman Missal as if they were 'two Rites'. Rather, it is a matter of a twofold use of one and the same rite."
^ Similarly, Clement VIII did not juridically abrogate the Missal of Pius V, nor did the other Popes who issued later typical editions of the Roman Missal before that of Paul VI (Urban VIII, Leo XIII, Benedict XV, John XXIII) juridically abrogate the previous editions. Even Pius V juridically abolished only those variants of the Roman Rite that had less than 200 years' antiquity.
^ Indeed, "Mass should not be celebrated without a minister or at least one of the faithful, except for a just and reasonable cause" (General Instruction of the Roman Missal, 254). Masses celebrated without the people were once called "private Masses", a term that fell out of favour in the mid-twentieth century: the 1960 Codex Rubricarum, which preceded the Second Vatican Council, declared: "The most sacred Sacrifice of the Mass celebrated according to the rites and regulations is an act of public worship offered to God in the name of Christ and the Church. Therefore, the term 'private Mass' should be avoided" (Rubricae Generales Missalis Romani, 269). Cf. Review of Mass without a Congregation: A Sign of Unity or Division?, by Fr Marian Szablewski CR.
^ In the letter to bishops by which he accompanied the motu proprio the Pope told them that the new regulations "do not in any way lessen your own authority and responsibility, either for the liturgy or for the pastoral care of your faithful." Cardinal Castrillón has stated: "The Pope has not changed the Code of Canon Law. The bishop is the moderator of the liturgy in his own diocese. But the Apostolic See is entitled to shape the sacred liturgy of the universal Church. And a bishop must act in harmony with the Apostolic See and must guarantee the rights of every believer, including that of being able to attend the mass of Saint Pius V, as extraordinary form of the rite" (30Days, June/July 2007).
^ Article 4 of the motu proprio
^ New Liturgical Movement: Important Clarifications
^ "Pope says old-rite Latin Mass should be on offer in every Catholic parish"
^ Article 5 §4 of the motu proprio says priests who use the Missal of Blessed John XXIII must not be juridically impeded.


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Tridentine Mass.


Full texts of Tridentine Roman Missals[edit]

1962 typical edition of the Roman Missal Accurately reproduced, but only in black and white. 78 Mb.
1920 typical edition of the Roman Missal, with feasts updated to the late 1920s
Missale Romanum published by Pustet, 1894 (1884 typical edition)
Roman Missal, published by Pustet, 1862 (1634 typical edition, updated to 1862)
Missale Romanum, 1577, (1570 typical edition)

Texts of parts of the Tridentine Missal (post-1604)[edit]

English translation of the Ritus servandus in celebratione Missae (The 1962 Missal left this text unaltered, but completely revised the Rubricae generales Missalis Romani. The English text, titled "Rubrics of the Missale Romanum 1962", is in fact a translation of the Ritus servandus, not of the Rubricae generales.)
Ordinary of the 1962 Roman Missal with MP3 Audio of Latin Text (Latin text with English translation)
Ordinary of the Mass, with English translation at sacred-texts.com (The text is presented as that of the 1962 edition, but the spelling of the Latin, e.g. "coelum", "quotidianum", use of the letter J, shows that, apart from the insertion of "sed et beati Ioseph eiusdem Virginis Sponsi" in the Canon of the Mass, it is really the 1920 text, identical with the 1962 text except for spelling and this insertion)
Ordinary of the Mass, with English translation (This text too is presented as that of the 1962 edition, but is the same hybrid text as in the previous site)
Term-by-term Ordinary of the Mass, with intratext grammatical notes and with English translation (The 1920 text, with "sed et beati Ioseph eiusdem Virginis Sponsi" inserted into the Canon)
An English translation of the Ordinary of the 1920/1962 Missals (the translation of the phrase "sed et beati Ioseph, eiusdem Virginis Sponsi", which marks a difference between the 1962 edition and the previous editions, is given between braces), side-by-side with the 1973 ICEL translation of the Ordinary of the 1970 Missal
F. X. Lasance, The New Roman Missal (1942) (a hand missal for the faithful)
The Roman Missal adapted to the use of the laity from the Missale Romanum incorporating rubrical changes by Pope St. Pius X in 1913
A Manual of Prayers for the Catholic Laity: The Official Prayerbook of the Catholic Church (1896) Official pew missalette adopted for American Catholics by the Third Plenary Council of Baltimore.
The Catholic's Vade Mecum: A Select Manual of Prayers for Daily Use An English Catholic prayer book and missalette published in 1850.
Roman Missal for the Use of the Laity in English and partly in Latin, published in London in 1806. Its Canon of the Mass includes the mention, by name, of the king.
The Saint John Fisher Missale Text and plainchant of the Order of Mass and other parts of the 1962 Roman Missal (e.g., propers of Sundays and First and Second Class feasts), interpolated with elements removed from the Roman Missal after 1900 but still used in many places, and with material from sources such as the pre-1570 English Sarum Missal, material that was thus never part of the Missal authorized by Pope Pius V (see Introduction).

History[edit]

Quo primum, promulgating the 1570 Roman Missal (Pope Pius V)
Cum santissimum, promulgating the 1604 Roman Missal (Pope Clement VIII)
Si quid est, promulgating the 1634 Roman Missal (Pope Urban VIII)
Apostolic Constitution Missale Romanum, promulgating the 1970 Roman Missal (Pope Paul VI)
Encyclical Mediator Dei
Liturgy of the Mass (article in Catholic Encyclopedia)
History of the 1570 Missale Romanum
Woods, Thomas E., Sacred Then and Sacred Now: The Return of the Old Latin Mass (Roman Catholic Books 2008 ISBN 978-0-9793540-2-1)
Hull, Geoffrey, The Banished Heart: Origins of Heteropraxis in the Catholic Church, 1995, rpt. T&T Clark/Continuum, London 2010. ISBN 9780567442208
Aillet, Marc, The old Mass and the new : explaining the motu proprio Summorum Pontificum of Pope Benedict XVI (Ignatius Press 2010 ISBN 978-1-58617-362-3)

Comparison with non-Roman Western rites and uses[edit]

Tridentine Ordinary of the Mass compared with the Lyonese, Bragan, Dominican, Carthusian, Carmelite, Ambrosian and Mozarabic
The ancient liturgy of the Church of England, according to the uses of Sarum, Bangor, York & Hereford and the modern Roman liturgy arranged in parallel columns Tridentine Ordinary of the Mass and Canon compared with the Medieval English uses of Sarum, Bangor, York and Hereford.

Media[edit]

Multimedia tutorial on the Tridentine Mass: Photos, Videos, and Audio
Audio and Explanation of Sacred Music - CatholicLatinMass.org
Audio files - Text of the Mass Latin Mass Society of Ireland.
Video of a 1941 Solemn High Mass narrated by Fulton Sheen
Video of a Missa Cantata, or sung Low Mass, offered on the Last Sunday after Pentecost at the Roman Catholic Parish of St. Nicholas of Chardonnet in Paris, France.
Video of a Votive Mass of the Blessed Virgin Mary offered as a Missa Cantata, or sung Low Mass, at the Roman Catholic Priory of St. Pius X in Warsaw, Poland.
Video of a Solemn High Mass celebrated at the SSPX Seminary of St. Cure d'Ars, Flavigny, France
Video of a Traditional Mass for Christmas, held at St. Roch's in West Bangor, Pa.
Another video of a Low Mass
Photographs of a Traditional (Tridentine) Mass
Forum dedicated to the Tridentine Mass
A Modern Tridentine Mass Wedding
The Extraordinary Form of the Mass - Explained (German)
Priests for the 3rd millennium (German)

Directories of Latin Masses[edit]

Ecclesia Dei's Latin Mass Directory, United States and Canada
WikkiMissa, world directory of Tridentine Mass
List of Tridentine Rite Masses in the US
List of Tridentine Rite Masses Worldwide







v
t
e


Tridentine Mass of the Catholic Church




Including the extraordinary form of the Roman Rite (1962)



Types



Chapter and conventual
Dialogue Mass
Low (Missa Cantata) and High Mass (Solemn)
Missa Sicca
Pontifical

Papal


Ritual Masses

Coronation (Papal)
Missa pro Defunctis
Nuptial


sine populo
Votive

Red







Order



Pre-Mass
Vesting prayers
Asperges me

Vidi aquam in Eastertide


Processional hymn


Mass of the Catechumens
Iudica me
Confiteor

mea culpa


Introit
Kyrie
Gloria in excelsis Deo
Collect
Lection
Gradual
Alleluia or Tract
Sequentia
Gospel
Homily


Mass of the Faithful
Credo

Niceno-Constantinopolitan Creed


Offertory

Lavabo
Orate fratres
Secret


Preface

Sursum corda
Sanctus
Hosanna


Roman Canon

oblation
epiclesis
Words of Institution
anamnesis
elevation
doxology


Pater Noster

embolism
doxology


Pax
Agnus Dei

Dona nobis pacem


Fraction
Holy Communion

Communion antiphon


Ablutions
Postcommunio
Dismissal

Ite, missa est or Benedicamus Domino


Last Gospel


Post-Mass
Leonine prayers
Recessional hymn


For funeral Mass
Dies Irae

Pie Iesu


Libera Me
Requiescant in pace
Absolution of the dead
In paradisum
De profundis





Participants



Acolyte

altar server


Bishop
Boat boy
Cantor or schola
Crucifer
Deacon
Laity
Lector
Master of ceremonies
Porter
Priest
Subdeacon





Altar



Altar cards
Altar crucifix
Altar rails
Ambo
Antependium
Credence table
Kneeler
Lavabo
Misericord
Piscina
Sacristy
Tabernacle





Altar cloths



Altar linens
Antependium
Burse
Chalice veil
Corporal
Pall
Purificator





Illumination



Altar candle
Altar candlestick
Paschal candle
Sanctuary lamp
Triple candlestick





Liturgical
objects



Altar bell
Aspergillum
Chalice
Ciborium
Collection basket
Cruet
Flabellum
Funghellino
Holy water
Incense

use


Manuterge
Paten
Processional cross
Pyx
Sacramental bread

wafer


Sacramental wine (or must)
Thurible
Water





Literature



Cæremoniale Episcoporum
Missale Romanum
Pontificale Romanum
Rituale Romanum





Vestments
(Pontifical/Papal)



Alb
Amice
Chasuble
Cincture
Cope
Crosier
Dalmatic
Episcopal gloves
Ecclesiastical ring
Episcopal sandals
Falda
Humeral veil
Liturgical colours
Mitre
Pallium
Papal fanon
Papal tiara
Pectoral cross
Stole
Sub-cinctorium
Superhumerale
Surplice
Tunicle
Vimpa





Music



Antiphon
Graduale Romanum
Gregorian chant
Hymn
Kyriale Romanum
Liber Usualis
Music for the Requiem Mass
Organ

voluntary


Organum
Polyphony
Reciting tone

Accentus
Recto tono


Tonary

Gregorian Antiphonary







Liturgical year
Calendar
(1954/1955/1960)



Advent
Christmastide
Epiphanytide
Septuagesima
Lent
Passiontide
Holy Week

Paschal Triduum


Eastertide
Ascensiontide
After Pentecost


Calendar of saints
Holy day of obligation
Moveable feast
Octaves


Ranking of liturgical days: Solemnity
Memorial
Commemoration
Feria





Discipline



Church etiquette
Closed communion
Communion and the developmentally disabled
Communion under both kinds
Denial of Communion

Canon 915


Eucharistic fast
First Communion
Genuflection
Headcover
Host desecration
Infant communion
Reserved sacrament
Sign of the Cross
Thanksgiving after Communion
Viaticum





Theology



Blessed Sacrament
Body and Blood of Christ
Corpus Christi (feast)
Crucifixion of Jesus and substitutionary atonement
Epiousios
Eucharistic miracle
Grace ex opere operato
In persona Christi
Historical roots of Catholic Eucharistic theology
Koinonia
Last Supper
Origin of the Eucharist
Priesthood of Melchizedek
Pro multis
Real presence
Transubstantiation





Concepts



Ad orientem
Canon law
Code of Rubrics
Concelebration
Dominus vobiscum
Ecclesiastical Latin
Good Friday prayer for the Jews
Intercession of saints
Ordinary & propers (common)
Oremus
Sunday

Lord's Day


Text and rubrics of the Roman Canon
Vulgate (Sixto-Clementine)

Latin Psalters







Related



Agape feast
Alternatim
Anaphora
Anima Christi
Aspersion
Catholic liturgy
Coetus Internationalis Patrum
Communities using the Tridentine Mass

Indult Catholic
traditionalist Catholic


Congregation for Divine Worship
Council of Trent
Deutsche Singmesse
Divine Office

Canonical hours
Choir dress
Roman Breviary


Eucharistic adoration & benediction

Holy Hour
Forty Hours' Devotion


Fasting and abstinence in the Roman Catholic Church
Fourth Council of the Lateran
French Organ Mass
Gospel Book
History of the Roman Canon
Latin liturgical rites
Latin Mass
Lex orandi, lex credendi
Litany
Liturgical Movement
Liturgical reforms of Pope Pius XII
Mass of Paul VI
Missal
Plenary indulgence
Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei
Pope Pius V
Preces
Pre-Tridentine Mass
Quattuor abhinc annos
Quo primum
Roman Catholic theology
Sacramentary
Sacraments of the Catholic Church
Spoon (liturgy)
Summorum Pontificum
Tra le sollecitudini
Western Rite Orthodoxy








 Catholicism portal










Links to related articles











v
t
e


Sacraments, rites, and liturgies of the Catholic Church



Sacraments



Baptism
Confirmation
Eucharist
Penance
Anointing of the Sick
Holy Orders
Matrimony








Mass



Low Mass
Missa Cantata
Solemn Mass
Pontifical High Mass
Papal Mass





Canonical
liturgical hours



Matins (nighttime)
Lauds (early morning)
Prime (first hour of daylight)
Terce (third hour)
Sext (noon)
Nones (ninth hour)
Vespers (sunset evening)
Compline (end of the day)





Other liturgical services



Asperges
Benediction of the Blessed Sacrament
Exorcism
Funeral

Requiem


Liturgy of the Hours





Liturgical literature



Antiphonary
Book of hours
Breviary
Gospel Book
Gradual
Lectionary
Martyrology
Psalter
Roman Missal
Roman Ritual
Sacramentary





Rites




Latin



Ambrosian Rite
Rite of Braga
Roman Rite

Mass of Paul VI
Extraordinary form
Anglican Use
Zaire Use







Eastern



Alexandrian Rite
Armenian Rite
Antiochene Rite
Byzantine Rite
East Syrian Rite
Mozarabic Rite
West Syrian Rite: Malankara Rite





Orders



Benedictine Rite
Carmelite Rite
Carthusian Rite
Cistercian Rite
Dominican Rite
Norbertine Rite





Defunct rites
and liturgies



African Rite
Aquileian Rite
Celtic Rite
Durham Rite
Gallican Rite
Use of Hereford
Missa Nautica
Missa Sicca
Missa Venatoria
Pre-Tridentine Mass
Use of York
Sarum Rite











 Catholicism portal












v
t
e


History of the Roman Rite Mass



Forms



Pre-Tridentine Mass
Tridentine Mass (Extraordinary form)
Mass of Paul VI (Ordinary form)








Calendars



Tridentine Calendar
General Roman Calendar of 1954
General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII
General Roman Calendar of 1960
General Roman Calendar (current)








 Catholicism portal












v
t
e


Traditionalist Catholicism




Movements advocating Catholic traditions less emphasised or abolished by the Second Vatican Council (1962–1965)



Groups and
movements





Part of the Roman Curia




Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei






In full communion
with the Holy See




Priestly Fraternity of St. Peter
Institute of Christ the King Sovereign Priest
Latin Mass Society of England and Wales
Personal Apostolic Administration of Saint John Mary Vianney
Institute of the Good Shepherd
Sons of the Most Holy Redeemer
Slaves of the Immaculate Heart of Mary
Fraternity of Saint Vincent Ferrer
Canons Regular of Saint John Cantius
Canons Regular of the New Jerusalem
Fœderatio Internationalis Juventutem
Fœderatio Internationalis Una Voce
Indult Catholics






Canonically irregular




Fraternité Notre-Dame
Society of Saint Pius X
SSPX Resistance






Sedevacantist




Conclavism
Sedeprivationism
Siri thesis
Congregation of Mary Immaculate Queen
Istituto Mater Boni Consilii
Society of St. Pius V








Doctrines,
rites and issues



Second Vatican Council
Modernism
Pascendi dominici gregis
Tridentine Mass
Mass of Paul VI
Summorum Pontificum
Ecumenism
Freedom of religion
Syllabus of Errors
Dignitatis humanae
Extra Ecclesiam nulla salus
"Papal Oath"





Prominent
people



Pope Pius X
Pope Pius XII
Pope Benedict XVI
Archbishop Marcel Lefebvre
Bishop Bernard Fellay
Bishop Richard Williamson
Bishop Antônio de Castro Mayer
Archbishop Ngô Đình Thục
Bishop Daniel Dolan
Fr. Gommar DePauw
Fr. Leonard Feeney
Joaquín Sáenz y Arriaga
Michael Davies








 Catholicism portal












v
t
e


Structure of the Mass of the Roman Rite of the Catholic Church



Forms



Pre-Tridentine Mass
Tridentine Mass

Extraordinary form


Mass of Paul VI





Types



Low Mass
Missa Cantata
Solemn Mass
Pontifical High Mass
Papal Mass
Ritual Masses

Blue Mass
Chapter and Conventual Mass
Coronation Mass
Nuptial Mass
Red Mass
Requiem Mass


sine populo
Votive Mass





Order of Mass





Pre-Mass




Vesting prayers in the sacristy
Asperges me

Vidi aquam in Eastertide








Liturgy of
the Word




Sign of the Cross
Psalm 43
Entrance Antiphon
Penitential Rite

Confiteor / Kyrie


Gloria
Dominus vobiscum
Collect

Oremus


First Reading
Responsorial Psalm or Gradual
Epistle
Alleluia

Gospel verse / sequence


Gospel
Homily
Credo

Niceno-Constantinopolitan Creed or Apostles' Creed


General Intercessions






Liturgy of
the Eucharist




Offertory

Orate fratres / prayer over the gifts


Preface

Sursum corda / Sanctus / Hosanna


Eucharistic Prayer/Canon of the Mass

oblation / epiclesis / Words of Institution / elevation / anamnesis
texts & rubrics
Roman Canon

History


Eucharistic Prayer II


Memorial Acclamation
Lord's Prayer

embolism / doxology


Pax
Sign of peace
Agnus Dei
Fraction
Holy Communion

Communion antiphon


Ablutions
Postcommunion
Dismissal

Ite, missa est / Benedicamus Domino


Last Gospel






Post-Mass




Leonine Prayers
Recessional hymn








Participants



Acolyte
Altar server

female


Bishop
Boat boy
Cantor
Choir
Crucifer
Deacon
Extraordinary minister of Holy Communion
Laity

Eucharistic Congress


Lector
Priest
Subdeacon
Usher





Parts of the
Sanctuary / Altar



Altar crucifix
Altar rails
Ambo
Communion bench
Credence table
Kneeler
Lavabo
Misericord
Piscina
Tabernacle





Altar cloths



Altar linens
Antependium
Burse
Chalice veil
Corporal
Lavabo towel
Pall
Purificator





Candles and lamps



Altar candle
Altar candlestick
Paschal candle
Sanctuary lamp
Triple candlestick
Votive candle





Liturgical objects



Altar bell
Aspergillum
Censer
Chalice
Ciborium
Collection basket
Cruet
Flabellum
Funghellino
Holy water
Incense

use


Manuterge
Paten
Processional cross
Pyx
Sacramental bread

wafer


Sacramental wine (or must)
Thurible
Water





Liturgical books
of the Roman Rite



Ceremonial of Bishops
Evangeliary

Gospel Book


Graduale
Lectionary
Roman Missal





Vestments



Alb
Amice
Chasuble
Dalmatic
Episcopal sandals
Liturgical colours
Headcover
Humeral veil
Pallium
Pontifical
Stole
Surplice
Tunicle
Vimpa





Liturgical year
(Roman Calendar)



Advent
Christmastide
Ordinary Time
Septuagesima
Lent
Passiontide
Holy Week

Paschal Triduum


Eastertide
Ascensiontide





Eucharistic
discipline



Abstemius
Anima Christi
Concelebration
Church etiquette
Closed communion
Communion and the developmentally disabled
Communion under both kinds
Denial of Communion

Canon 915


Eucharistic fast
First Communion
Frequent Communion
Genuflection
Host desecration
Infant communion
Intinction
Reserved sacrament
Thanksgiving after Communion
Viaticum





Eucharistic
theology



Body and Blood of Christ
Corpus Christi (feast)
Crucifixion of Jesus and substitutionary atonement
Epiousios
Grace ex opere operato
In persona Christi
Historical roots of Catholic Eucharistic theology
Koinonia
Last Supper
Mirae caritatis
Mysterium fidei (encyclical)
Origin of the Eucharist
Real presence
Transubstantiation
Year of the Eucharist
Stercoranism





Regulations
and concepts



Ad orientem & versus populum
Calendar of saints
Canon law
Code of Rubrics
Commemoration
Ecclesiastical Latin
General Instruction of the Roman Missal
Holy day of obligation
Intercession of saints
Ordinary & propers
Pro multis
Sunday

Lord's Day


Vernacular





Related



Agape feast
Catholic liturgy
Christian prayer

effects of prayer


Congregation for Divine Worship
Council of Trent
Ecclesia de Eucharistia
Eucharistic adoration & benediction

Dominicae Cenae / Holy Hour


Eucharistic miracle
Fermentum
Fourth Council of the Lateran
Gelineau psalmody
Gregorian chant
History of the Roman Canon
Lex orandi, lex credendi
Liturgical Movement
Liturgical reforms of Pope Pius XII
Mediator Dei
Missale Romanum (apostolic constitution)
Pope Paul VI
Catholic theology
Sacraments of the Catholic Church
Second Vatican Council

Sacrosanctum Concilium


Tridentine Mass
Summorum Pontificum
Tra le sollecitudini








 Catholicism portal















 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Tridentine_Mass&oldid=792722104"					
Categories: Tridentine MassCatholic liturgical ritesCatholic termsHidden categories: Articles incorporating a citation from the 1913 Catholic Encyclopedia with Wikisource referenceArticles containing Latin-language text 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БеларускаяCatalàČeštinaDeutschEspañolEsperantoFrançaisGaeilge한국어HrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaItalianoKiswahiliNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 28 July 2017, at 06:51.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Tridentine Mass - Wikipedia






















 






Tridentine Mass

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the forms of the Mass liturgy prior to 1570, see Pre-Tridentine Mass.




Elevation of the chalice after the consecration during a Solemn Mass


The Tridentine Mass, now officially often referred to as the Extraordinary Form of the Roman Rite ('Extraordinary Form for short; Latin: forma extraordinaria), is the Roman Rite Mass which appears in typical editions of the Roman Missal published from 1570 to 1962.[1] The most widely used Mass liturgy in the world until the introduction of the Mass of Paul VI in 1969, it is celebrated in ecclesiastical Latin.[2]
"Tridentine" is derived from the Latin Tridentinus, "related to the city of Tridentum" (modern-day Trent, Italy). In response to a decision of the Council of Trent,[3] Pope Pius V promulgated the 1570 Roman Missal, making it mandatory throughout the Latin Church, except in places and religious orders with missals from before 1370.[4] Despite being often described as "the (Traditional) Latin Mass", the Mass of Paul VI (the Novus Ordo Missae) that replaced it as the Ordinary Form of the Roman Rite has its official text in Latin and is sometimes celebrated in that language.[5][6]
In 2007, Pope Benedict XVI issued the motu proprio Summorum Pontificum, accompanied by a letter to the world's bishops authorizing use of the Tridentine Mass and Ritual for competent priests. The Pope stated that the 1962 edition of the Roman Missal is to be considered an "extraordinary form" (forma extraordinaria)[7] of the Roman Rite, of which the 1970 Mass of Paul VI is the ordinary, normal or standard form. Since that is the only authorized extraordinary form, some refer to the 1962 Tridentine Mass as "the extraordinary form" of the Mass.[8] The 1962 Tridentine Mass is sometimes referred to as the "usus antiquior" (older use) or "forma antiquior" (older form),[9] to differentiate it from the Mass of Paul VI, again in the sense of being the only one of the older forms for which authorization has been granted.
In Masses celebrated without the people, Latin Rite Catholic priests are free to use either the 1962 Tridentine missal or the Ordinary Form missal. These Masses "may—observing all the norms of law—also be attended by faithful who, of their own free will, ask to be admitted".[10] Permission to use the Tridentine Mass as parish liturgies may be given by the pastor or rector.[11]



Contents


1 Language
2 Terminology
3 Pope St. Pius V's revision of the liturgy
4 Historical variations

4.1 Typical editions of the Roman Missal
4.2 1962 Missal


5 Liturgical structure

5.1 Before Mass
5.2 Mass of the Catechumens

5.2.1 Prayers at the foot of the altar
5.2.2 Priest at the altar
5.2.3 Instruction


5.3 Mass of the Faithful

5.3.1 Offertory
5.3.2 Consecration
5.3.3 Elevation candle
5.3.4 Communion
5.3.5 Conclusion


5.4 Prayers of the priest before and after Mass
5.5 Leonine Prayers
5.6 Participation by the people


6 Different levels of celebration
7 Revision of the Roman Missal

7.1 Opposition to the latest revisions of the liturgy


8 Attitudes of Popes since the Second Vatican Council

8.1 Pope Paul VI
8.2 Pope John Paul II
8.3 Pope Benedict XVI


9 Present regulations
10 Present practice
11 See also
12 References
13 External links

13.1 Full texts of Tridentine Roman Missals
13.2 Texts of parts of the Tridentine Missal (post-1604)
13.3 History
13.4 Comparison with non-Roman Western rites and uses
13.5 Media
13.6 Directories of Latin Masses





Language[edit]
In most countries, the language used for celebrating the Tridentine Mass was (and is) Latin. However, in Dalmatia and parts of Istria in Croatia, the liturgy was celebrated in Church Slavonic, and authorisation for use of this language was extended to some other Slavic regions between 1886 and 1935.[12][13]
After the publication of the 1962 edition of the Roman Missal, the 1964 Instruction on implementing the Constitution on Sacred Liturgy of the Second Vatican Council laid down that "normally the epistle and gospel from the Mass of the day shall be read in the vernacular". Episcopal conferences were to decide, with the consent of the Holy See, what other parts, if any, of the Mass were to be celebrated in the vernacular.[14]
Outside the Roman Catholic Church, the vernacular language was introduced into the celebration of the Tridentine Mass by some Old Catholics and Anglo-Catholics with the introduction of the English Missal.
Some Western Rite Orthodox Christians, particularly in the Antiochian Orthodox Archdiocese of North America, use the Tridentine Mass in the vernacular with minor alterations under the title of the "Divine Liturgy of St. Gregory".
Most Old Catholics use the Tridentine Mass, either in the vernacular or in Latin.
Terminology[edit]




A pre-1969 Roman Rite high altar decorated with reredos and fixed on a three step platform, at which the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar are said. Leaning against the Tabernacle and two of the candlesticks are altar cards to remind the celebrant of the words when he is away from the missal


The Catholic Church uses the term extraordinary form of the Roman Rite Mass among other terms.[7] The most widespread term for the rite, other than "Tridentine Mass", is "Latin Mass". Likewise, the ordinary form of the Roman Rite Mass was promulgated in Latin and can be celebrated in that language.[15]
Occasionally the term "Gregorian Rite" is used when talking about the Tridentine Mass,[16][discuss] as is, more frequently, "Tridentine Rite".[17] Pope Benedict XVI declared it inappropriate to speak of the versions of the Roman Missal of before and after 1970 as if they were two rites. Rather, he said, it is a matter of a twofold use of one and the same rite.[18]
Traditionalist Catholics, whose best-known characteristic is an attachment to the Tridentine Mass, frequently refer to it as the "Traditional Mass" or the "Traditional Latin Mass". They describe as a "codifying" of the form of the Mass the preparation of Pius V's edition of the Roman Missal, of which he said that the experts to whom he had entrusted the work collated the existing text with ancient manuscripts and writings, restored it to "the original form and rite of the holy Fathers" and further emended it.[19] To distinguish this form of Mass from the Mass of Paul VI, traditionalist Catholics sometimes call it the "Mass of the Ages",[20][21][22][23][24][25] and say that it comes down to us "from the Church of the Apostles, and ultimately, indeed, from Him Who is its principal Priest and its spotless Victim".[26][27]
Pope St. Pius V's revision of the liturgy[edit]
At the time of the Council of Trent, the traditions preserved in printed and manuscript missals varied considerably, and standardization was sought both within individual dioceses and throughout the Latin West. Standardization was required also in order to prevent the introduction into the liturgy of Protestant ideas in the wake of the Protestant Reformation.
Pope St. Pius V accordingly imposed uniformity by law in 1570 with the papal bull "Quo primum", ordering use of the Roman Missal as revised by him.[19] He allowed only those rites that were at least 200 years old to survive the promulgation of his 1570 Missal. Several of the rites that remained in existence were progressively abandoned, though the Ambrosian rite survives in Milan, Italy and neighbouring areas, stretching even into Switzerland, and the Mozarabic rite remains in use to a limited extent in Toledo and Madrid, Spain. The Carmelite, Carthusian and Dominican religious orders kept their rites, but in the second half of the 20th century two of these three chose to adopt the Roman Rite. The rite of Braga, in northern Portugal, seems to have been practically abandoned: since 18 November 1971 that archdiocese authorizes its use only on an optional basis.[28]
Beginning in the late 17th century, France and neighbouring areas, such as Münster, Cologne and Trier in Germany, saw a flurry of independent missals published by bishops influenced by Jansenism and Gallicanism. This ended when Abbot Guéranger and others initiated in the 19th century a campaign to return to the Roman Missal.
Pius V's revision of the liturgy had as one of its declared aims the restoration of the Roman Missal "to the original form and rite of the holy Fathers".[19] Due to the relatively limited resources available to his scholars, this aim was in fact not realised.[29]
Three different printings of Pius V's Roman Missal, with minor variations, appeared in 1570, a folio and a quarto edition in Rome and a folio edition in Venice. A reproduction of what is considered to be the earliest, referred to therefore as the editio princeps, was produced in 1998.[30] In the course of the printing of the editio princeps, some corrections were made by pasting revised texts over parts of the already printed pages.[31] There were several printings again in the following year 1571, with various corrections of the text.[32]
Historical variations[edit]




Missale Romanum in Croatian Glagolitic script printed in 1483


In the Apostolic Constitution (papal bull) Quo primum, with which he prescribed use of his 1570 edition of the Roman Missal, Pius V decreed: "We order and enjoin that nothing must be added to Our recently published Missal, nothing omitted from it, nor anything whatsoever be changed within it." This of course did not exclude changes by a Pope, and Pope Pius V himself added to the Missal the feast of Our Lady of Victory, to celebrate the victory of Lepanto of 7 October 1571. His immediate successor, Pope Gregory XIII, changed the name of this feast to "The Most Holy Rosary of the Blessed Virgin Mary" and Pope John XXIII changed it to "Our Lady of the Rosary".
Pius V's work in severely reducing the number of feasts in the Roman Calendar (see this comparison) was very soon further undone by his successors. Feasts that he had abolished, such as those of the Presentation of Mary, Saint Anne and Saint Anthony of Padua, were restored even before Clement VIII's 1604 typical edition of the Missal was issued.
In the course of the following centuries new feasts were repeatedly added and the ranks of certain feasts were raised or lowered. A comparison between Pope Pius V's Tridentine Calendar and the General Roman Calendar of 1954 shows the changes made from 1570 to 1954. Pope Pius XII made a general revision in 1955, and Pope John XXIII made further general revisions in 1960 simplifying the terminology concerning the ranking of liturgical celebrations.
While keeping on 8 December what he called the feast of "the Conception of Blessed Mary" (omitting the word "Immaculate"), Pius V suppressed the existing special Mass for the feast, directing that the Mass for the Nativity of Mary (with the word "Nativity" replaced by "Conception") be used instead. Part of that earlier Mass was revived in the Mass that Pope Pius IX ordered to be used on the feast.
Typical editions of the Roman Missal[edit]




Altar of Santa Cecilia in Trastevere, as arranged in 1700:[33] one of many churches in Rome whose altar, placed at the western end of the church, was positioned so that the priest necessarily faced east, and so towards the people, when celebrating Mass[34]


In addition to such occasional changes, the Roman Missal was subjected to general revisions whenever a new "typical edition" (an official edition whose text was to be reproduced in printings by all publishers) was issued.
After Pius V's original Tridentine Roman Missal, the first new typical edition was promulgated in 1604 by Pope Clement VIII, who in 1592 had issued a revised edition of the Vulgate. The Bible texts in the Missal of Pope Pius V did not correspond exactly to the new Vulgate, and so Clement edited and revised Pope Pius V's Missal, making alterations both in the scriptural texts and in other matters. He abolished some prayers that the 1570 Missal obliged the priest to say on entering the church; shortened the two prayers to be said after the Confiteor; directed that the words "Haec quotiescumque feceritis, in meam memoriam facietis" ("Do this in memory of me") should not be said while displaying the chalice to the people after the consecration, but before doing so; inserted directions at several points of the Canon that the priest was to pronounce the words inaudibly; suppressed the rule that, at High Mass, the priest, even if not a bishop, was to give the final blessing with three signs of the cross; and rewrote the rubrics, introducing, for instance, the ringing of a small bell.[35]
The next typical edition was issued in 1634, when Pope Urban VIII made another general revision of the Roman Missal.[36]
There was no further typical edition until that of Pope Leo XIII in 1884.[37] It introduced only minor changes, not profound enough to merit having the papal bull of its promulgation included in the Missal, as the bulls of 1604 and 1634 were.
In 1911, with the bull Divino Afflatu,[38] Pope Pius X made significant changes in the rubrics. He died in 1914, so it fell to his successor Pope Benedict XV to issue a new typical edition incorporating his changes. This 1920 edition included a new section headed: "Additions and Changes in the Rubrics of the Missal in accordance with the Bull Divino afflatu and the Subsequent Decrees of the Sacred Congregation of Rites". This additional section was almost as long as the previous section on the "General Rubrics of the Missal", which continued to be printed unchanged.
Pope Pius XII radically revised the Palm Sunday and Easter Triduum liturgy, suppressed many vigils and octaves and made other alterations in the calendar (see General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII), reforms that were completed in Pope John XXIII's 1960 Code of Rubrics, which were incorporated in the final 1962 typical edition of the Tridentine Missal, replacing both Pius X's "Additions and Changes in the Rubrics of the Missal" and the earlier "General Rubrics of the Missal".
Changes made to the liturgy in 1965 and 1967 in the wake of decisions of the Second Vatican Council were not incorporated in the Roman Missal, but were reflected in the provisional vernacular translations produced when the language of the people began to be used in addition to Latin. This explains the references sometimes seen to "the 1965 Missal".
The General Roman Calendar was revised partially in 1955 and 1960 and completely in 1969 in Pope Paul VI's motu proprio Mysterii Paschalis, again reducing the number of feasts.[39]
1962 Missal[edit]
The Roman Missal issued by Pope John XXIII in 1962 differed from earlier editions in a number of ways.

It incorporated the change made by John XXIII in 1962, when he inserted into the canon of the Mass the name of Saint Joseph, the first change for centuries in the canon of the Mass.[40]
It incorporated major changes that Pope Pius XII made in 1955 in the liturgy of Palm Sunday and the Easter Triduum. These included:

Abolition of the ceremonies whereby the blessing of palms on Palm Sunday resembled a Mass, with Epistle, Gospel, Preface and Sanctus; suppression of the knocking three times on the closed doors before returning to the church after the blessing and distribution of the palms; omission of the prayers at the foot of the altar and of the Last Gospel.
On Holy Thursday the washing of feet was incorporated into the Mass instead of being an independent ceremony; if done by a bishop, 12 men, not 13, had their feet washed; the Mass itself was said in the evening instead of the morning and some of its prayers were removed or altered.
On Good Friday, elements that suggested the usual practices of the Mass were removed: the sacred ministers began the liturgy in alb and (for celebrant and deacon) black stoles, rather than respectively in black chasuble, dalmatic, and tunicle, as per a typical Mass; the sacred ministers donned their vestments (without maniples) only for the Solemn Intercessions, in which the celebrant wore a cope instead of a chasuble, and removed them for the adoration of the Cross; the sacred ministers changed to violet vestments (again, without maniples) for the distribution of Holy Communion; "Let us pray. Let us kneel. Arise" was added at the prayer for the Jews, and the adjective perfidis was removed (see Good Friday Prayer for the Jews); an afternoon Communion Service replaced the morning Mass of the Presanctified, at which the priest alone received the earlier-consecrated host, and drank unconsecrated wine into which a small portion of the consecrated host had been put.
The Easter Vigil was moved from Holy Saturday morning to the following nighttime; the use of a triple candle was abolished and other changes were made both to the initial ceremonies centred on the Paschal Candle and to other parts, such as the reduction from twelve to four of the prophecies read, and the introduction of a "renewal of baptismal promises" for the laity (notable for being the first time since the codification of the Missal of Pope Pius V that the vernacular was permitted to be used in such a manner).


It incorporated the rubrical changes made by Pope Pius XII's 1955 decree Cum nostra, which included:

Vigils were abolished except those of Easter, Christmas, Ascension, Pentecost, Saints Peter and Paul, Saint John the Baptist, and Saint Lawrence;
all octaves were abolished except those of Easter, Christmas and Pentecost;
no more than three collects were to be said at Low Mass and one at Solemn Mass.


Its calendar incorporated both the changes made by Pope Pius XII in 1955 (General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII) and those introduced by Pope John XXIII himself with his 1960 Code of Rubrics (General Roman Calendar of 1960). These included:

suppression of the "Solemnity of Saint Joseph, Spouse of the Blessed Virgin Mary" (Wednesday after the second Sunday after Easter) and its replacement by the feast of "Saint Joseph the Worker" (1 May);
removal of some duplicate feasts that appeared twice in earlier versions of the calendar, namely, the Chair of Saint Peter at Rome (18 January), the Finding of the Holy Cross (3 May), Saint John before the Latin Gate (6 May), the Apparition of Saint Michael (8 May), Saint Peter in Chains (1 August), and the Invention of the Relics of Saint Stephen (3 August);
addition of feasts such as that of the Queenship of Mary (31 May).


It replaced the Roman Missal's introductory sections, Rubricae generales Missalis (General Rubrics of the Missal) and Additiones et variationes in rubricis Missalis ad normam Bullae "Divino afflatu" et subsequentium S.R.C. Decretorum (Additions and alterations to the Rubrics of the Missal in line with the Bull Divino afflatu and the subsequent decrees of the Sacred Congregation of Rites), with the text of the General Rubrics and the General Rubrics of the Roman Missal parts of the 1960 Code of Rubrics.

Pope Benedict XVI authorized, under certain conditions, continued use of this 1962 edition of the Roman Missal as an extraordinary form of the Roman Rite,[41] alongside the later form, introduced in 1970, which is now the normal or ordinary form.[42] Pre-1962 forms of the Roman Rite, which some individuals and groups employ,[43] are not authorized for liturgical use.
Liturgical structure[edit]
The Mass is divided into two parts, the Mass of the Catechumens and the Mass of the Faithful. Catechumens, those being instructed in the faith,[44] were once dismissed after the first half, not having yet professed the faith. Profession of faith was considered essential for participation in the Eucharistic sacrifice.[45]
This rule of the Didache is still in effect. It is only one of the three conditions (baptism, right faith and right living) for admission to receiving Holy Communion that the Catholic Church has always applied and that were already mentioned in the early 2nd century by Saint Justin Martyr: "And this food is called among us the Eucharist, of which no one is allowed to partake but the man who believes that the things which we teach are true, and who has been washed with the washing that is for the remission of sins, and unto regeneration, and who is so living as Christ has enjoined" (First Apology, Chapter LXVI).
Before Mass[edit]

Asperges (Sprinkling with holy water, Psalm 51:9, 3) is an optional penitential rite that ordinarily precedes only the principal Mass on Sunday.[46] In the sacristy, a priest wearing an alb, if he is to celebrate the Mass, or surplice, if he is not the celebrant of the Mass, and vested with a stole, which is the color of the day if the priest is the celebrant of the Mass or purple if he is not the celebrant of the Mass, exorcises and blesses salt and water, then puts the blessed salt into the water by thrice sprinkling it in the form of a cross while saying once, "Commixtio salis et aquæ pariter fiat in nomine Patris, et Filii et Spiritus Sancti" (May a mixture of salt and water now be made in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Spirit). After that, the priest, vested in a cope of the color of the day, while the choir sings an antiphon and a verse of Psalm 50/51 or 117/118, sprinkles with the holy water the altar three times, and then the clergy and the congregation. This rite, if used, precedes the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar. During the Easter season, the "Asperges me..." verse is replaced by the "Vidi aquam..." verse, and "Alleluia" is added to the "Ostende nobis..." verse and to its response.

Following the Asperges, Mass begins.
Mass of the Catechumens[edit]
The first part is the Mass of the Catechumens.[47]
Prayers at the foot of the altar[edit]




Prayers at the foot of the altar


The sequence of Prayers at the foot of the altar is:

Sign of the cross


The priest, after processing in—at solemn Mass with deacon, and subdeacon, master of ceremonies and servers, and at other Masses with one or more servers—and at Low Mass placing the veiled chalice on the centre of the altar, makes the sign of the cross at the foot of the altar. At Solemn Mass, the chalice is placed beforehand on the credence table.


Psalm 42 (Psalm 43 MT, i.e. Masoretic numbering), known by its incipit Iudica me, is recited, except in Masses of the season during Passiontide and in Requiem Masses. It is preceded and followed by an antiphon of Psalm 42:4 (43:4 MT) "Introibo ad altare Dei, ad Deum qui lætificat iuventutem meam" (Translation: "I shall go in to the altar of God, the God who gives joy to my youth"), is recited by the priest, alternating with the deacon and subdeacon (if present) or servers.
Psalm 124:8 is recited:


Priest (makes the sign of the cross): "Our help is in the name of the Lord,"
Servers: "Who made heaven and earth."


The double form of a prayer of general confession of sins, known by its incipit Confiteor (I confess), is recited:


Priest (while bowing low): "Confíteor Deo omnipoténti, beátæ Maríæ semper Vírgini, beáto Michaéli Archángelo, beáto Ioanni Baptístæ, sanctis Apóstolis Petro et Paulo, ómnibus Sanctis, et vobis, fratres (tibi, Pater), quia peccávi nimis cogitatióne, verbo et ópere: (while striking the breast three times) mea culpa, mea culpa, mea máxima culpa. Ideo precor beátam Maríam semper Vírginem, beátum Michaélem Archángelum, beátum Ioánnem Baptístam, sanctos Apóstolos Petrum et Paulum, omnes Sanctos, et vos, fratres (te, Pater), oráre pro me ad Dóminum Deum nostrum."

(Translation: I confess to almighty God, to blessed Mary ever Virgin, to blessed Michael the archangel, to blessed John the Baptist, to the holy apostles Peter and Paul, to all the saints, and to you, brethren, that I have sinned exceedingly in thought, word, and deed through my fault, through my fault, through my most grievous fault. Therefore, I beseech blessed Mary ever Virgin ... and you, brethren, to pray to the Lord our God for me.)


The servers pray for the priest: "May Almighty God have mercy on thee, forgive thee thy sins, and bring thee to life everlasting." Then it is the ministers' or servers' turn to confess sinfulness and to ask for prayers. They use the same words as those used by the priest, except that they say "you, Father," in place of "you, brethren", and the priest responds with the same prayer that the servers have used for him (but using the plural number) plus an extra prayer.


Some verses are then said by priest and ministers (or servers), ending with the priest saying Oremus te Domine (Let us pray) After this he ascends to the altar, praying silently "Take away from us our iniquities" "that with pure minds we may worthily enter into the holy of holies", a reference to Exodus 26:33-34, 1 Kings 6:16, 1 Kings 8:6, 2 Chronicles 3:8, Ezekiel 41:4, and others. He places his joined hands on the edge of the altar, so that only the tips of the small fingers touch the front of it, and silently prays that, by the merits of the Saints whose relics are in the altar, God may pardon all his sins. At the words quorum relíquiæ hic sunt (whose relics are here), he spreads his hands and kisses the altar.

Priest at the altar[edit]




Dominus vobiscum ("The Lord be with you") before the Collect.
In the Tridentine Mass the priest should keep his eyes downcast at this point.[48]



Introit

The priest again makes the sign of the Cross while he begins to read the Introit, which is usually taken from a Psalm. Exceptions occur: e.g. the Introit for Easter Sunday is adapted from Wis 10:20-21, and the antiphon in Masses of the Blessed Virgin Mary was from the poet Sedulius. This evolved from the practice of singing a full Psalm, interspersed with the antiphon, during the entrance of the clergy, before the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar were added to the Mass in medieval times. This is indicated by the very name of "Introit".


Kyrie

This part of Mass is a linguistic marker of the origins of the Roman liturgy in Greek. "Kyrie, eleison; Christe, eleison; Kyrie, eleison." means "Lord, have mercy; Christ have mercy;..." Each phrase is said (or sung) three times.


Gloria in excelsis Deo

The first line of the Gloria[49] is taken from Lk 2:14. The Gloria is omitted during the penitential liturgical seasons of Advent, Septuagesima, Lent, and Passiontide, in which violet vestments are worn, but is used on feasts falling during such seasons, as well as on Holy Thursday. It is always omitted for a Requiem Mass.


The Collect

The priest turns toward the people and says, "Dominus vobiscum." The servers respond: "Et cum spiritu tuo." ("The Lord be with you." "And with thy spirit"). The Collect follows, a prayer not drawn directly from Scripture. It tends to reflect the season.



Instruction[edit]

The priest reads the Epistle, primarily an extract from the letters of St. Paul to various churches. In his motu proprio Summorum Pontificum, Pope Benedict XVI has permitted this to be read in the vernacular language when Mass is celebrated with the people.[50]
Between the Epistle and the Gospel two (rarely three) choir responses are sung or said. Usually these are a Gradual followed by an Alleluia; but between Septuagesima Sunday and Holy Saturday, or in a Requiem Mass or other penitential Mass the Alleluia is replaced by a Tract, and between Easter Sunday and Pentecost the Gradual is replaced by a second Alleluia. On a few exceptional occasions (most notably Easter, Pentecost, Corpus Christi, and in a Requiem Mass), a Sequence follows the Alleluia or Tract.

The Gradual is partly composed of a portion of a Psalm.


The Gospel reading, an extract from one of the four Gospels

Before the reading or chanting of the Gospel, the priest prays: "Cleanse my heart and my lips, O almighty God, who didst cleanse the lips of the prophet Isaias...", a reference to Isaiah 6:6. In this passage, after being cleansed by the angel, Isaiah was instructed to prophesy.


The Homily

The rite of Mass as revised by Pope Pius V (the Tridentine Mass) does not consider a sermon obligatory and speaks of it instead as merely optional: it presumes that the Creed, if it is to be said, will follow the Gospel immediately, but adds: "If, however, someone is to preach, the Homilist, after the Gospel has been finished, preaches, and when the sermon or moral address has been completed, the Credo is said, or if it is not to be said, the Offertory is sung."[51] By contrast the Roman Missal as revised by Pope Paul VI declares that the homily may not be omitted without a grave reason from Mass celebrated with the people attending on Sundays and Holy Days of Obligation and that it is recommended on other days.[52]


The Creed

This is the Nicene Creed, professing faith in God the Father, in God the Son, the Word made flesh, in God the Holy Ghost, and in the Holy Church. At the mention of the Incarnation, the celebrant and the congregation genuflect.



Mass of the Faithful[edit]
The second part is the Mass of the Faithful.[53]
Offertory[edit]

Offertory Verse

After greeting the people once more ("Dominus vobiscum/Et cum spiritu tuo") and giving the invitation to pray (Oremus), the priest enters upon the Mass of the Faithful, from which the non-baptized were once excluded. He reads the Offertory Verse, a short quotation from Holy Scripture which varies with the Mass of each day, with hands joined.


Offering of Bread and Wine

The priest offers the host, holding it on the paten at breast level and praying that, although he is unworthy, God may accept "this spotless host (or victim, the basic meaning of hostia in Latin) for his own innumerable sins, offences and neglects, for all those present, and for all faithful Christians living and dead, that it may avail unto salvation of himself and those mentioned. He then mixes a few drops of water with the wine, which will later become the Blood of Jesus, and holding the chalice so that the lip of the chalice is about the height of his lips, offers "the chalice of salvation", asking that it may "ascend with a sweet fragrance." He then prays a prayer of contrition adapted from Dan 3:39-40.


Incensing of the offerings and of the faithful

At a High Mass, the priest blesses the incense, then incenses the bread and wine. Among the prayers the priest says is Psalm 141:2-4: "Let my prayer, O Lord, be directed as incense in Thy sight;...", which is prayed as he incenses the altar. The priest then gives the thurible to the deacon, who incenses the priest, then the other ministers and the congregation.


Washing the hands

The priest prays Psalm 26:6-12: "I will wash my hands among the innocent..."


Prayer to the Most Holy Trinity

This prayer asks that the Divine Trinity may receive the oblation being made in remembrance of the passion, resurrection and ascension of Jesus and in honour of blessed Mary ever Virgin and the other saints, "that it may avail to their honour and our salvation: and that they may vouchsafe to intercede for us in heaven..."


Orate fratres, Suscipiat and Secret; Amen concludes Offertory

Here the priest turns to the congregation and says the first two words, "Orate, fratres," in an elevated tone and then turns around while finishing the exhortation in the secret tone. "Pray, Brethren, that my sacrifice and yours may be acceptable to God the Father almighty."
The altar servers respond with the Suscipiat to which the priest secretly responds, "Amen.": Suscipiat Dominus sacrificium de manibus tuis, ad laudem et gloriam nominis sui, ad utilitatem quoque nostram, totiusque ecclesiæ suae sanctæ. A translation in the English is: "May the Lord accept this sacrifice at your hands, to the praise and glory of His name, for our good and the good of all His Holy Church."
The Priest then says the day's Secret inaudibly, and concludes it with Per omnia sæcula sæculorum aloud.
The altar servers and (in dialogue Mass) the congregation respond: "Amen."



Consecration[edit]








Preface of the Canon

"The Roman Canon dates in essentials from before St. Gregory the Great, who died in 604, and who is credited with adding a phrase to it.[54] (See History of the Roman Canon.) It contains the main elements found in almost all rites, but in an unusual arrangement and it is unclear which part should be considered to be the Epiclesis.
Dominus vobiscum. Et cum spiritu tuo. Sursum corda. Habemus ad Dominum. Gratias agamus Domino Deo nostro. Dignum et iustum est. The first part can be seen above at the Collect; the rest means: Lift up your hearts. We lift them up to the Lord. Let us give thanks to the Lord our God. It is right and just.
Next a preface is prayed, indicating specific reasons for giving thanks to God. This leads to the Sanctus.[55]


Canon or rule of consecration[56]

Intercession (corresponding to the reading of the diptychs in the Byzantine Rite—a diptych is a two-leaf painting, carving or writing tablet.[57])

Here the priest prays for the living, that God may guard, unite and govern the Church together with the Pope and "all those who, holding to the truth, hand on the catholic and apostolic faith". Then specific living people are mentioned, and the congregation in the church. Next, Mary ever Virgin, Saint Joseph, the Apostles, and some Popes and other Martyrs are mentioned by name, as well as a generic "and all your Saints", in communion with whom prayer is offered.


Prayers preparatory to the consecration

A prayer that God may graciously accept the offering and "command that we be delivered from eternal damnation and counted among the flock of those you have chosen".


Consecration (transubstantiation) and major elevation




Elevation of the chalice during the Canon of the Mass at a Solemn Mass



The passage Lk 22:19-20 is key in this section. In Summa Theologiae III 78 3 Thomas Aquinas addresses the interspersed phrase, "the mystery of faith". On this phrase, see Mysterium fidei.


Oblation of the victim to God

An oblation is an offering;[58] the pure, holy, spotless victim is now offered, with a prayer that God may accept the offering and command his holy angel to carry the offering to God's altar on high, so that those who receive the Body and Blood of Christ "may be filled with every grace and heavenly blessing".


Remembrance of the Dead

The priest now prays for the dead ("those who have gone before us with the sign of faith and rest in the sleep of peace") and asks that they be granted a place of refreshment, light and peace. This is followed by a prayer that we be granted fellowship with the Saints. John the Baptist and fourteen martyrs, seven men and seven women, are mentioned by name.


End of the Canon and doxology with minor elevation

The concluding doxology is: "Through him, and with him, and in him, O God, almighty Father, in the unity of the Holy Spirit, all glory and honour is yours, for ever and ever." "Amen" ratifies the Canon prayer.





Elevation candle[edit]




Beuron Art School representation of an elevation candle, mistakenly placed at the Gospel side and upon the altar


Until 1960, the Tridentine form of the Roman Missal laid down that a candle should be placed at the Epistle side of the altar and that it should be lit at the showing of the consecrated sacrament to the people.[59] In practice, except in monasteries and on special occasions, this had fallen out of use long before Pope John XXIII replaced the section on the general rubrics of the Roman Missal with his Code of Rubrics, which no longer mentioned this custom. On this, see Elevation candle.
Communion[edit]




Before receiving Communion from the chalice, the priest makes the sign of the cross over himself, saying (in Latin): May the Blood of our Lord Jesus Christ keep my soul for eternal life. Amen.

























The Lord's Prayer and Libera nos[60]




The "Libera nos" is an extension of the Lord's Prayer developing the line "sed libera nos a malo" ("but deliver us from evil"). The priest prays that we may be delivered from all evils and that the Virgin Mary, Mother of God, together with the apostles and saints, may intercede to obtain for us peace in our day.




Fraction of the Host




During the preceding prayer, the priest breaks the consecrated Host into three parts, and after concluding the prayer drops the smallest part into the Chalice while praying that this commingling and consecration of the Body and Blood of Christ may "be to us who receive it effectual to life everlasting."




Agnus Dei




"Agnus Dei" means "Lamb of God". The priest then prays: "Lamb of God, who takest away the sins of the world, have mercy on us." He repeats this, and then adds: "Lamb of God, who takest away the sins of the world, grant us peace." The Mass of the Last Supper on Holy Thursday has "have mercy on us" all three times. In Requiem Masses, the petitions are "grant them rest" (twice), followed by "grant them eternal rest."


























The Pax

The priest asks Christ to look not at the priest's sins but at the faith of Christ's Church, and prays for peace and unity within the Church. Then, if a High Mass is being celebrated, he gives the sign of peace to the deacon, saying: "Peace be with you."


Prayers preparatory to the Communion

In the first of these two prayers for himself, the priests asks that by Holy Communion he may be freed from all his iniquities and evils, be made to adhere to the commandments of Jesus and never be separated from him. In the second he asks: "Let not the partaking of Thy Body, O Lord Jesus Christ...turn to my judgment and condemnation: but through Thy goodness may it be unto me a safeguard...."


Receiving of the Body and Blood of our Lord

The priest quietly says several prayers here, before receiving Communion. The first is said in a low voice while taking up the Host onto the paten. The second of them, spoken three times in a slightly audible voice,[61] while the priest holds the Host in his left hand and strikes his breast with his right, is based on Matthew 8:8: "Lord, I am not worthy...." Then, after having reverently consumed the Host, he takes up the chalice while in a low voice reciting Psalm 116:12-13: "What shall I render to the Lord, for all the things he hath rendered unto me? I will take the chalice of salvation; and I will call upon the name of the Lord." immediately adding Psalm 18:4: "Praising I will call upon the Lord: and I shall be saved from my enemies."







Priest on the "Ecce Agnus Dei - Behold the Lamb of God" in the people communion.





If the priest is to give Communion to others, he holds up a small host and says aloud: "Behold the Lamb of God ...", and three times: "Lord, I am not worthy ...". He then gives Communion, first making with the host the sign of the cross over each communicant, while saying: "May the Body of Our Lord Jesus Christ preserve your soul for eternal life. Amen."[62]



Conclusion[edit]




"Ite, missa est" sung by the deacon at a Solemn Mass.



Prayers during the Ablutions

The prayers now focus on what has been received, that "we may receive with a pure mind", "that no stain of sin may remain in me, whom these pure and holy sacraments have refreshed."


Communion Antiphon and Postcommunion

The communion antiphon is normally a portion of a Psalm. The Postcommunion Prayer is akin to the Collect in being an appropriate prayer not directly drawn from Scripture.


Ite Missa est; Blessing

"Go, it is the dismissal." The word "Mass" derives from this phrase.
After saying a silent prayer for himself, the priest then gives the people his blessing.
Prior to the revisions of Pope Pius XII and Pope John XXIII, the Ite Missa est was replaced with Benedicamus Domino ("Let us bless the Lord") on days in which the Gloria was not said and the rubrics required the priest to wear violet vestments (i.e., Masses of the season during Advent, Septuagesima, Lent and Passiontide; vigils; certain votive Masses). In the 1962 Missal, Benedicamus Domino is said only when the Mass is followed by another liturgical action, such as the Eucharistic Processions on Holy Thursday and Corpus Christi.
In Requiem Masses, the Ite Missa est is replaced with Requiescant in pace, with the response being "Amen" instead of Deo gratias.


The Last Gospel

The priest then reads the Last Gospel, the beginning of the Gospel of John, John 1:1-14, which recounts the Incarnation of the Son of God. On certain occasions, as for instance at the Day Mass on Christmas Day, another Gospel passage was read instead because that Gospel is read as the Gospel of the Mass, but Pope John XXIII's revision of the rubrics decreed that on those and on other occasions the Last Gospel should simply be omitted.



Prayers of the priest before and after Mass[edit]
The Tridentine Missal includes prayers for the priest to say before and after Mass.
In later editions of the Roman Missal, including that of 1962, the introductory heading of these prayers indicates that they are to be recited pro opportunitate (as circumstances allow),[63] which in practice means that they are merely optional and may be omitted. The original Tridentine Missal presents most of the prayers as obligatory, indicating as optional only a very long prayer attributed to Saint Ambrose (which later editions divide into seven sections, each to be recited on only one day of the week) and two other prayers attributed to Saint Ambrose and Saint Thomas Aquinas respectively.[64]
In addition to these three prayers, the original Tridentine Missal proposes for the priest to recite before he celebrates Mass the whole of Psalms 83–85, 115, 129 (the numbering is that of the Septuagint and Vulgate), and a series of collect-style prayers. Later editions add, after the three that in the original Missal are only optional, prayers to the Blessed Virgin, Saint Joseph, all the angels and saints, and the saint whose Mass is to be celebrated, but, as has been said, treats as optional all the prayers before Mass, even those originally given as obligatory.[65]
The original Tridentine Missal proposes for recitation by the priest after Mass three prayers, including the Adoro te devote. Later editions place before these three the Canticle of the Three Youths (Dan)[66] with three collects, and follow them with the Anima Christi and seven more prayers, treating as optional even the three prescribed in the original Tridentine Missal.[67]
Leonine Prayers[edit]
From 1884 to 1965, the Holy See prescribed the recitation after Low Mass of certain prayers, originally for the solution of the Roman Question and, after this problem was solved by the Lateran Treaty, "to permit tranquillity and freedom to profess the faith to be restored to the afflicted people of Russia".[68]
These prayers are known as the Leonine Prayers because it was Pope Leo XIII who on 6 January 1884 ordered their recitation throughout the world. In what had been the Papal States, they were already in use since 1859.
The prayers comprised three Ave Marias, one Salve Regina followed by a versicle and response, and a collect prayer that, from 1886 on, asked for the conversion of sinners and "the freedom and exaltation of Holy Mother the Church", and, again from 1886 on, a prayer to Saint Michael. In 1904, Pope Pius X added a thrice-repeated "Most Sacred Heart of Jesus, have mercy on us."
In 1964, with effect from 7 March 1965, the Holy See ended the obligation to recite the Leonine Prayers after Low Mass.[69] However, the Leonine Prayers are sometimes still recited after present-day celebrations of Tridentine Mass, although they are not included even in the 1962 edition of the Tridentine Missal.
Participation by the people[edit]




Nuptial Low Mass






Distribution of Communion at a Tridentine Mass: typically, the faithful kneel and receive in the mouth and women wear a headcovering.


The participation of the congregation at the Tridentine Mass is interior, involving eye and heart, and exterior by mouth.[70]
Except in the Dialogue Mass form, which arose about 1910 and led to a more active exterior participation of the congregation, the people present at the Tridentine Mass do not recite out loud the prayers of the Mass. Only the server or servers join with the priest in reciting the prayers at the foot of the altar (which include the Confiteor) and in speaking the other responses.[71] Most of the prayers that the priest says are spoken inaudibly, including almost all the Mass of the Faithful: the offertory prayers, the Canon of the Mass (except for the preface and the final doxology), and (apart from the Agnus Dei) those between the Lord's Prayer and the postcommunion.
At a Solemn Mass or Missa Cantata, a choir sings the servers' responses, except for the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar. The choir sings the Introit, the Kyrie, the Gloria, the Gradual, the Tract or Alleluia, the Credo, the Offertory and Communion antiphons, the Sanctus, and the Agnus Dei. Of these, only the five that form part of the Ordinary of the Mass are usually sung at a Missa Cantata. In addition to the Gregorian Chant music for these, polyphonic compositions exist, some quite elaborate. The priest largely says quietly the words of the chants and then recites other prayers while the choir continues the chant.
Different levels of celebration[edit]
There are various forms of celebration of the Tridentine Mass:

Pontifical High Mass: celebrated by a bishop accompanied by an assisting priest, deacon, subdeacon, thurifer, acolytes and other ministers, under the guidance of a priest acting as Master of Ceremonies. Most often the specific parts assigned to deacon and subdeacon are performed by priests. The parts that are said aloud are all chanted, except that the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar, which before the reform of Pope Pius V were said in the sacristy, are said quietly by the bishop with the deacon and the subdeacon, while the choir sings the Introit. The main difference between a pontifical and an ordinary High Mass is that the bishop remains at his throne almost all the time until the offertory.
Solemn or High Mass (Latin: Missa solemnis): offered by a priest accompanied by a deacon and subdeacon and the other ministers mentioned above.
Missa Cantata (Latin for "sung mass"): celebrated by a priest without deacon and subdeacon, and thus a form of Low Mass, but with some parts (the three variable prayers, the Scripture readings, Preface, Pater Noster, and Ite Missa Est) sung by the priest, and other parts (Introit, Kyrie, Gloria, Gradual, Tract or Alleluia, Credo, Offertory Antiphon, Sanctus and Benedictus, Agnus Dei, and Communion Antiphon) sung by the choir. Incense may be used exactly as at a Solemn Mass with the exception of incensing the celebrant after the Gospel which is not done.
Low Mass: the priest sings no part of the Mass, though in some places a choir or the congregation sings, during the Mass, hymns not always directly related to the Mass.

In its article "The Liturgy of the Mass", the 1917 Catholic Encyclopedia describes how, when concelebration ceased to be practised in Western Europe, Low Mass became distinguished from High Mass:[72]

The separate celebrations then involved the building of many altars in one church and the reduction of the ritual to the simplest possible form. The deacon and subdeacon were in this case dispensed with; the celebrant took their part as well as his own. One server took the part of the choir and of all the other ministers, everything was said instead of being sung, the incense and kiss of peace were omitted. So we have the well-known rite of low Mass (missa privata). This then reacted on high Mass (missa solemnis), so that at high Mass too the celebrant himself recites everything, even though it be sung by the deacon, subdeacon, or choir.

On the origin of the "Missa Cantata", the same source gives the following information:

... high Mass is the norm; it is only in the complete rite with deacon and subdeacon that the ceremonies can be understood. Thus, the rubrics of the Ordinary of the Mass always suppose that the Mass is high. Low Mass, said by a priest alone with one server, is a shortened and simplified form of the same thing. Its ritual can be explained only by a reference to high Mass. For instance, the celebrant goes over to the north side of the altar to read the Gospel, because that is the side to which the deacon goes in procession at high Mass; he turns round always by the right, because at high Mass he should not turn his back to the deacon and so on. A sung Mass (missa Cantata) is a modern compromise. It is really a low Mass, since the essence of high Mass is not the music but the deacon and subdeacon. Only in churches which have no ordained person except one priest, and in which high Mass is thus impossible, is it allowed to celebrate the Mass (on Sundays and feasts) with most of the adornment borrowed from high Mass, with singing and (generally) with incense.

Revision of the Roman Missal[edit]
Pius XII began in earnest the work of revising the Roman Missal with a thorough revision of the rites of Holy Week, which, after an experimental period beginning in 1951, was made obligatory in 1955. The Mass that used to be said on Holy Thursday morning was moved to the evening, necessitating a change in the rule that previously had required fasting from midnight. The Good Friday service was moved to the afternoon, Holy Communion was no longer reserved for the priest alone (as before, hosts consecrated at the Holy Thursday Mass were used) and the priest no longer received part of the host in unconsecrated wine. The Easter Vigil service that used to be held in morning of Holy Saturday[73] was moved to the night that leads to Easter Sunday and many changes were made to the content.
In 1960, Pope John XXIII (1958–1963) ordered the suppression of the word "perfidis" ("unbelieving" i.e. not believing in Jesus), applied to the Jews, in the rites for Good Friday. He revised the rubrics to the Order of Mass and the Breviary. Two years later, in 1962, he made some more minor modifications on the occasion of publishing a new typical edition of the Roman Missal. This is the edition authorized for use by virtue of the Quattuor abhinc annos indult (see below, under Present status of the Tridentine Mass). Among the other changes he made and that were included in the 1962 Missal were: adding St. Joseph's name to the Roman Canon; eliminating the second Confiteor before Communion; suppressing 10 feasts, such as St. Peter's Chair in Rome (or, more accurately, combining both feasts of St Peter's Chair into one, as they originally had been); incorporating the abolition of 4 festal octaves and 9 vigils of feasts and other changes made by Pope Pius XII; and modifying rubrics especially for Solemn High Masses.[74] Among the names that disappeared from the Roman Missal was that of St Philomena: her liturgical celebration had never been admitted to the General Roman Calendar, but from 1920 it had been included (with an indication that the Mass was to be taken entirely from the common) in the section headed "Masses for some places", i.e. only those places for which it had been specially authorized; but her name had already in 1961 been ordered to be removed from all liturgical calendars.
On 4 December 1963, the Second Vatican Council decreed in Chapter II of its Constitution on the Sacred Liturgy Sacrosanctum Concilium:[75]

"[T]he rite of the Mass is to be revised ... the rites are to be simplified, due care being taken to preserve their substance. Parts which with the passage of time came to be duplicated, or were added with little advantage, are to be omitted. Other parts which suffered loss through accidents of history are to be restored to the vigor they had in the days of the holy Fathers, as may seem useful or necessary. The treasures of the Bible are to be opened up more lavishly so that a richer fare may be provided for the faithful at the table of God’s word ... A suitable place may be allotted to the vernacular in Masses which are celebrated with the people ... communion under both kinds may be granted when the bishops think fit...as, for instance, to the newly ordained in the Mass of their sacred ordination, to the newly professed in the Mass of their religious profession, and to the newly baptized in the Mass which follows their baptism..."

The instruction Inter Oecumenici of 26 September 1964 initiated the application to the Mass of the decisions that the Council had taken less than a year before. Permission was given for use, only in Mass celebrated with the people, of the vernacular language, especially in the Biblical readings and the reintroduced Prayers of the Faithful, but, "until the whole of the Ordinary of the Mass has been revised," in the chants (Kyrie, Gloria, Creed, Sanctus, Agnus Dei, and the entrance, offertory and communion antiphons) and in the parts that involved dialogue with the people, and in the Our Father, which the people could now recite entirely together with the priest. Most Episcopal Conferences quickly approved interim vernacular translations, generally different from country to country, and, after having them confirmed by the Holy See, published them in 1965. Other changes included the omission of Psalm 43 (42) at the start of Mass and the Last Gospel at the end, both of which Pope Pius V had first inserted into the Missal (having previously been private prayers said by the priest in the sacristy), and the Leonine Prayers of Pope Leo XIII. The Canon of the Mass, which continued to be recited silently, was kept in Latin.
Three years later, the instruction Tres abhinc annos[76] of 4 May 1967 gave permission for use of the vernacular even in the Canon of the Mass, and allowed it to be said audibly and even, in part, to be chanted; the vernacular could be used even at Mass celebrated without the people being present. Use of the maniple was made optional, and at three ceremonies at which the cope was previously the obligatory vestment the chasuble could be used instead.
Pope Paul VI continued implementation of the Council's directives, ordering with Apostolic Constitution Missale Romanum[77] of Holy Thursday, 3 April 1969, publication of a new official edition of the Roman Missal, which appeared (in Latin) in 1970.
Opposition to the latest revisions of the liturgy[edit]
Some Traditionalist Catholics reject to a greater or lesser extent the changes made since 1950 (see Traditionalist Catholic). None advocate returning to the original (1570) form of the liturgy, though some may perhaps wish a re-establishment of its form before Pius X's revision of the rubrics in 1911. Some do refuse to accept the 1955 changes in the liturgy of Palm Sunday and the Easter Triduum and in the liturgical calendar (see General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII), and instead use the General Roman Calendar as in 1954. Others accept the 1955 changes by Pius XII, but not those of Pope John XXIII. Others again, in accordance with the authorization granted by Pope Benedict XVI in Summorum Pontificum, use the Missal and calendar as it was in 1962.
Some of them argue that, unlike earlier reforms, the revision of 1969-1970 which replaced the Tridentine Mass with the Mass of Pope Paul VI represented a major break with the past. They consider that the content of the revised liturgy is, in Catholic terms, seriously deficient and defective; some hold that it is displeasing to God, and that no Catholic should attend it.[78]
When a preliminary text of two of the sections of the revised Missal was published in 1969, Archbishop Marcel Lefebvre gathered a group of twelve theologians, who, under his direction,[79] wrote a study of the text. They stated that it "represents, both as a whole and in its details, a striking departure from the Catholic theology of the Mass as it was formulated in Session 22 of the Council of Trent".[80] Cardinal Alfredo Ottaviani, a former Prefect of the Sacred Congregation for the Doctrine of the Faith, supported this study with a letter of 25 September 1969 to Pope Paul VI. Cardinal Antonio Bacci signed the same letter. The critical study became known as "the Ottaviani Intervention".[81] Cardinal Ottaviani subsequently stated in writing that he had not intended his letter to be made public, and that Pope Paul VI's doctrinal exposition, on 19 November[82] and 26 November 1969,[83] of the revised liturgy in its definitive form meant that "no one can be genuinely scandalised any more".[84] Jean Madiran, a critic of Vatican II[85] and founder-editor of the French journal Itinéraires, claimed that this letter was fraudulently presented to the elderly and already blind cardinal for his signature by his secretary, Monsignor (and future Cardinal) Gilberto Agustoni, and that Agustoni resigned shortly afterwards.[86] This allegation remains unproven, and Madiran himself was not an eyewitness of the alleged deception.[87]
In October 1967, a meeting of the Synod of Bishops had already given its opinion on a still earlier draft. Of the 187 members, 78 approved it as it stood, 62 approved it but suggested various modifications, 4 abstained, and 47 voted against.[88]
From the 1960s onwards, Western countries have experienced a drop in Mass attendance (in the United States, from 75% of Catholics attending in 1958 to 25% attending by 2002). These same countries saw a decline in seminary enrollments and in the number of priests (in the United States, from 1,575 ordinations in 1954 to 450 in 2002), and a general erosion of belief in the doctrines of the Catholic faith. Opponents of the revision of the Mass liturgy argue, citing opinion poll evidence in their support, that the revision contributed to this decline.[89] Others, pointing, among other considerations, to the fact that, globally, there are more priests and seminarians now than in previous years (in 1970, there were 72,991 major seminarians worldwide, in 2002, there were 113,199, an increase of 55%, at a time, however, when there was an increase of global population of 64%),[90] suggest that the apparent decline of Catholic practice in the West is due to the general influence of secularism and liberalism on Western societies rather than to developments within the Catholic Church.
Attitudes of Popes since the Second Vatican Council[edit]
Pope Paul VI[edit]
Following the introduction of the Mass of Paul VI in 1969-1970, the Holy See granted a significant number of permissions for the use of the former liturgy. For example, elderly priests were not required to switch to celebrating the new form. In England and Wales, occasional celebrations of the Tridentine Mass were allowed in virtue of what became known as the "Agatha Christie indult". However, there was no general worldwide legal framework allowing for the celebration of the rite. Following the rise of the Traditionalist Catholic movement in the 1970s, Pope Paul VI reportedly declined to liberalise its use further on the grounds that it had become a politically charged symbol associated with opposition to his policies.[91]
Pope John Paul II[edit]
In 1984, the Holy See sent a letter known as Quattuor abhinc annos to the presidents of the world's Episcopal Conferences. This document empowered diocesan bishops to authorise, on certain conditions, celebrations of the Tridentine Mass for priests and laypeople who requested them.[92] In 1988, following the excommunication of Archbishop Marcel Lefebvre and four bishops that he had consecrated, the Pope issued a further document, a motu proprio known as Ecclesia Dei,[93] which stated that "respect must everywhere be shown for the feelings of all those who are attached to the Latin liturgical tradition". The Pope urged bishops to give "a wide and generous application" to the provisions of Quattuor abhinc annos, and established the Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei to oversee relations between Rome and Traditionalist Catholics.
The Holy See itself granted authorisation to use the Tridentine Mass to a significant number of priests and priestly societies, such as the Priestly Fraternity of St. Peter, the Institute of Christ the King Sovereign Priest, and the Personal Apostolic Administration of Saint John Mary Vianney. Some diocesan bishops, however, declined to authorise celebrations within their dioceses, or did so only to a limited extent. In some cases, the difficulty was that those seeking the permission were hostile to the church authorities. Other refusals of permission were alleged to have stemmed from certain bishops' disapproval in principle of celebrations of the Tridentine liturgy.
Pope Benedict XVI[edit]
As a cardinal, Joseph Ratzinger was regarded as having a particular interest in the liturgy, and as being favourable towards the older rite of Mass. He famously criticized the erratic way in which, contrary to official policy, many priests celebrated the revised rite.[94]
In September 2006, the Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei established the Institute of the Good Shepherd, made up of former members of the Society of St. Pius X, in Bordeaux, France, with permission to use the Tridentine liturgy.[95] This step was met with some discontent from French clergy, and thirty priests wrote an open letter to the Pope.[96] Consistently with its previous policy, the Society of St Pius X rejected the move.[97]
Following repeated rumours that the use of the Tridentine Mass would be liberalised, the Pope issued a motu proprio called Summorum Pontificum on 7 July 2007,[98] together with an accompanying letter to the world's Bishops.[99] The Pope declared that "the Roman Missal promulgated by Paul VI is the ordinary expression of the lex orandi (law of prayer) of the Catholic Church of the Latin rite. Nevertheless, the Roman Missal promulgated by St. Pius V and reissued by St. John XXIII is to be considered as an extraordinary expression of that same 'Lex orandi'".[100] He further stated that "the 1962 Missal ... was never juridically abrogated".[101] He replaced with new rules those of Quattuor Abhinc Annos on use of the older form: essentially, authorization for using the 1962 form for parish Masses and those celebrated on public occasions such as a wedding is devolved from the local bishop to the priest in charge of a church, and any priest of the Latin Rite may use the 1962 Roman Missal in "Masses celebrated without the people", a term that does not exclude attendance by other worshippers, lay or clergy.[102] While requests by groups of Catholics wishing to use the Tridentine liturgy in parish Masses are to be dealt with by the parish priest (or the rector of the church) rather than, as before, by the local bishop, the Pope and Cardinal Darío Castrillón have stated that the bishops' authority is not thereby undermined.[103]
Present regulations[edit]
The regulations set out in Summorum Pontificum provide that:

In Masses celebrated "without the people", every Latin Rite priest may use either the 1962 Roman Missal or that of Paul VI except during the Easter Triduum (when Masses without participation by the people are no longer allowed). Celebrations of Mass in this form (formerly referred to as "private Masses") may, as before, be attended by laypeople who ask to be admitted.[104]
In parish Masses, where there is a stable group of laypeople who adhere to the earlier liturgical tradition, the parish priest should willingly accept their requests to be allowed to celebrate the Mass according to the 1962 Missal, and should ensure that their welfare harmonises with the ordinary pastoral care of the parish, under the guidance of the bishop in accordance with canon 392 of the Code of Canon Law, avoiding discord and favouring the unity of the Church.

Mass may be celebrated using the 1962 Missal on working days, while on Sundays and feast days one such celebration may be held.
For priests and laypeople who request it, the parish priest should allow celebrations of the 1962 form on special occasions such as weddings, funerals, and pilgrimages.


Communities belonging to institutes of consecrated life and societies of apostolic life which wish to use the 1962 Missal for conventual or "community" celebration in their oratories may do so.

With letter 13/2007 of 20 January 2010 the Pontifical Council Ecclesia Dei responded positively to a question whether a parish priest (pastor) or another priest may on his own initiative publicly celebrate the extraordinary form, along with the customary regular use of the new form, "so that the faithful, both young and old, can familiarize themselves with the old rites and benefit from their perceptible beauty and transcendence". Although the Council accompanied this response with the observation that a stable group of the faithful attached to the older form has a right to assist at Mass in the extraordinary form, a website that published the response interpreted it as not requiring the existence of such a stable group.[105]
Present practice[edit]
The publication of Summorum Pontificum has led to an increase in the number of regularly scheduled public Tridentine Masses. On 14 June 2008 Cardinal Darío Castrillón Hoyos told a London press conference that Pope Benedict wants every parish to offer both the old and the new forms for Sunday Mass.[106]
The cardinal said that the Vatican was preparing to instruct seminaries to teach all students the Tridentine form of the Roman Rite. The complexity of the rubrics makes it difficult for priests accustomed to the simpler modern form to celebrate the Tridentine form properly, and it is unclear how many have the required knowledge.
Some Traditionalist Catholic priests and organisations, holding that no official permission is required to use any form of the Tridentine Mass, celebrate it without regularizing their situation,[107] and sometimes using editions of the Roman Missal earlier than the 1962 edition approved in Summorum Pontificum.
In order to provide for priests who celebrate the Tridentine Mass, publishers have issued facsimiles or reprintings of old missals. There were two new printings of the 1962 Tridentine Missal in 2004: one, with the imprimatur of Bishop Fabian Bruskewitz of Lincoln, Nebraska, by Baronius Press in association with the Priestly Fraternity of St. Peter; the other by the Society of St. Pius X's publishing house, Angelus Press. There was a new printing of a facsimile 1962 Tridentine Altar Missal in 2008 by PCP books. Some other missals reproduced date from before 1955 and so do not have the revised Holy Week rites promulgated by Pope Pius XII. They are used by traditionalists who reject Pius XII's liturgical changes. As well as such altar missals for use by the priest, old hand missals for those attending Mass have been reproduced, including a St Bonaventure Press facsimile of a pre-1955 edition of the St Andrew's Missal.
See also[edit]

List of communities using the Tridentine Mass
Sacred language
Western Rite Orthodoxy

References[edit]


^ In this context, "typical edition" means the officially approved edition to whose text other printings are obliged to conform.
^ Angelus A. De Marco, O.F.M., "Liturgical Languages" in The American Ecclesiastical Review
^ Council of Trent, session of 4 December 1563
^ These regions included those in which a variant of the Roman Rite, called the Sarum Rite, was in use for more than the minimum required time. On a few recent occasions Roman Catholic prelates have used this variant as an extraordinary form of celebrating Mass. But, like most of the other regions and the orders concerned, the Sarum Rite areas have adopted the standard Roman Missal. The most important non-Roman liturgies that continue in use are the Ambrosian Rite, the Mozarabic Rite and the Carthusian Rite.
^ Code of Canon Law, canon 928
^ Instruction Redemptionis Sacramentum, 112
^ a b Letter of Pope Benedict XVI
^ Pope Benedict spoke of it instead as "an" extraordinary form. While in English, "extraordinary" often has laudatory overtones, its meaning in canon law is illustrated by its use with reference, for instance, to "the extraordinary minister of holy communion" (cf. canon 910 §2 of the Code of Canon Law).
^ Summorum Pontificum, article 10 speaks of celebrations "iuxta formam antiquiorem ritus romani" (in accordance with the older form of the Roman Rite).
^ Summorum Pontificum, articles 2 and 4
^ Summorum Pontificum, article 5
^ Krmpotic, M.D. (1908). "Dalmatia". Catholic encyclopedia. Retrieved March 25, 2008. The right to use the Glagolitic  [sic] language at Mass with the Roman Rite has prevailed for many centuries in all the south-western Balkan countries, and has been sanctioned by long practice and by many popes. 
^ Japundžić, Marko (1997). "The Croatian Glagolitic Heritage". Croatian Academy of America. Retrieved March 25, 2008. In 1886 it arrived to the Principality of Montenegro, followed by the Kingdom of Serbia in 1914, and the Republic of Czechoslovakia in 1920, but only for feast days of the main patron saints. The 1935 concordat with the Kingdom of Yugoslavia anticipated the introduction of the Slavic liturgy for all Croatian regions and throughout the entire state. 
^ "Inter Oecumenici, Sacred Congregation of Rites". 2007. Retrieved March 25, 2008. 
^ Congregation for Divine Worship and the Discipline of the Sacrament (2004-04-23). "Redemptionis Sacramentum". Retrieved 2008-03-25. 
^ Thompson, Damian (2008-06-14). "Latin mass to return to England and Wales". The Daily Telegraph. Retrieved 2008-06-17. 
^ Medieval Sourcebook; Pope reformulates Tridentine rite's prayer for Jews
^ Letter to the Bishops on the occasion of the publication of Summorum Pontificum
^ a b c "Quo primum". Retrieved 2008-03-25. We decided to entrust this work to learned men of our selection. They very carefully collated all their work with the ancient codices in Our Vatican Library and with reliable, preserved or emended codices from elsewhere. Besides this, these men consulted the works of ancient and approved authors concerning the same sacred rites; and thus they have restored the Missal itself to the original form and rite of the holy Fathers. When this work has been gone over numerous times and further emended, after serious study and reflection, We commanded that the finished product be printed and published. 
^ The Mass of Vatican II
^ The Mass of the Consilium and the Mass of the Ages
^ God Was Worshipped Here Today
^ Meditation before Holy Mass
^ Is the Novus Ordo Mass Actually the Indult Mass?
^ Priories of the Order of Saint John of Jerusalem
^ The Mass of the Apostles
^ Cf. Extract from a Letter to a Philippine Mayor
^ Braga - Capital de Distrito
^ "Just after the Council of Trent, the study 'of ancient manuscripts in the Vatican library and elsewhere', as Saint Pius V attests in the Apostolic Constitution Quo primum, helped greatly in the correction of the Roman Missal. Since then, however, other ancient sources have been discovered and published and liturgical formularies of the Eastern Church have been studied. Accordingly, many have had the desire for these doctrinal and spiritual riches not to be stored away in the dark, but to be put into use for the enlightenment of the mind of Christians and for the nurture of their spirit" (Apostolic Constitution Missale Romanum).
^ ISBN 88-209-2547-8; publisher: Libreria Editrice Vaticana; introduction and appendix by Manlio Sodi and Achille Maria Triacca
^ Introduction to the reproduction of the editio princeps, pages XXVI-XXX
^ Introduction to the reproduction of the editio princeps, pages XXI
^ S. Cecilia in Trastevere, main altar, presbytery, ciborium
^ Helen Dietz, "The Biblical Roots of Church Orientation" in Sacred Architecture, vol. 10. Retrieved 20 July 2013.
^ Solemn Papal Mass. See further The Tridentine Mass by Paul Cavendish
^ Apostolic Constitution Si quid est
^ Missal in Catholic Encyclopedia
^ Divino afflatu
^ Mysterii Paschalis and Ordorecitandi website
^ Richard Breyer, "St. Joseph & the Mass" in Catholic Digest
^ Pope Benedict XVI's motu proprio Summorum Pontificum
^ "The Missal published by Paul VI and then republished in two subsequent editions by John Paul II, obviously is and continues to be the normal Form – the Forma ordinaria – of the Eucharistic Liturgy" (Pope Benedict XVI's letter to the bishops on the occasion of the publication of Summorum Pontificum).
^ Their dislike of the 1962 Missal is expressed for instance in a list of differences prepared by Daniel Dolan.
^ "The Collaborative International Dictionary of English v.0.48". 1913. Retrieved 2008-03-25. 
^ Chapman, John (1908). "Didache". Retrieved 2008-03-25. Let no one eat or drink of the Eucharist with you except those who have been baptized in the name of the Lord. 
^ It is an additional ceremony, not part of the Mass itself, and in the Tridentine Missal is given only in an appendix.
^ Text of Mass of the Catechumens
^ Rubrics V
^ Text in Latin and English
^ Summorum Pontificum, article 6
^ The Rubrics of the Missale Romanum 1962: VI. The Epistle, the Gradual, and everything else up to the Offertory
^ General Instruction of the Roman Missal, 66
^ Text of Mass of the Faithful
^  Herbermann, Charles, ed. (1913). "Pope St. Gregory I ("the Great")". Catholic Encyclopedia. New York: Robert Appleton Company. 
^ Santus
^ Mass of the Faithful - The Canon
^ Diptych
^ Definition of "oblation"
^ "Ab eadem parte Epistolae paretur cereus ad elevationem Sacramenti accendendus" (Rubricae generales Missalis, XX)
^ Mass of the Faithful - Closing Prayers
^ In pre-1962 editions of the Roman Missal, only the first four words, "Domine, non sum dignus", were to be said in the slightly audible voice.
^ Ritus servandus, X, 6 of the 1962 Missal
^ Latin Dictionary
^ Manlio Sodi, Achille Maria Triacca (editors), Missale Romanum: Editio Princeps (1570) (Libreria Editrice Vaticana 1988 ISBN 978-88-209-2547-5), pp. 27–36
^ Orationes ante Missam
^ Douay-Rheims Version
^ Orationes post Missam
^ Allocution Indictam ante of 30 June 1930, in Acta Apostolicae Sedis 22 (1930), page 301
^ Instruction Inter Oecumenici, 48 j
^ Pope St. Pius X said: "If you wish to hear Mass as it should be heard, you must follow with eye, heart, and mouth all that happens at the altar. Further, you must pray with the Priest the holy words said by him in the Name of Christ and which Christ says by him" (The Daily Missal and Liturgical Manual from the Editio Typica of the Roman Missal and Breviary, 1962, Baronius Press, London, 2004, p. 897).
^ They gave responses to "Kyrie eleison", "Dominus vobiscum", "Per omnia saecula saeculorum", the Gospel reading, the "Orate Fratres", "Sursum Corda", "Gratias agamus Domino Deo nostro", the conclusion of the Lord's Prayer, the "Pax Domini sit semper vobiscum" and the "Ite Missa est"
^  Herbermann, Charles, ed. (1913). "Liturgy of the Mass". Catholic Encyclopedia. New York: Robert Appleton Company. 
^ Conventual Mass (Mass of a religious community) on a Vigil, such as that of Easter, was celebrated after None, at which point the fast could be broken (see Rubricae generalis Missalis, XV, 2). Though None was in origin an afternoon prayer, it was then celebrated in the morning. Similarly, Lauds, which was originally a morning prayer, was commonly celebrated in choir on the evening before, as in the office of Tenebrae. "Private Masses" (Masses celebrated by a priest without a congregation) could, even on days of fast, be celebrated at any hour from dawn to noon (see Rubricae generalis Missalis, XV, 1). Most celebrations of the Easter Vigil were in the form of private Masses, since concelebration was not allowed.
^ The Pius X and John XXIII Missals Compared
^ Constitution on the Sacred Liturgy
^ Tres abhinc annos
^ Missale Romanum
^ Pope Benedict XVI, who has several times deplored departures on private initiative from the rite of Mass established in the 1970 revision of the Roman Missal has declared this contention unfounded, writing: "There is no contradiction between the two editions of the Roman Missal. In the history of the liturgy there is growth and progress, but no rupture. ... Needless to say, in order to experience full communion, the priests of the communities adhering to the former usage cannot, as a matter of principle, exclude celebrating according to the new books. The total exclusion of the new rite would not in fact be consistent with the recognition of its value and holiness" (Letter to the Bishops on the occasion of the publication of the Apostolic Letter motu proprio data Summorum Pontificum).
^ A Short History of the SSPX
^ Ottaviani letter
^ Ottaviani, Alfredo; Bacci, Antonio; Group of Roman Theologians. "The Ottaviani Intervention: A Critical Study of the New Mass". Catholic Tradition. Retrieved 21 November 2016. 
^ Talk on 19 November 1969
^ Talk on 26 November 1969
^ Quotation from Documentation Catholique, 1970; the full text of the letter in an English translation is given in The New "Ordo Missæ": A battle on two fronts
^ Je suis un témoin à charge contre mon temps
^ The Ottaviani Intervention - Part I, by Michael Davies
^ The Ottaviani Intervention - Part 1, by Michael Davies
^ "Special Supplement: The Ottaviani Intervention: A Critical Study of the Novus Ordo Missae". Triumph. 4 (12): 22A–22L. December 1969. Quoted in THE GREAT SACRILEGE by Fr. James F. Wathen 
^ Jones, Kenneth C. (January 2003). Index of Leading Catholic Indicators: The Church since Vatican II. Oriens Publishing. ISBN 0-9728688-0-1
^ Cf. World population
^ Collins, Roger (2009). Keepers of the Keys of Heaven: A History of the Papacy. Basic Books. pp. 488–489. ISBN 978-0-465-01195-7. 
^ English translation of Quattuor abhinc annos
^ Ecclesia Dei
^ Preface to the French edition of Die Reform der Römischen Liturgie by Klaus Gamber; partial English translation; cf. The Spirit of the Liturgy, San Francisco: Ignatius Press, 2000; and Looking Again at the Question of the Liturgy with Cardinal Ratzinger: Proceedings of the July 2001 Fontgombault Liturgical Conference, Farnborough, Hampshire: St. Michael's Abbey Press, 2002. For a Vatican condemnation of aberrant liturgical practices, see Redemptionis Sacramentum
^ Brian Mershon, "New French traditionalist priestly society founded," The Wanderer, September 18, 2006.
^ "French clerics rebel on Latin Mass," The Conservative Voice, October 29, 2006
^ Communiqué de la Fraternité Sacerdotale Saint Pie X
^ Text of the motu proprio Summorum Pontificum in Latin and English
^ Benedict XVI (2007-07-07). "Letter of His Holiness Benedict XVI to the Bishops on the occasion of the publication of the Apostolic Letter "motu proprio data" Summorum Pontificum on the use of the Roman liturgy prior to the reform of 1970". Libreria Editrice Vaticana. Retrieved 2008-03-24. 
^ Article 1 of the motu proprio. In his letter to the Bishops he said: "It is not appropriate to speak of these two versions of the Roman Missal as if they were 'two Rites'. Rather, it is a matter of a twofold use of one and the same rite."
^ Similarly, Clement VIII did not juridically abrogate the Missal of Pius V, nor did the other Popes who issued later typical editions of the Roman Missal before that of Paul VI (Urban VIII, Leo XIII, Benedict XV, John XXIII) juridically abrogate the previous editions. Even Pius V juridically abolished only those variants of the Roman Rite that had less than 200 years' antiquity.
^ Indeed, "Mass should not be celebrated without a minister or at least one of the faithful, except for a just and reasonable cause" (General Instruction of the Roman Missal, 254). Masses celebrated without the people were once called "private Masses", a term that fell out of favour in the mid-twentieth century: the 1960 Codex Rubricarum, which preceded the Second Vatican Council, declared: "The most sacred Sacrifice of the Mass celebrated according to the rites and regulations is an act of public worship offered to God in the name of Christ and the Church. Therefore, the term 'private Mass' should be avoided" (Rubricae Generales Missalis Romani, 269). Cf. Review of Mass without a Congregation: A Sign of Unity or Division?, by Fr Marian Szablewski CR.
^ In the letter to bishops by which he accompanied the motu proprio the Pope told them that the new regulations "do not in any way lessen your own authority and responsibility, either for the liturgy or for the pastoral care of your faithful." Cardinal Castrillón has stated: "The Pope has not changed the Code of Canon Law. The bishop is the moderator of the liturgy in his own diocese. But the Apostolic See is entitled to shape the sacred liturgy of the universal Church. And a bishop must act in harmony with the Apostolic See and must guarantee the rights of every believer, including that of being able to attend the mass of Saint Pius V, as extraordinary form of the rite" (30Days, June/July 2007).
^ Article 4 of the motu proprio
^ New Liturgical Movement: Important Clarifications
^ "Pope says old-rite Latin Mass should be on offer in every Catholic parish"
^ Article 5 §4 of the motu proprio says priests who use the Missal of Blessed John XXIII must not be juridically impeded.


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Tridentine Mass.


Full texts of Tridentine Roman Missals[edit]

1962 typical edition of the Roman Missal Accurately reproduced, but only in black and white. 78 Mb.
1920 typical edition of the Roman Missal, with feasts updated to the late 1920s
Missale Romanum published by Pustet, 1894 (1884 typical edition)
Roman Missal, published by Pustet, 1862 (1634 typical edition, updated to 1862)
Missale Romanum, 1577, (1570 typical edition)

Texts of parts of the Tridentine Missal (post-1604)[edit]

English translation of the Ritus servandus in celebratione Missae (The 1962 Missal left this text unaltered, but completely revised the Rubricae generales Missalis Romani. The English text, titled "Rubrics of the Missale Romanum 1962", is in fact a translation of the Ritus servandus, not of the Rubricae generales.)
Ordinary of the 1962 Roman Missal with MP3 Audio of Latin Text (Latin text with English translation)
Ordinary of the Mass, with English translation at sacred-texts.com (The text is presented as that of the 1962 edition, but the spelling of the Latin, e.g. "coelum", "quotidianum", use of the letter J, shows that, apart from the insertion of "sed et beati Ioseph eiusdem Virginis Sponsi" in the Canon of the Mass, it is really the 1920 text, identical with the 1962 text except for spelling and this insertion)
Ordinary of the Mass, with English translation (This text too is presented as that of the 1962 edition, but is the same hybrid text as in the previous site)
Term-by-term Ordinary of the Mass, with intratext grammatical notes and with English translation (The 1920 text, with "sed et beati Ioseph eiusdem Virginis Sponsi" inserted into the Canon)
An English translation of the Ordinary of the 1920/1962 Missals (the translation of the phrase "sed et beati Ioseph, eiusdem Virginis Sponsi", which marks a difference between the 1962 edition and the previous editions, is given between braces), side-by-side with the 1973 ICEL translation of the Ordinary of the 1970 Missal
F. X. Lasance, The New Roman Missal (1942) (a hand missal for the faithful)
The Roman Missal adapted to the use of the laity from the Missale Romanum incorporating rubrical changes by Pope St. Pius X in 1913
A Manual of Prayers for the Catholic Laity: The Official Prayerbook of the Catholic Church (1896) Official pew missalette adopted for American Catholics by the Third Plenary Council of Baltimore.
The Catholic's Vade Mecum: A Select Manual of Prayers for Daily Use An English Catholic prayer book and missalette published in 1850.
Roman Missal for the Use of the Laity in English and partly in Latin, published in London in 1806. Its Canon of the Mass includes the mention, by name, of the king.
The Saint John Fisher Missale Text and plainchant of the Order of Mass and other parts of the 1962 Roman Missal (e.g., propers of Sundays and First and Second Class feasts), interpolated with elements removed from the Roman Missal after 1900 but still used in many places, and with material from sources such as the pre-1570 English Sarum Missal, material that was thus never part of the Missal authorized by Pope Pius V (see Introduction).

History[edit]

Quo primum, promulgating the 1570 Roman Missal (Pope Pius V)
Cum santissimum, promulgating the 1604 Roman Missal (Pope Clement VIII)
Si quid est, promulgating the 1634 Roman Missal (Pope Urban VIII)
Apostolic Constitution Missale Romanum, promulgating the 1970 Roman Missal (Pope Paul VI)
Encyclical Mediator Dei
Liturgy of the Mass (article in Catholic Encyclopedia)
History of the 1570 Missale Romanum
Woods, Thomas E., Sacred Then and Sacred Now: The Return of the Old Latin Mass (Roman Catholic Books 2008 ISBN 978-0-9793540-2-1)
Hull, Geoffrey, The Banished Heart: Origins of Heteropraxis in the Catholic Church, 1995, rpt. T&T Clark/Continuum, London 2010. ISBN 9780567442208
Aillet, Marc, The old Mass and the new : explaining the motu proprio Summorum Pontificum of Pope Benedict XVI (Ignatius Press 2010 ISBN 978-1-58617-362-3)

Comparison with non-Roman Western rites and uses[edit]

Tridentine Ordinary of the Mass compared with the Lyonese, Bragan, Dominican, Carthusian, Carmelite, Ambrosian and Mozarabic
The ancient liturgy of the Church of England, according to the uses of Sarum, Bangor, York & Hereford and the modern Roman liturgy arranged in parallel columns Tridentine Ordinary of the Mass and Canon compared with the Medieval English uses of Sarum, Bangor, York and Hereford.

Media[edit]

Multimedia tutorial on the Tridentine Mass: Photos, Videos, and Audio
Audio and Explanation of Sacred Music - CatholicLatinMass.org
Audio files - Text of the Mass Latin Mass Society of Ireland.
Video of a 1941 Solemn High Mass narrated by Fulton Sheen
Video of a Missa Cantata, or sung Low Mass, offered on the Last Sunday after Pentecost at the Roman Catholic Parish of St. Nicholas of Chardonnet in Paris, France.
Video of a Votive Mass of the Blessed Virgin Mary offered as a Missa Cantata, or sung Low Mass, at the Roman Catholic Priory of St. Pius X in Warsaw, Poland.
Video of a Solemn High Mass celebrated at the SSPX Seminary of St. Cure d'Ars, Flavigny, France
Video of a Traditional Mass for Christmas, held at St. Roch's in West Bangor, Pa.
Another video of a Low Mass
Photographs of a Traditional (Tridentine) Mass
Forum dedicated to the Tridentine Mass
A Modern Tridentine Mass Wedding
The Extraordinary Form of the Mass - Explained (German)
Priests for the 3rd millennium (German)

Directories of Latin Masses[edit]

Ecclesia Dei's Latin Mass Directory, United States and Canada
WikkiMissa, world directory of Tridentine Mass
List of Tridentine Rite Masses in the US
List of Tridentine Rite Masses Worldwide







v
t
e


Tridentine Mass of the Catholic Church




Including the extraordinary form of the Roman Rite (1962)



Types



Chapter and conventual
Dialogue Mass
Low (Missa Cantata) and High Mass (Solemn)
Missa Sicca
Pontifical

Papal


Ritual Masses

Coronation (Papal)
Missa pro Defunctis
Nuptial


sine populo
Votive

Red







Order



Pre-Mass
Vesting prayers
Asperges me

Vidi aquam in Eastertide


Processional hymn


Mass of the Catechumens
Iudica me
Confiteor

mea culpa


Introit
Kyrie
Gloria in excelsis Deo
Collect
Lection
Gradual
Alleluia or Tract
Sequentia
Gospel
Homily


Mass of the Faithful
Credo

Niceno-Constantinopolitan Creed


Offertory

Lavabo
Orate fratres
Secret


Preface

Sursum corda
Sanctus
Hosanna


Roman Canon

oblation
epiclesis
Words of Institution
anamnesis
elevation
doxology


Pater Noster

embolism
doxology


Pax
Agnus Dei

Dona nobis pacem


Fraction
Holy Communion

Communion antiphon


Ablutions
Postcommunio
Dismissal

Ite, missa est or Benedicamus Domino


Last Gospel


Post-Mass
Leonine prayers
Recessional hymn


For funeral Mass
Dies Irae

Pie Iesu


Libera Me
Requiescant in pace
Absolution of the dead
In paradisum
De profundis





Participants



Acolyte

altar server


Bishop
Boat boy
Cantor or schola
Crucifer
Deacon
Laity
Lector
Master of ceremonies
Porter
Priest
Subdeacon





Altar



Altar cards
Altar crucifix
Altar rails
Ambo
Antependium
Credence table
Kneeler
Lavabo
Misericord
Piscina
Sacristy
Tabernacle





Altar cloths



Altar linens
Antependium
Burse
Chalice veil
Corporal
Pall
Purificator





Illumination



Altar candle
Altar candlestick
Paschal candle
Sanctuary lamp
Triple candlestick





Liturgical
objects



Altar bell
Aspergillum
Chalice
Ciborium
Collection basket
Cruet
Flabellum
Funghellino
Holy water
Incense

use


Manuterge
Paten
Processional cross
Pyx
Sacramental bread

wafer


Sacramental wine (or must)
Thurible
Water





Literature



Cæremoniale Episcoporum
Missale Romanum
Pontificale Romanum
Rituale Romanum





Vestments
(Pontifical/Papal)



Alb
Amice
Chasuble
Cincture
Cope
Crosier
Dalmatic
Episcopal gloves
Ecclesiastical ring
Episcopal sandals
Falda
Humeral veil
Liturgical colours
Mitre
Pallium
Papal fanon
Papal tiara
Pectoral cross
Stole
Sub-cinctorium
Superhumerale
Surplice
Tunicle
Vimpa





Music



Antiphon
Graduale Romanum
Gregorian chant
Hymn
Kyriale Romanum
Liber Usualis
Music for the Requiem Mass
Organ

voluntary


Organum
Polyphony
Reciting tone

Accentus
Recto tono


Tonary

Gregorian Antiphonary







Liturgical year
Calendar
(1954/1955/1960)



Advent
Christmastide
Epiphanytide
Septuagesima
Lent
Passiontide
Holy Week

Paschal Triduum


Eastertide
Ascensiontide
After Pentecost


Calendar of saints
Holy day of obligation
Moveable feast
Octaves


Ranking of liturgical days: Solemnity
Memorial
Commemoration
Feria





Discipline



Church etiquette
Closed communion
Communion and the developmentally disabled
Communion under both kinds
Denial of Communion

Canon 915


Eucharistic fast
First Communion
Genuflection
Headcover
Host desecration
Infant communion
Reserved sacrament
Sign of the Cross
Thanksgiving after Communion
Viaticum





Theology



Blessed Sacrament
Body and Blood of Christ
Corpus Christi (feast)
Crucifixion of Jesus and substitutionary atonement
Epiousios
Eucharistic miracle
Grace ex opere operato
In persona Christi
Historical roots of Catholic Eucharistic theology
Koinonia
Last Supper
Origin of the Eucharist
Priesthood of Melchizedek
Pro multis
Real presence
Transubstantiation





Concepts



Ad orientem
Canon law
Code of Rubrics
Concelebration
Dominus vobiscum
Ecclesiastical Latin
Good Friday prayer for the Jews
Intercession of saints
Ordinary & propers (common)
Oremus
Sunday

Lord's Day


Text and rubrics of the Roman Canon
Vulgate (Sixto-Clementine)

Latin Psalters







Related



Agape feast
Alternatim
Anaphora
Anima Christi
Aspersion
Catholic liturgy
Coetus Internationalis Patrum
Communities using the Tridentine Mass

Indult Catholic
traditionalist Catholic


Congregation for Divine Worship
Council of Trent
Deutsche Singmesse
Divine Office

Canonical hours
Choir dress
Roman Breviary


Eucharistic adoration & benediction

Holy Hour
Forty Hours' Devotion


Fasting and abstinence in the Roman Catholic Church
Fourth Council of the Lateran
French Organ Mass
Gospel Book
History of the Roman Canon
Latin liturgical rites
Latin Mass
Lex orandi, lex credendi
Litany
Liturgical Movement
Liturgical reforms of Pope Pius XII
Mass of Paul VI
Missal
Plenary indulgence
Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei
Pope Pius V
Preces
Pre-Tridentine Mass
Quattuor abhinc annos
Quo primum
Roman Catholic theology
Sacramentary
Sacraments of the Catholic Church
Spoon (liturgy)
Summorum Pontificum
Tra le sollecitudini
Western Rite Orthodoxy








 Catholicism portal










Links to related articles











v
t
e


Sacraments, rites, and liturgies of the Catholic Church



Sacraments



Baptism
Confirmation
Eucharist
Penance
Anointing of the Sick
Holy Orders
Matrimony








Mass



Low Mass
Missa Cantata
Solemn Mass
Pontifical High Mass
Papal Mass





Canonical
liturgical hours



Matins (nighttime)
Lauds (early morning)
Prime (first hour of daylight)
Terce (third hour)
Sext (noon)
Nones (ninth hour)
Vespers (sunset evening)
Compline (end of the day)





Other liturgical services



Asperges
Benediction of the Blessed Sacrament
Exorcism
Funeral

Requiem


Liturgy of the Hours





Liturgical literature



Antiphonary
Book of hours
Breviary
Gospel Book
Gradual
Lectionary
Martyrology
Psalter
Roman Missal
Roman Ritual
Sacramentary





Rites




Latin



Ambrosian Rite
Rite of Braga
Roman Rite

Mass of Paul VI
Extraordinary form
Anglican Use
Zaire Use







Eastern



Alexandrian Rite
Armenian Rite
Antiochene Rite
Byzantine Rite
East Syrian Rite
Mozarabic Rite
West Syrian Rite: Malankara Rite





Orders



Benedictine Rite
Carmelite Rite
Carthusian Rite
Cistercian Rite
Dominican Rite
Norbertine Rite





Defunct rites
and liturgies



African Rite
Aquileian Rite
Celtic Rite
Durham Rite
Gallican Rite
Use of Hereford
Missa Nautica
Missa Sicca
Missa Venatoria
Pre-Tridentine Mass
Use of York
Sarum Rite











 Catholicism portal












v
t
e


History of the Roman Rite Mass



Forms



Pre-Tridentine Mass
Tridentine Mass (Extraordinary form)
Mass of Paul VI (Ordinary form)








Calendars



Tridentine Calendar
General Roman Calendar of 1954
General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII
General Roman Calendar of 1960
General Roman Calendar (current)








 Catholicism portal












v
t
e


Traditionalist Catholicism




Movements advocating Catholic traditions less emphasised or abolished by the Second Vatican Council (1962–1965)



Groups and
movements





Part of the Roman Curia




Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei






In full communion
with the Holy See




Priestly Fraternity of St. Peter
Institute of Christ the King Sovereign Priest
Latin Mass Society of England and Wales
Personal Apostolic Administration of Saint John Mary Vianney
Institute of the Good Shepherd
Sons of the Most Holy Redeemer
Slaves of the Immaculate Heart of Mary
Fraternity of Saint Vincent Ferrer
Canons Regular of Saint John Cantius
Canons Regular of the New Jerusalem
Fœderatio Internationalis Juventutem
Fœderatio Internationalis Una Voce
Indult Catholics






Canonically irregular




Fraternité Notre-Dame
Society of Saint Pius X
SSPX Resistance






Sedevacantist




Conclavism
Sedeprivationism
Siri thesis
Congregation of Mary Immaculate Queen
Istituto Mater Boni Consilii
Society of St. Pius V








Doctrines,
rites and issues



Second Vatican Council
Modernism
Pascendi dominici gregis
Tridentine Mass
Mass of Paul VI
Summorum Pontificum
Ecumenism
Freedom of religion
Syllabus of Errors
Dignitatis humanae
Extra Ecclesiam nulla salus
"Papal Oath"





Prominent
people



Pope Pius X
Pope Pius XII
Pope Benedict XVI
Archbishop Marcel Lefebvre
Bishop Bernard Fellay
Bishop Richard Williamson
Bishop Antônio de Castro Mayer
Archbishop Ngô Đình Thục
Bishop Daniel Dolan
Fr. Gommar DePauw
Fr. Leonard Feeney
Joaquín Sáenz y Arriaga
Michael Davies








 Catholicism portal












v
t
e


Structure of the Mass of the Roman Rite of the Catholic Church



Forms



Pre-Tridentine Mass
Tridentine Mass

Extraordinary form


Mass of Paul VI





Types



Low Mass
Missa Cantata
Solemn Mass
Pontifical High Mass
Papal Mass
Ritual Masses

Blue Mass
Chapter and Conventual Mass
Coronation Mass
Nuptial Mass
Red Mass
Requiem Mass


sine populo
Votive Mass





Order of Mass





Pre-Mass




Vesting prayers in the sacristy
Asperges me

Vidi aquam in Eastertide








Liturgy of
the Word




Sign of the Cross
Psalm 43
Entrance Antiphon
Penitential Rite

Confiteor / Kyrie


Gloria
Dominus vobiscum
Collect

Oremus


First Reading
Responsorial Psalm or Gradual
Epistle
Alleluia

Gospel verse / sequence


Gospel
Homily
Credo

Niceno-Constantinopolitan Creed or Apostles' Creed


General Intercessions






Liturgy of
the Eucharist




Offertory

Orate fratres / prayer over the gifts


Preface

Sursum corda / Sanctus / Hosanna


Eucharistic Prayer/Canon of the Mass

oblation / epiclesis / Words of Institution / elevation / anamnesis
texts & rubrics
Roman Canon

History


Eucharistic Prayer II


Memorial Acclamation
Lord's Prayer

embolism / doxology


Pax
Sign of peace
Agnus Dei
Fraction
Holy Communion

Communion antiphon


Ablutions
Postcommunion
Dismissal

Ite, missa est / Benedicamus Domino


Last Gospel






Post-Mass




Leonine Prayers
Recessional hymn








Participants



Acolyte
Altar server

female


Bishop
Boat boy
Cantor
Choir
Crucifer
Deacon
Extraordinary minister of Holy Communion
Laity

Eucharistic Congress


Lector
Priest
Subdeacon
Usher





Parts of the
Sanctuary / Altar



Altar crucifix
Altar rails
Ambo
Communion bench
Credence table
Kneeler
Lavabo
Misericord
Piscina
Tabernacle





Altar cloths



Altar linens
Antependium
Burse
Chalice veil
Corporal
Lavabo towel
Pall
Purificator





Candles and lamps



Altar candle
Altar candlestick
Paschal candle
Sanctuary lamp
Triple candlestick
Votive candle





Liturgical objects



Altar bell
Aspergillum
Censer
Chalice
Ciborium
Collection basket
Cruet
Flabellum
Funghellino
Holy water
Incense

use


Manuterge
Paten
Processional cross
Pyx
Sacramental bread

wafer


Sacramental wine (or must)
Thurible
Water





Liturgical books
of the Roman Rite



Ceremonial of Bishops
Evangeliary

Gospel Book


Graduale
Lectionary
Roman Missal





Vestments



Alb
Amice
Chasuble
Dalmatic
Episcopal sandals
Liturgical colours
Headcover
Humeral veil
Pallium
Pontifical
Stole
Surplice
Tunicle
Vimpa





Liturgical year
(Roman Calendar)



Advent
Christmastide
Ordinary Time
Septuagesima
Lent
Passiontide
Holy Week

Paschal Triduum


Eastertide
Ascensiontide





Eucharistic
discipline



Abstemius
Anima Christi
Concelebration
Church etiquette
Closed communion
Communion and the developmentally disabled
Communion under both kinds
Denial of Communion

Canon 915


Eucharistic fast
First Communion
Frequent Communion
Genuflection
Host desecration
Infant communion
Intinction
Reserved sacrament
Thanksgiving after Communion
Viaticum





Eucharistic
theology



Body and Blood of Christ
Corpus Christi (feast)
Crucifixion of Jesus and substitutionary atonement
Epiousios
Grace ex opere operato
In persona Christi
Historical roots of Catholic Eucharistic theology
Koinonia
Last Supper
Mirae caritatis
Mysterium fidei (encyclical)
Origin of the Eucharist
Real presence
Transubstantiation
Year of the Eucharist
Stercoranism





Regulations
and concepts



Ad orientem & versus populum
Calendar of saints
Canon law
Code of Rubrics
Commemoration
Ecclesiastical Latin
General Instruction of the Roman Missal
Holy day of obligation
Intercession of saints
Ordinary & propers
Pro multis
Sunday

Lord's Day


Vernacular





Related



Agape feast
Catholic liturgy
Christian prayer

effects of prayer


Congregation for Divine Worship
Council of Trent
Ecclesia de Eucharistia
Eucharistic adoration & benediction

Dominicae Cenae / Holy Hour


Eucharistic miracle
Fermentum
Fourth Council of the Lateran
Gelineau psalmody
Gregorian chant
History of the Roman Canon
Lex orandi, lex credendi
Liturgical Movement
Liturgical reforms of Pope Pius XII
Mediator Dei
Missale Romanum (apostolic constitution)
Pope Paul VI
Catholic theology
Sacraments of the Catholic Church
Second Vatican Council

Sacrosanctum Concilium


Tridentine Mass
Summorum Pontificum
Tra le sollecitudini








 Catholicism portal















 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Tridentine_Mass&oldid=792722104"					
Categories: Tridentine MassCatholic liturgical ritesCatholic termsHidden categories: Articles incorporating a citation from the 1913 Catholic Encyclopedia with Wikisource referenceArticles containing Latin-language text 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БеларускаяCatalàČeštinaDeutschEspañolEsperantoFrançaisGaeilge한국어HrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaItalianoKiswahiliNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 28 July 2017, at 06:51.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Tridentine Mass - Wikipedia






















 






Tridentine Mass

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the forms of the Mass liturgy prior to 1570, see Pre-Tridentine Mass.




Elevation of the chalice after the consecration during a Solemn Mass


The Tridentine Mass, now officially often referred to as the Extraordinary Form of the Roman Rite ('Extraordinary Form for short; Latin: forma extraordinaria), is the Roman Rite Mass which appears in typical editions of the Roman Missal published from 1570 to 1962.[1] The most widely used Mass liturgy in the world until the introduction of the Mass of Paul VI in 1969, it is celebrated in ecclesiastical Latin.[2]
"Tridentine" is derived from the Latin Tridentinus, "related to the city of Tridentum" (modern-day Trent, Italy). In response to a decision of the Council of Trent,[3] Pope Pius V promulgated the 1570 Roman Missal, making it mandatory throughout the Latin Church, except in places and religious orders with missals from before 1370.[4] Despite being often described as "the (Traditional) Latin Mass", the Mass of Paul VI (the Novus Ordo Missae) that replaced it as the Ordinary Form of the Roman Rite has its official text in Latin and is sometimes celebrated in that language.[5][6]
In 2007, Pope Benedict XVI issued the motu proprio Summorum Pontificum, accompanied by a letter to the world's bishops authorizing use of the Tridentine Mass and Ritual for competent priests. The Pope stated that the 1962 edition of the Roman Missal is to be considered an "extraordinary form" (forma extraordinaria)[7] of the Roman Rite, of which the 1970 Mass of Paul VI is the ordinary, normal or standard form. Since that is the only authorized extraordinary form, some refer to the 1962 Tridentine Mass as "the extraordinary form" of the Mass.[8] The 1962 Tridentine Mass is sometimes referred to as the "usus antiquior" (older use) or "forma antiquior" (older form),[9] to differentiate it from the Mass of Paul VI, again in the sense of being the only one of the older forms for which authorization has been granted.
In Masses celebrated without the people, Latin Rite Catholic priests are free to use either the 1962 Tridentine missal or the Ordinary Form missal. These Masses "may—observing all the norms of law—also be attended by faithful who, of their own free will, ask to be admitted".[10] Permission to use the Tridentine Mass as parish liturgies may be given by the pastor or rector.[11]



Contents


1 Language
2 Terminology
3 Pope St. Pius V's revision of the liturgy
4 Historical variations

4.1 Typical editions of the Roman Missal
4.2 1962 Missal


5 Liturgical structure

5.1 Before Mass
5.2 Mass of the Catechumens

5.2.1 Prayers at the foot of the altar
5.2.2 Priest at the altar
5.2.3 Instruction


5.3 Mass of the Faithful

5.3.1 Offertory
5.3.2 Consecration
5.3.3 Elevation candle
5.3.4 Communion
5.3.5 Conclusion


5.4 Prayers of the priest before and after Mass
5.5 Leonine Prayers
5.6 Participation by the people


6 Different levels of celebration
7 Revision of the Roman Missal

7.1 Opposition to the latest revisions of the liturgy


8 Attitudes of Popes since the Second Vatican Council

8.1 Pope Paul VI
8.2 Pope John Paul II
8.3 Pope Benedict XVI


9 Present regulations
10 Present practice
11 See also
12 References
13 External links

13.1 Full texts of Tridentine Roman Missals
13.2 Texts of parts of the Tridentine Missal (post-1604)
13.3 History
13.4 Comparison with non-Roman Western rites and uses
13.5 Media
13.6 Directories of Latin Masses





Language[edit]
In most countries, the language used for celebrating the Tridentine Mass was (and is) Latin. However, in Dalmatia and parts of Istria in Croatia, the liturgy was celebrated in Church Slavonic, and authorisation for use of this language was extended to some other Slavic regions between 1886 and 1935.[12][13]
After the publication of the 1962 edition of the Roman Missal, the 1964 Instruction on implementing the Constitution on Sacred Liturgy of the Second Vatican Council laid down that "normally the epistle and gospel from the Mass of the day shall be read in the vernacular". Episcopal conferences were to decide, with the consent of the Holy See, what other parts, if any, of the Mass were to be celebrated in the vernacular.[14]
Outside the Roman Catholic Church, the vernacular language was introduced into the celebration of the Tridentine Mass by some Old Catholics and Anglo-Catholics with the introduction of the English Missal.
Some Western Rite Orthodox Christians, particularly in the Antiochian Orthodox Archdiocese of North America, use the Tridentine Mass in the vernacular with minor alterations under the title of the "Divine Liturgy of St. Gregory".
Most Old Catholics use the Tridentine Mass, either in the vernacular or in Latin.
Terminology[edit]




A pre-1969 Roman Rite high altar decorated with reredos and fixed on a three step platform, at which the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar are said. Leaning against the Tabernacle and two of the candlesticks are altar cards to remind the celebrant of the words when he is away from the missal


The Catholic Church uses the term extraordinary form of the Roman Rite Mass among other terms.[7] The most widespread term for the rite, other than "Tridentine Mass", is "Latin Mass". Likewise, the ordinary form of the Roman Rite Mass was promulgated in Latin and can be celebrated in that language.[15]
Occasionally the term "Gregorian Rite" is used when talking about the Tridentine Mass,[16][discuss] as is, more frequently, "Tridentine Rite".[17] Pope Benedict XVI declared it inappropriate to speak of the versions of the Roman Missal of before and after 1970 as if they were two rites. Rather, he said, it is a matter of a twofold use of one and the same rite.[18]
Traditionalist Catholics, whose best-known characteristic is an attachment to the Tridentine Mass, frequently refer to it as the "Traditional Mass" or the "Traditional Latin Mass". They describe as a "codifying" of the form of the Mass the preparation of Pius V's edition of the Roman Missal, of which he said that the experts to whom he had entrusted the work collated the existing text with ancient manuscripts and writings, restored it to "the original form and rite of the holy Fathers" and further emended it.[19] To distinguish this form of Mass from the Mass of Paul VI, traditionalist Catholics sometimes call it the "Mass of the Ages",[20][21][22][23][24][25] and say that it comes down to us "from the Church of the Apostles, and ultimately, indeed, from Him Who is its principal Priest and its spotless Victim".[26][27]
Pope St. Pius V's revision of the liturgy[edit]
At the time of the Council of Trent, the traditions preserved in printed and manuscript missals varied considerably, and standardization was sought both within individual dioceses and throughout the Latin West. Standardization was required also in order to prevent the introduction into the liturgy of Protestant ideas in the wake of the Protestant Reformation.
Pope St. Pius V accordingly imposed uniformity by law in 1570 with the papal bull "Quo primum", ordering use of the Roman Missal as revised by him.[19] He allowed only those rites that were at least 200 years old to survive the promulgation of his 1570 Missal. Several of the rites that remained in existence were progressively abandoned, though the Ambrosian rite survives in Milan, Italy and neighbouring areas, stretching even into Switzerland, and the Mozarabic rite remains in use to a limited extent in Toledo and Madrid, Spain. The Carmelite, Carthusian and Dominican religious orders kept their rites, but in the second half of the 20th century two of these three chose to adopt the Roman Rite. The rite of Braga, in northern Portugal, seems to have been practically abandoned: since 18 November 1971 that archdiocese authorizes its use only on an optional basis.[28]
Beginning in the late 17th century, France and neighbouring areas, such as Münster, Cologne and Trier in Germany, saw a flurry of independent missals published by bishops influenced by Jansenism and Gallicanism. This ended when Abbot Guéranger and others initiated in the 19th century a campaign to return to the Roman Missal.
Pius V's revision of the liturgy had as one of its declared aims the restoration of the Roman Missal "to the original form and rite of the holy Fathers".[19] Due to the relatively limited resources available to his scholars, this aim was in fact not realised.[29]
Three different printings of Pius V's Roman Missal, with minor variations, appeared in 1570, a folio and a quarto edition in Rome and a folio edition in Venice. A reproduction of what is considered to be the earliest, referred to therefore as the editio princeps, was produced in 1998.[30] In the course of the printing of the editio princeps, some corrections were made by pasting revised texts over parts of the already printed pages.[31] There were several printings again in the following year 1571, with various corrections of the text.[32]
Historical variations[edit]




Missale Romanum in Croatian Glagolitic script printed in 1483


In the Apostolic Constitution (papal bull) Quo primum, with which he prescribed use of his 1570 edition of the Roman Missal, Pius V decreed: "We order and enjoin that nothing must be added to Our recently published Missal, nothing omitted from it, nor anything whatsoever be changed within it." This of course did not exclude changes by a Pope, and Pope Pius V himself added to the Missal the feast of Our Lady of Victory, to celebrate the victory of Lepanto of 7 October 1571. His immediate successor, Pope Gregory XIII, changed the name of this feast to "The Most Holy Rosary of the Blessed Virgin Mary" and Pope John XXIII changed it to "Our Lady of the Rosary".
Pius V's work in severely reducing the number of feasts in the Roman Calendar (see this comparison) was very soon further undone by his successors. Feasts that he had abolished, such as those of the Presentation of Mary, Saint Anne and Saint Anthony of Padua, were restored even before Clement VIII's 1604 typical edition of the Missal was issued.
In the course of the following centuries new feasts were repeatedly added and the ranks of certain feasts were raised or lowered. A comparison between Pope Pius V's Tridentine Calendar and the General Roman Calendar of 1954 shows the changes made from 1570 to 1954. Pope Pius XII made a general revision in 1955, and Pope John XXIII made further general revisions in 1960 simplifying the terminology concerning the ranking of liturgical celebrations.
While keeping on 8 December what he called the feast of "the Conception of Blessed Mary" (omitting the word "Immaculate"), Pius V suppressed the existing special Mass for the feast, directing that the Mass for the Nativity of Mary (with the word "Nativity" replaced by "Conception") be used instead. Part of that earlier Mass was revived in the Mass that Pope Pius IX ordered to be used on the feast.
Typical editions of the Roman Missal[edit]




Altar of Santa Cecilia in Trastevere, as arranged in 1700:[33] one of many churches in Rome whose altar, placed at the western end of the church, was positioned so that the priest necessarily faced east, and so towards the people, when celebrating Mass[34]


In addition to such occasional changes, the Roman Missal was subjected to general revisions whenever a new "typical edition" (an official edition whose text was to be reproduced in printings by all publishers) was issued.
After Pius V's original Tridentine Roman Missal, the first new typical edition was promulgated in 1604 by Pope Clement VIII, who in 1592 had issued a revised edition of the Vulgate. The Bible texts in the Missal of Pope Pius V did not correspond exactly to the new Vulgate, and so Clement edited and revised Pope Pius V's Missal, making alterations both in the scriptural texts and in other matters. He abolished some prayers that the 1570 Missal obliged the priest to say on entering the church; shortened the two prayers to be said after the Confiteor; directed that the words "Haec quotiescumque feceritis, in meam memoriam facietis" ("Do this in memory of me") should not be said while displaying the chalice to the people after the consecration, but before doing so; inserted directions at several points of the Canon that the priest was to pronounce the words inaudibly; suppressed the rule that, at High Mass, the priest, even if not a bishop, was to give the final blessing with three signs of the cross; and rewrote the rubrics, introducing, for instance, the ringing of a small bell.[35]
The next typical edition was issued in 1634, when Pope Urban VIII made another general revision of the Roman Missal.[36]
There was no further typical edition until that of Pope Leo XIII in 1884.[37] It introduced only minor changes, not profound enough to merit having the papal bull of its promulgation included in the Missal, as the bulls of 1604 and 1634 were.
In 1911, with the bull Divino Afflatu,[38] Pope Pius X made significant changes in the rubrics. He died in 1914, so it fell to his successor Pope Benedict XV to issue a new typical edition incorporating his changes. This 1920 edition included a new section headed: "Additions and Changes in the Rubrics of the Missal in accordance with the Bull Divino afflatu and the Subsequent Decrees of the Sacred Congregation of Rites". This additional section was almost as long as the previous section on the "General Rubrics of the Missal", which continued to be printed unchanged.
Pope Pius XII radically revised the Palm Sunday and Easter Triduum liturgy, suppressed many vigils and octaves and made other alterations in the calendar (see General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII), reforms that were completed in Pope John XXIII's 1960 Code of Rubrics, which were incorporated in the final 1962 typical edition of the Tridentine Missal, replacing both Pius X's "Additions and Changes in the Rubrics of the Missal" and the earlier "General Rubrics of the Missal".
Changes made to the liturgy in 1965 and 1967 in the wake of decisions of the Second Vatican Council were not incorporated in the Roman Missal, but were reflected in the provisional vernacular translations produced when the language of the people began to be used in addition to Latin. This explains the references sometimes seen to "the 1965 Missal".
The General Roman Calendar was revised partially in 1955 and 1960 and completely in 1969 in Pope Paul VI's motu proprio Mysterii Paschalis, again reducing the number of feasts.[39]
1962 Missal[edit]
The Roman Missal issued by Pope John XXIII in 1962 differed from earlier editions in a number of ways.

It incorporated the change made by John XXIII in 1962, when he inserted into the canon of the Mass the name of Saint Joseph, the first change for centuries in the canon of the Mass.[40]
It incorporated major changes that Pope Pius XII made in 1955 in the liturgy of Palm Sunday and the Easter Triduum. These included:

Abolition of the ceremonies whereby the blessing of palms on Palm Sunday resembled a Mass, with Epistle, Gospel, Preface and Sanctus; suppression of the knocking three times on the closed doors before returning to the church after the blessing and distribution of the palms; omission of the prayers at the foot of the altar and of the Last Gospel.
On Holy Thursday the washing of feet was incorporated into the Mass instead of being an independent ceremony; if done by a bishop, 12 men, not 13, had their feet washed; the Mass itself was said in the evening instead of the morning and some of its prayers were removed or altered.
On Good Friday, elements that suggested the usual practices of the Mass were removed: the sacred ministers began the liturgy in alb and (for celebrant and deacon) black stoles, rather than respectively in black chasuble, dalmatic, and tunicle, as per a typical Mass; the sacred ministers donned their vestments (without maniples) only for the Solemn Intercessions, in which the celebrant wore a cope instead of a chasuble, and removed them for the adoration of the Cross; the sacred ministers changed to violet vestments (again, without maniples) for the distribution of Holy Communion; "Let us pray. Let us kneel. Arise" was added at the prayer for the Jews, and the adjective perfidis was removed (see Good Friday Prayer for the Jews); an afternoon Communion Service replaced the morning Mass of the Presanctified, at which the priest alone received the earlier-consecrated host, and drank unconsecrated wine into which a small portion of the consecrated host had been put.
The Easter Vigil was moved from Holy Saturday morning to the following nighttime; the use of a triple candle was abolished and other changes were made both to the initial ceremonies centred on the Paschal Candle and to other parts, such as the reduction from twelve to four of the prophecies read, and the introduction of a "renewal of baptismal promises" for the laity (notable for being the first time since the codification of the Missal of Pope Pius V that the vernacular was permitted to be used in such a manner).


It incorporated the rubrical changes made by Pope Pius XII's 1955 decree Cum nostra, which included:

Vigils were abolished except those of Easter, Christmas, Ascension, Pentecost, Saints Peter and Paul, Saint John the Baptist, and Saint Lawrence;
all octaves were abolished except those of Easter, Christmas and Pentecost;
no more than three collects were to be said at Low Mass and one at Solemn Mass.


Its calendar incorporated both the changes made by Pope Pius XII in 1955 (General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII) and those introduced by Pope John XXIII himself with his 1960 Code of Rubrics (General Roman Calendar of 1960). These included:

suppression of the "Solemnity of Saint Joseph, Spouse of the Blessed Virgin Mary" (Wednesday after the second Sunday after Easter) and its replacement by the feast of "Saint Joseph the Worker" (1 May);
removal of some duplicate feasts that appeared twice in earlier versions of the calendar, namely, the Chair of Saint Peter at Rome (18 January), the Finding of the Holy Cross (3 May), Saint John before the Latin Gate (6 May), the Apparition of Saint Michael (8 May), Saint Peter in Chains (1 August), and the Invention of the Relics of Saint Stephen (3 August);
addition of feasts such as that of the Queenship of Mary (31 May).


It replaced the Roman Missal's introductory sections, Rubricae generales Missalis (General Rubrics of the Missal) and Additiones et variationes in rubricis Missalis ad normam Bullae "Divino afflatu" et subsequentium S.R.C. Decretorum (Additions and alterations to the Rubrics of the Missal in line with the Bull Divino afflatu and the subsequent decrees of the Sacred Congregation of Rites), with the text of the General Rubrics and the General Rubrics of the Roman Missal parts of the 1960 Code of Rubrics.

Pope Benedict XVI authorized, under certain conditions, continued use of this 1962 edition of the Roman Missal as an extraordinary form of the Roman Rite,[41] alongside the later form, introduced in 1970, which is now the normal or ordinary form.[42] Pre-1962 forms of the Roman Rite, which some individuals and groups employ,[43] are not authorized for liturgical use.
Liturgical structure[edit]
The Mass is divided into two parts, the Mass of the Catechumens and the Mass of the Faithful. Catechumens, those being instructed in the faith,[44] were once dismissed after the first half, not having yet professed the faith. Profession of faith was considered essential for participation in the Eucharistic sacrifice.[45]
This rule of the Didache is still in effect. It is only one of the three conditions (baptism, right faith and right living) for admission to receiving Holy Communion that the Catholic Church has always applied and that were already mentioned in the early 2nd century by Saint Justin Martyr: "And this food is called among us the Eucharist, of which no one is allowed to partake but the man who believes that the things which we teach are true, and who has been washed with the washing that is for the remission of sins, and unto regeneration, and who is so living as Christ has enjoined" (First Apology, Chapter LXVI).
Before Mass[edit]

Asperges (Sprinkling with holy water, Psalm 51:9, 3) is an optional penitential rite that ordinarily precedes only the principal Mass on Sunday.[46] In the sacristy, a priest wearing an alb, if he is to celebrate the Mass, or surplice, if he is not the celebrant of the Mass, and vested with a stole, which is the color of the day if the priest is the celebrant of the Mass or purple if he is not the celebrant of the Mass, exorcises and blesses salt and water, then puts the blessed salt into the water by thrice sprinkling it in the form of a cross while saying once, "Commixtio salis et aquæ pariter fiat in nomine Patris, et Filii et Spiritus Sancti" (May a mixture of salt and water now be made in the name of the Father, and of the Son, and of the Holy Spirit). After that, the priest, vested in a cope of the color of the day, while the choir sings an antiphon and a verse of Psalm 50/51 or 117/118, sprinkles with the holy water the altar three times, and then the clergy and the congregation. This rite, if used, precedes the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar. During the Easter season, the "Asperges me..." verse is replaced by the "Vidi aquam..." verse, and "Alleluia" is added to the "Ostende nobis..." verse and to its response.

Following the Asperges, Mass begins.
Mass of the Catechumens[edit]
The first part is the Mass of the Catechumens.[47]
Prayers at the foot of the altar[edit]




Prayers at the foot of the altar


The sequence of Prayers at the foot of the altar is:

Sign of the cross


The priest, after processing in—at solemn Mass with deacon, and subdeacon, master of ceremonies and servers, and at other Masses with one or more servers—and at Low Mass placing the veiled chalice on the centre of the altar, makes the sign of the cross at the foot of the altar. At Solemn Mass, the chalice is placed beforehand on the credence table.


Psalm 42 (Psalm 43 MT, i.e. Masoretic numbering), known by its incipit Iudica me, is recited, except in Masses of the season during Passiontide and in Requiem Masses. It is preceded and followed by an antiphon of Psalm 42:4 (43:4 MT) "Introibo ad altare Dei, ad Deum qui lætificat iuventutem meam" (Translation: "I shall go in to the altar of God, the God who gives joy to my youth"), is recited by the priest, alternating with the deacon and subdeacon (if present) or servers.
Psalm 124:8 is recited:


Priest (makes the sign of the cross): "Our help is in the name of the Lord,"
Servers: "Who made heaven and earth."


The double form of a prayer of general confession of sins, known by its incipit Confiteor (I confess), is recited:


Priest (while bowing low): "Confíteor Deo omnipoténti, beátæ Maríæ semper Vírgini, beáto Michaéli Archángelo, beáto Ioanni Baptístæ, sanctis Apóstolis Petro et Paulo, ómnibus Sanctis, et vobis, fratres (tibi, Pater), quia peccávi nimis cogitatióne, verbo et ópere: (while striking the breast three times) mea culpa, mea culpa, mea máxima culpa. Ideo precor beátam Maríam semper Vírginem, beátum Michaélem Archángelum, beátum Ioánnem Baptístam, sanctos Apóstolos Petrum et Paulum, omnes Sanctos, et vos, fratres (te, Pater), oráre pro me ad Dóminum Deum nostrum."

(Translation: I confess to almighty God, to blessed Mary ever Virgin, to blessed Michael the archangel, to blessed John the Baptist, to the holy apostles Peter and Paul, to all the saints, and to you, brethren, that I have sinned exceedingly in thought, word, and deed through my fault, through my fault, through my most grievous fault. Therefore, I beseech blessed Mary ever Virgin ... and you, brethren, to pray to the Lord our God for me.)


The servers pray for the priest: "May Almighty God have mercy on thee, forgive thee thy sins, and bring thee to life everlasting." Then it is the ministers' or servers' turn to confess sinfulness and to ask for prayers. They use the same words as those used by the priest, except that they say "you, Father," in place of "you, brethren", and the priest responds with the same prayer that the servers have used for him (but using the plural number) plus an extra prayer.


Some verses are then said by priest and ministers (or servers), ending with the priest saying Oremus te Domine (Let us pray) After this he ascends to the altar, praying silently "Take away from us our iniquities" "that with pure minds we may worthily enter into the holy of holies", a reference to Exodus 26:33-34, 1 Kings 6:16, 1 Kings 8:6, 2 Chronicles 3:8, Ezekiel 41:4, and others. He places his joined hands on the edge of the altar, so that only the tips of the small fingers touch the front of it, and silently prays that, by the merits of the Saints whose relics are in the altar, God may pardon all his sins. At the words quorum relíquiæ hic sunt (whose relics are here), he spreads his hands and kisses the altar.

Priest at the altar[edit]




Dominus vobiscum ("The Lord be with you") before the Collect.
In the Tridentine Mass the priest should keep his eyes downcast at this point.[48]



Introit

The priest again makes the sign of the Cross while he begins to read the Introit, which is usually taken from a Psalm. Exceptions occur: e.g. the Introit for Easter Sunday is adapted from Wis 10:20-21, and the antiphon in Masses of the Blessed Virgin Mary was from the poet Sedulius. This evolved from the practice of singing a full Psalm, interspersed with the antiphon, during the entrance of the clergy, before the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar were added to the Mass in medieval times. This is indicated by the very name of "Introit".


Kyrie

This part of Mass is a linguistic marker of the origins of the Roman liturgy in Greek. "Kyrie, eleison; Christe, eleison; Kyrie, eleison." means "Lord, have mercy; Christ have mercy;..." Each phrase is said (or sung) three times.


Gloria in excelsis Deo

The first line of the Gloria[49] is taken from Lk 2:14. The Gloria is omitted during the penitential liturgical seasons of Advent, Septuagesima, Lent, and Passiontide, in which violet vestments are worn, but is used on feasts falling during such seasons, as well as on Holy Thursday. It is always omitted for a Requiem Mass.


The Collect

The priest turns toward the people and says, "Dominus vobiscum." The servers respond: "Et cum spiritu tuo." ("The Lord be with you." "And with thy spirit"). The Collect follows, a prayer not drawn directly from Scripture. It tends to reflect the season.



Instruction[edit]

The priest reads the Epistle, primarily an extract from the letters of St. Paul to various churches. In his motu proprio Summorum Pontificum, Pope Benedict XVI has permitted this to be read in the vernacular language when Mass is celebrated with the people.[50]
Between the Epistle and the Gospel two (rarely three) choir responses are sung or said. Usually these are a Gradual followed by an Alleluia; but between Septuagesima Sunday and Holy Saturday, or in a Requiem Mass or other penitential Mass the Alleluia is replaced by a Tract, and between Easter Sunday and Pentecost the Gradual is replaced by a second Alleluia. On a few exceptional occasions (most notably Easter, Pentecost, Corpus Christi, and in a Requiem Mass), a Sequence follows the Alleluia or Tract.

The Gradual is partly composed of a portion of a Psalm.


The Gospel reading, an extract from one of the four Gospels

Before the reading or chanting of the Gospel, the priest prays: "Cleanse my heart and my lips, O almighty God, who didst cleanse the lips of the prophet Isaias...", a reference to Isaiah 6:6. In this passage, after being cleansed by the angel, Isaiah was instructed to prophesy.


The Homily

The rite of Mass as revised by Pope Pius V (the Tridentine Mass) does not consider a sermon obligatory and speaks of it instead as merely optional: it presumes that the Creed, if it is to be said, will follow the Gospel immediately, but adds: "If, however, someone is to preach, the Homilist, after the Gospel has been finished, preaches, and when the sermon or moral address has been completed, the Credo is said, or if it is not to be said, the Offertory is sung."[51] By contrast the Roman Missal as revised by Pope Paul VI declares that the homily may not be omitted without a grave reason from Mass celebrated with the people attending on Sundays and Holy Days of Obligation and that it is recommended on other days.[52]


The Creed

This is the Nicene Creed, professing faith in God the Father, in God the Son, the Word made flesh, in God the Holy Ghost, and in the Holy Church. At the mention of the Incarnation, the celebrant and the congregation genuflect.



Mass of the Faithful[edit]
The second part is the Mass of the Faithful.[53]
Offertory[edit]

Offertory Verse

After greeting the people once more ("Dominus vobiscum/Et cum spiritu tuo") and giving the invitation to pray (Oremus), the priest enters upon the Mass of the Faithful, from which the non-baptized were once excluded. He reads the Offertory Verse, a short quotation from Holy Scripture which varies with the Mass of each day, with hands joined.


Offering of Bread and Wine

The priest offers the host, holding it on the paten at breast level and praying that, although he is unworthy, God may accept "this spotless host (or victim, the basic meaning of hostia in Latin) for his own innumerable sins, offences and neglects, for all those present, and for all faithful Christians living and dead, that it may avail unto salvation of himself and those mentioned. He then mixes a few drops of water with the wine, which will later become the Blood of Jesus, and holding the chalice so that the lip of the chalice is about the height of his lips, offers "the chalice of salvation", asking that it may "ascend with a sweet fragrance." He then prays a prayer of contrition adapted from Dan 3:39-40.


Incensing of the offerings and of the faithful

At a High Mass, the priest blesses the incense, then incenses the bread and wine. Among the prayers the priest says is Psalm 141:2-4: "Let my prayer, O Lord, be directed as incense in Thy sight;...", which is prayed as he incenses the altar. The priest then gives the thurible to the deacon, who incenses the priest, then the other ministers and the congregation.


Washing the hands

The priest prays Psalm 26:6-12: "I will wash my hands among the innocent..."


Prayer to the Most Holy Trinity

This prayer asks that the Divine Trinity may receive the oblation being made in remembrance of the passion, resurrection and ascension of Jesus and in honour of blessed Mary ever Virgin and the other saints, "that it may avail to their honour and our salvation: and that they may vouchsafe to intercede for us in heaven..."


Orate fratres, Suscipiat and Secret; Amen concludes Offertory

Here the priest turns to the congregation and says the first two words, "Orate, fratres," in an elevated tone and then turns around while finishing the exhortation in the secret tone. "Pray, Brethren, that my sacrifice and yours may be acceptable to God the Father almighty."
The altar servers respond with the Suscipiat to which the priest secretly responds, "Amen.": Suscipiat Dominus sacrificium de manibus tuis, ad laudem et gloriam nominis sui, ad utilitatem quoque nostram, totiusque ecclesiæ suae sanctæ. A translation in the English is: "May the Lord accept this sacrifice at your hands, to the praise and glory of His name, for our good and the good of all His Holy Church."
The Priest then says the day's Secret inaudibly, and concludes it with Per omnia sæcula sæculorum aloud.
The altar servers and (in dialogue Mass) the congregation respond: "Amen."



Consecration[edit]








Preface of the Canon

"The Roman Canon dates in essentials from before St. Gregory the Great, who died in 604, and who is credited with adding a phrase to it.[54] (See History of the Roman Canon.) It contains the main elements found in almost all rites, but in an unusual arrangement and it is unclear which part should be considered to be the Epiclesis.
Dominus vobiscum. Et cum spiritu tuo. Sursum corda. Habemus ad Dominum. Gratias agamus Domino Deo nostro. Dignum et iustum est. The first part can be seen above at the Collect; the rest means: Lift up your hearts. We lift them up to the Lord. Let us give thanks to the Lord our God. It is right and just.
Next a preface is prayed, indicating specific reasons for giving thanks to God. This leads to the Sanctus.[55]


Canon or rule of consecration[56]

Intercession (corresponding to the reading of the diptychs in the Byzantine Rite—a diptych is a two-leaf painting, carving or writing tablet.[57])

Here the priest prays for the living, that God may guard, unite and govern the Church together with the Pope and "all those who, holding to the truth, hand on the catholic and apostolic faith". Then specific living people are mentioned, and the congregation in the church. Next, Mary ever Virgin, Saint Joseph, the Apostles, and some Popes and other Martyrs are mentioned by name, as well as a generic "and all your Saints", in communion with whom prayer is offered.


Prayers preparatory to the consecration

A prayer that God may graciously accept the offering and "command that we be delivered from eternal damnation and counted among the flock of those you have chosen".


Consecration (transubstantiation) and major elevation




Elevation of the chalice during the Canon of the Mass at a Solemn Mass



The passage Lk 22:19-20 is key in this section. In Summa Theologiae III 78 3 Thomas Aquinas addresses the interspersed phrase, "the mystery of faith". On this phrase, see Mysterium fidei.


Oblation of the victim to God

An oblation is an offering;[58] the pure, holy, spotless victim is now offered, with a prayer that God may accept the offering and command his holy angel to carry the offering to God's altar on high, so that those who receive the Body and Blood of Christ "may be filled with every grace and heavenly blessing".


Remembrance of the Dead

The priest now prays for the dead ("those who have gone before us with the sign of faith and rest in the sleep of peace") and asks that they be granted a place of refreshment, light and peace. This is followed by a prayer that we be granted fellowship with the Saints. John the Baptist and fourteen martyrs, seven men and seven women, are mentioned by name.


End of the Canon and doxology with minor elevation

The concluding doxology is: "Through him, and with him, and in him, O God, almighty Father, in the unity of the Holy Spirit, all glory and honour is yours, for ever and ever." "Amen" ratifies the Canon prayer.





Elevation candle[edit]




Beuron Art School representation of an elevation candle, mistakenly placed at the Gospel side and upon the altar


Until 1960, the Tridentine form of the Roman Missal laid down that a candle should be placed at the Epistle side of the altar and that it should be lit at the showing of the consecrated sacrament to the people.[59] In practice, except in monasteries and on special occasions, this had fallen out of use long before Pope John XXIII replaced the section on the general rubrics of the Roman Missal with his Code of Rubrics, which no longer mentioned this custom. On this, see Elevation candle.
Communion[edit]




Before receiving Communion from the chalice, the priest makes the sign of the cross over himself, saying (in Latin): May the Blood of our Lord Jesus Christ keep my soul for eternal life. Amen.

























The Lord's Prayer and Libera nos[60]




The "Libera nos" is an extension of the Lord's Prayer developing the line "sed libera nos a malo" ("but deliver us from evil"). The priest prays that we may be delivered from all evils and that the Virgin Mary, Mother of God, together with the apostles and saints, may intercede to obtain for us peace in our day.




Fraction of the Host




During the preceding prayer, the priest breaks the consecrated Host into three parts, and after concluding the prayer drops the smallest part into the Chalice while praying that this commingling and consecration of the Body and Blood of Christ may "be to us who receive it effectual to life everlasting."




Agnus Dei




"Agnus Dei" means "Lamb of God". The priest then prays: "Lamb of God, who takest away the sins of the world, have mercy on us." He repeats this, and then adds: "Lamb of God, who takest away the sins of the world, grant us peace." The Mass of the Last Supper on Holy Thursday has "have mercy on us" all three times. In Requiem Masses, the petitions are "grant them rest" (twice), followed by "grant them eternal rest."


























The Pax

The priest asks Christ to look not at the priest's sins but at the faith of Christ's Church, and prays for peace and unity within the Church. Then, if a High Mass is being celebrated, he gives the sign of peace to the deacon, saying: "Peace be with you."


Prayers preparatory to the Communion

In the first of these two prayers for himself, the priests asks that by Holy Communion he may be freed from all his iniquities and evils, be made to adhere to the commandments of Jesus and never be separated from him. In the second he asks: "Let not the partaking of Thy Body, O Lord Jesus Christ...turn to my judgment and condemnation: but through Thy goodness may it be unto me a safeguard...."


Receiving of the Body and Blood of our Lord

The priest quietly says several prayers here, before receiving Communion. The first is said in a low voice while taking up the Host onto the paten. The second of them, spoken three times in a slightly audible voice,[61] while the priest holds the Host in his left hand and strikes his breast with his right, is based on Matthew 8:8: "Lord, I am not worthy...." Then, after having reverently consumed the Host, he takes up the chalice while in a low voice reciting Psalm 116:12-13: "What shall I render to the Lord, for all the things he hath rendered unto me? I will take the chalice of salvation; and I will call upon the name of the Lord." immediately adding Psalm 18:4: "Praising I will call upon the Lord: and I shall be saved from my enemies."







Priest on the "Ecce Agnus Dei - Behold the Lamb of God" in the people communion.





If the priest is to give Communion to others, he holds up a small host and says aloud: "Behold the Lamb of God ...", and three times: "Lord, I am not worthy ...". He then gives Communion, first making with the host the sign of the cross over each communicant, while saying: "May the Body of Our Lord Jesus Christ preserve your soul for eternal life. Amen."[62]



Conclusion[edit]




"Ite, missa est" sung by the deacon at a Solemn Mass.



Prayers during the Ablutions

The prayers now focus on what has been received, that "we may receive with a pure mind", "that no stain of sin may remain in me, whom these pure and holy sacraments have refreshed."


Communion Antiphon and Postcommunion

The communion antiphon is normally a portion of a Psalm. The Postcommunion Prayer is akin to the Collect in being an appropriate prayer not directly drawn from Scripture.


Ite Missa est; Blessing

"Go, it is the dismissal." The word "Mass" derives from this phrase.
After saying a silent prayer for himself, the priest then gives the people his blessing.
Prior to the revisions of Pope Pius XII and Pope John XXIII, the Ite Missa est was replaced with Benedicamus Domino ("Let us bless the Lord") on days in which the Gloria was not said and the rubrics required the priest to wear violet vestments (i.e., Masses of the season during Advent, Septuagesima, Lent and Passiontide; vigils; certain votive Masses). In the 1962 Missal, Benedicamus Domino is said only when the Mass is followed by another liturgical action, such as the Eucharistic Processions on Holy Thursday and Corpus Christi.
In Requiem Masses, the Ite Missa est is replaced with Requiescant in pace, with the response being "Amen" instead of Deo gratias.


The Last Gospel

The priest then reads the Last Gospel, the beginning of the Gospel of John, John 1:1-14, which recounts the Incarnation of the Son of God. On certain occasions, as for instance at the Day Mass on Christmas Day, another Gospel passage was read instead because that Gospel is read as the Gospel of the Mass, but Pope John XXIII's revision of the rubrics decreed that on those and on other occasions the Last Gospel should simply be omitted.



Prayers of the priest before and after Mass[edit]
The Tridentine Missal includes prayers for the priest to say before and after Mass.
In later editions of the Roman Missal, including that of 1962, the introductory heading of these prayers indicates that they are to be recited pro opportunitate (as circumstances allow),[63] which in practice means that they are merely optional and may be omitted. The original Tridentine Missal presents most of the prayers as obligatory, indicating as optional only a very long prayer attributed to Saint Ambrose (which later editions divide into seven sections, each to be recited on only one day of the week) and two other prayers attributed to Saint Ambrose and Saint Thomas Aquinas respectively.[64]
In addition to these three prayers, the original Tridentine Missal proposes for the priest to recite before he celebrates Mass the whole of Psalms 83–85, 115, 129 (the numbering is that of the Septuagint and Vulgate), and a series of collect-style prayers. Later editions add, after the three that in the original Missal are only optional, prayers to the Blessed Virgin, Saint Joseph, all the angels and saints, and the saint whose Mass is to be celebrated, but, as has been said, treats as optional all the prayers before Mass, even those originally given as obligatory.[65]
The original Tridentine Missal proposes for recitation by the priest after Mass three prayers, including the Adoro te devote. Later editions place before these three the Canticle of the Three Youths (Dan)[66] with three collects, and follow them with the Anima Christi and seven more prayers, treating as optional even the three prescribed in the original Tridentine Missal.[67]
Leonine Prayers[edit]
From 1884 to 1965, the Holy See prescribed the recitation after Low Mass of certain prayers, originally for the solution of the Roman Question and, after this problem was solved by the Lateran Treaty, "to permit tranquillity and freedom to profess the faith to be restored to the afflicted people of Russia".[68]
These prayers are known as the Leonine Prayers because it was Pope Leo XIII who on 6 January 1884 ordered their recitation throughout the world. In what had been the Papal States, they were already in use since 1859.
The prayers comprised three Ave Marias, one Salve Regina followed by a versicle and response, and a collect prayer that, from 1886 on, asked for the conversion of sinners and "the freedom and exaltation of Holy Mother the Church", and, again from 1886 on, a prayer to Saint Michael. In 1904, Pope Pius X added a thrice-repeated "Most Sacred Heart of Jesus, have mercy on us."
In 1964, with effect from 7 March 1965, the Holy See ended the obligation to recite the Leonine Prayers after Low Mass.[69] However, the Leonine Prayers are sometimes still recited after present-day celebrations of Tridentine Mass, although they are not included even in the 1962 edition of the Tridentine Missal.
Participation by the people[edit]




Nuptial Low Mass






Distribution of Communion at a Tridentine Mass: typically, the faithful kneel and receive in the mouth and women wear a headcovering.


The participation of the congregation at the Tridentine Mass is interior, involving eye and heart, and exterior by mouth.[70]
Except in the Dialogue Mass form, which arose about 1910 and led to a more active exterior participation of the congregation, the people present at the Tridentine Mass do not recite out loud the prayers of the Mass. Only the server or servers join with the priest in reciting the prayers at the foot of the altar (which include the Confiteor) and in speaking the other responses.[71] Most of the prayers that the priest says are spoken inaudibly, including almost all the Mass of the Faithful: the offertory prayers, the Canon of the Mass (except for the preface and the final doxology), and (apart from the Agnus Dei) those between the Lord's Prayer and the postcommunion.
At a Solemn Mass or Missa Cantata, a choir sings the servers' responses, except for the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar. The choir sings the Introit, the Kyrie, the Gloria, the Gradual, the Tract or Alleluia, the Credo, the Offertory and Communion antiphons, the Sanctus, and the Agnus Dei. Of these, only the five that form part of the Ordinary of the Mass are usually sung at a Missa Cantata. In addition to the Gregorian Chant music for these, polyphonic compositions exist, some quite elaborate. The priest largely says quietly the words of the chants and then recites other prayers while the choir continues the chant.
Different levels of celebration[edit]
There are various forms of celebration of the Tridentine Mass:

Pontifical High Mass: celebrated by a bishop accompanied by an assisting priest, deacon, subdeacon, thurifer, acolytes and other ministers, under the guidance of a priest acting as Master of Ceremonies. Most often the specific parts assigned to deacon and subdeacon are performed by priests. The parts that are said aloud are all chanted, except that the Prayers at the Foot of the Altar, which before the reform of Pope Pius V were said in the sacristy, are said quietly by the bishop with the deacon and the subdeacon, while the choir sings the Introit. The main difference between a pontifical and an ordinary High Mass is that the bishop remains at his throne almost all the time until the offertory.
Solemn or High Mass (Latin: Missa solemnis): offered by a priest accompanied by a deacon and subdeacon and the other ministers mentioned above.
Missa Cantata (Latin for "sung mass"): celebrated by a priest without deacon and subdeacon, and thus a form of Low Mass, but with some parts (the three variable prayers, the Scripture readings, Preface, Pater Noster, and Ite Missa Est) sung by the priest, and other parts (Introit, Kyrie, Gloria, Gradual, Tract or Alleluia, Credo, Offertory Antiphon, Sanctus and Benedictus, Agnus Dei, and Communion Antiphon) sung by the choir. Incense may be used exactly as at a Solemn Mass with the exception of incensing the celebrant after the Gospel which is not done.
Low Mass: the priest sings no part of the Mass, though in some places a choir or the congregation sings, during the Mass, hymns not always directly related to the Mass.

In its article "The Liturgy of the Mass", the 1917 Catholic Encyclopedia describes how, when concelebration ceased to be practised in Western Europe, Low Mass became distinguished from High Mass:[72]

The separate celebrations then involved the building of many altars in one church and the reduction of the ritual to the simplest possible form. The deacon and subdeacon were in this case dispensed with; the celebrant took their part as well as his own. One server took the part of the choir and of all the other ministers, everything was said instead of being sung, the incense and kiss of peace were omitted. So we have the well-known rite of low Mass (missa privata). This then reacted on high Mass (missa solemnis), so that at high Mass too the celebrant himself recites everything, even though it be sung by the deacon, subdeacon, or choir.

On the origin of the "Missa Cantata", the same source gives the following information:

... high Mass is the norm; it is only in the complete rite with deacon and subdeacon that the ceremonies can be understood. Thus, the rubrics of the Ordinary of the Mass always suppose that the Mass is high. Low Mass, said by a priest alone with one server, is a shortened and simplified form of the same thing. Its ritual can be explained only by a reference to high Mass. For instance, the celebrant goes over to the north side of the altar to read the Gospel, because that is the side to which the deacon goes in procession at high Mass; he turns round always by the right, because at high Mass he should not turn his back to the deacon and so on. A sung Mass (missa Cantata) is a modern compromise. It is really a low Mass, since the essence of high Mass is not the music but the deacon and subdeacon. Only in churches which have no ordained person except one priest, and in which high Mass is thus impossible, is it allowed to celebrate the Mass (on Sundays and feasts) with most of the adornment borrowed from high Mass, with singing and (generally) with incense.

Revision of the Roman Missal[edit]
Pius XII began in earnest the work of revising the Roman Missal with a thorough revision of the rites of Holy Week, which, after an experimental period beginning in 1951, was made obligatory in 1955. The Mass that used to be said on Holy Thursday morning was moved to the evening, necessitating a change in the rule that previously had required fasting from midnight. The Good Friday service was moved to the afternoon, Holy Communion was no longer reserved for the priest alone (as before, hosts consecrated at the Holy Thursday Mass were used) and the priest no longer received part of the host in unconsecrated wine. The Easter Vigil service that used to be held in morning of Holy Saturday[73] was moved to the night that leads to Easter Sunday and many changes were made to the content.
In 1960, Pope John XXIII (1958–1963) ordered the suppression of the word "perfidis" ("unbelieving" i.e. not believing in Jesus), applied to the Jews, in the rites for Good Friday. He revised the rubrics to the Order of Mass and the Breviary. Two years later, in 1962, he made some more minor modifications on the occasion of publishing a new typical edition of the Roman Missal. This is the edition authorized for use by virtue of the Quattuor abhinc annos indult (see below, under Present status of the Tridentine Mass). Among the other changes he made and that were included in the 1962 Missal were: adding St. Joseph's name to the Roman Canon; eliminating the second Confiteor before Communion; suppressing 10 feasts, such as St. Peter's Chair in Rome (or, more accurately, combining both feasts of St Peter's Chair into one, as they originally had been); incorporating the abolition of 4 festal octaves and 9 vigils of feasts and other changes made by Pope Pius XII; and modifying rubrics especially for Solemn High Masses.[74] Among the names that disappeared from the Roman Missal was that of St Philomena: her liturgical celebration had never been admitted to the General Roman Calendar, but from 1920 it had been included (with an indication that the Mass was to be taken entirely from the common) in the section headed "Masses for some places", i.e. only those places for which it had been specially authorized; but her name had already in 1961 been ordered to be removed from all liturgical calendars.
On 4 December 1963, the Second Vatican Council decreed in Chapter II of its Constitution on the Sacred Liturgy Sacrosanctum Concilium:[75]

"[T]he rite of the Mass is to be revised ... the rites are to be simplified, due care being taken to preserve their substance. Parts which with the passage of time came to be duplicated, or were added with little advantage, are to be omitted. Other parts which suffered loss through accidents of history are to be restored to the vigor they had in the days of the holy Fathers, as may seem useful or necessary. The treasures of the Bible are to be opened up more lavishly so that a richer fare may be provided for the faithful at the table of God’s word ... A suitable place may be allotted to the vernacular in Masses which are celebrated with the people ... communion under both kinds may be granted when the bishops think fit...as, for instance, to the newly ordained in the Mass of their sacred ordination, to the newly professed in the Mass of their religious profession, and to the newly baptized in the Mass which follows their baptism..."

The instruction Inter Oecumenici of 26 September 1964 initiated the application to the Mass of the decisions that the Council had taken less than a year before. Permission was given for use, only in Mass celebrated with the people, of the vernacular language, especially in the Biblical readings and the reintroduced Prayers of the Faithful, but, "until the whole of the Ordinary of the Mass has been revised," in the chants (Kyrie, Gloria, Creed, Sanctus, Agnus Dei, and the entrance, offertory and communion antiphons) and in the parts that involved dialogue with the people, and in the Our Father, which the people could now recite entirely together with the priest. Most Episcopal Conferences quickly approved interim vernacular translations, generally different from country to country, and, after having them confirmed by the Holy See, published them in 1965. Other changes included the omission of Psalm 43 (42) at the start of Mass and the Last Gospel at the end, both of which Pope Pius V had first inserted into the Missal (having previously been private prayers said by the priest in the sacristy), and the Leonine Prayers of Pope Leo XIII. The Canon of the Mass, which continued to be recited silently, was kept in Latin.
Three years later, the instruction Tres abhinc annos[76] of 4 May 1967 gave permission for use of the vernacular even in the Canon of the Mass, and allowed it to be said audibly and even, in part, to be chanted; the vernacular could be used even at Mass celebrated without the people being present. Use of the maniple was made optional, and at three ceremonies at which the cope was previously the obligatory vestment the chasuble could be used instead.
Pope Paul VI continued implementation of the Council's directives, ordering with Apostolic Constitution Missale Romanum[77] of Holy Thursday, 3 April 1969, publication of a new official edition of the Roman Missal, which appeared (in Latin) in 1970.
Opposition to the latest revisions of the liturgy[edit]
Some Traditionalist Catholics reject to a greater or lesser extent the changes made since 1950 (see Traditionalist Catholic). None advocate returning to the original (1570) form of the liturgy, though some may perhaps wish a re-establishment of its form before Pius X's revision of the rubrics in 1911. Some do refuse to accept the 1955 changes in the liturgy of Palm Sunday and the Easter Triduum and in the liturgical calendar (see General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII), and instead use the General Roman Calendar as in 1954. Others accept the 1955 changes by Pius XII, but not those of Pope John XXIII. Others again, in accordance with the authorization granted by Pope Benedict XVI in Summorum Pontificum, use the Missal and calendar as it was in 1962.
Some of them argue that, unlike earlier reforms, the revision of 1969-1970 which replaced the Tridentine Mass with the Mass of Pope Paul VI represented a major break with the past. They consider that the content of the revised liturgy is, in Catholic terms, seriously deficient and defective; some hold that it is displeasing to God, and that no Catholic should attend it.[78]
When a preliminary text of two of the sections of the revised Missal was published in 1969, Archbishop Marcel Lefebvre gathered a group of twelve theologians, who, under his direction,[79] wrote a study of the text. They stated that it "represents, both as a whole and in its details, a striking departure from the Catholic theology of the Mass as it was formulated in Session 22 of the Council of Trent".[80] Cardinal Alfredo Ottaviani, a former Prefect of the Sacred Congregation for the Doctrine of the Faith, supported this study with a letter of 25 September 1969 to Pope Paul VI. Cardinal Antonio Bacci signed the same letter. The critical study became known as "the Ottaviani Intervention".[81] Cardinal Ottaviani subsequently stated in writing that he had not intended his letter to be made public, and that Pope Paul VI's doctrinal exposition, on 19 November[82] and 26 November 1969,[83] of the revised liturgy in its definitive form meant that "no one can be genuinely scandalised any more".[84] Jean Madiran, a critic of Vatican II[85] and founder-editor of the French journal Itinéraires, claimed that this letter was fraudulently presented to the elderly and already blind cardinal for his signature by his secretary, Monsignor (and future Cardinal) Gilberto Agustoni, and that Agustoni resigned shortly afterwards.[86] This allegation remains unproven, and Madiran himself was not an eyewitness of the alleged deception.[87]
In October 1967, a meeting of the Synod of Bishops had already given its opinion on a still earlier draft. Of the 187 members, 78 approved it as it stood, 62 approved it but suggested various modifications, 4 abstained, and 47 voted against.[88]
From the 1960s onwards, Western countries have experienced a drop in Mass attendance (in the United States, from 75% of Catholics attending in 1958 to 25% attending by 2002). These same countries saw a decline in seminary enrollments and in the number of priests (in the United States, from 1,575 ordinations in 1954 to 450 in 2002), and a general erosion of belief in the doctrines of the Catholic faith. Opponents of the revision of the Mass liturgy argue, citing opinion poll evidence in their support, that the revision contributed to this decline.[89] Others, pointing, among other considerations, to the fact that, globally, there are more priests and seminarians now than in previous years (in 1970, there were 72,991 major seminarians worldwide, in 2002, there were 113,199, an increase of 55%, at a time, however, when there was an increase of global population of 64%),[90] suggest that the apparent decline of Catholic practice in the West is due to the general influence of secularism and liberalism on Western societies rather than to developments within the Catholic Church.
Attitudes of Popes since the Second Vatican Council[edit]
Pope Paul VI[edit]
Following the introduction of the Mass of Paul VI in 1969-1970, the Holy See granted a significant number of permissions for the use of the former liturgy. For example, elderly priests were not required to switch to celebrating the new form. In England and Wales, occasional celebrations of the Tridentine Mass were allowed in virtue of what became known as the "Agatha Christie indult". However, there was no general worldwide legal framework allowing for the celebration of the rite. Following the rise of the Traditionalist Catholic movement in the 1970s, Pope Paul VI reportedly declined to liberalise its use further on the grounds that it had become a politically charged symbol associated with opposition to his policies.[91]
Pope John Paul II[edit]
In 1984, the Holy See sent a letter known as Quattuor abhinc annos to the presidents of the world's Episcopal Conferences. This document empowered diocesan bishops to authorise, on certain conditions, celebrations of the Tridentine Mass for priests and laypeople who requested them.[92] In 1988, following the excommunication of Archbishop Marcel Lefebvre and four bishops that he had consecrated, the Pope issued a further document, a motu proprio known as Ecclesia Dei,[93] which stated that "respect must everywhere be shown for the feelings of all those who are attached to the Latin liturgical tradition". The Pope urged bishops to give "a wide and generous application" to the provisions of Quattuor abhinc annos, and established the Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei to oversee relations between Rome and Traditionalist Catholics.
The Holy See itself granted authorisation to use the Tridentine Mass to a significant number of priests and priestly societies, such as the Priestly Fraternity of St. Peter, the Institute of Christ the King Sovereign Priest, and the Personal Apostolic Administration of Saint John Mary Vianney. Some diocesan bishops, however, declined to authorise celebrations within their dioceses, or did so only to a limited extent. In some cases, the difficulty was that those seeking the permission were hostile to the church authorities. Other refusals of permission were alleged to have stemmed from certain bishops' disapproval in principle of celebrations of the Tridentine liturgy.
Pope Benedict XVI[edit]
As a cardinal, Joseph Ratzinger was regarded as having a particular interest in the liturgy, and as being favourable towards the older rite of Mass. He famously criticized the erratic way in which, contrary to official policy, many priests celebrated the revised rite.[94]
In September 2006, the Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei established the Institute of the Good Shepherd, made up of former members of the Society of St. Pius X, in Bordeaux, France, with permission to use the Tridentine liturgy.[95] This step was met with some discontent from French clergy, and thirty priests wrote an open letter to the Pope.[96] Consistently with its previous policy, the Society of St Pius X rejected the move.[97]
Following repeated rumours that the use of the Tridentine Mass would be liberalised, the Pope issued a motu proprio called Summorum Pontificum on 7 July 2007,[98] together with an accompanying letter to the world's Bishops.[99] The Pope declared that "the Roman Missal promulgated by Paul VI is the ordinary expression of the lex orandi (law of prayer) of the Catholic Church of the Latin rite. Nevertheless, the Roman Missal promulgated by St. Pius V and reissued by St. John XXIII is to be considered as an extraordinary expression of that same 'Lex orandi'".[100] He further stated that "the 1962 Missal ... was never juridically abrogated".[101] He replaced with new rules those of Quattuor Abhinc Annos on use of the older form: essentially, authorization for using the 1962 form for parish Masses and those celebrated on public occasions such as a wedding is devolved from the local bishop to the priest in charge of a church, and any priest of the Latin Rite may use the 1962 Roman Missal in "Masses celebrated without the people", a term that does not exclude attendance by other worshippers, lay or clergy.[102] While requests by groups of Catholics wishing to use the Tridentine liturgy in parish Masses are to be dealt with by the parish priest (or the rector of the church) rather than, as before, by the local bishop, the Pope and Cardinal Darío Castrillón have stated that the bishops' authority is not thereby undermined.[103]
Present regulations[edit]
The regulations set out in Summorum Pontificum provide that:

In Masses celebrated "without the people", every Latin Rite priest may use either the 1962 Roman Missal or that of Paul VI except during the Easter Triduum (when Masses without participation by the people are no longer allowed). Celebrations of Mass in this form (formerly referred to as "private Masses") may, as before, be attended by laypeople who ask to be admitted.[104]
In parish Masses, where there is a stable group of laypeople who adhere to the earlier liturgical tradition, the parish priest should willingly accept their requests to be allowed to celebrate the Mass according to the 1962 Missal, and should ensure that their welfare harmonises with the ordinary pastoral care of the parish, under the guidance of the bishop in accordance with canon 392 of the Code of Canon Law, avoiding discord and favouring the unity of the Church.

Mass may be celebrated using the 1962 Missal on working days, while on Sundays and feast days one such celebration may be held.
For priests and laypeople who request it, the parish priest should allow celebrations of the 1962 form on special occasions such as weddings, funerals, and pilgrimages.


Communities belonging to institutes of consecrated life and societies of apostolic life which wish to use the 1962 Missal for conventual or "community" celebration in their oratories may do so.

With letter 13/2007 of 20 January 2010 the Pontifical Council Ecclesia Dei responded positively to a question whether a parish priest (pastor) or another priest may on his own initiative publicly celebrate the extraordinary form, along with the customary regular use of the new form, "so that the faithful, both young and old, can familiarize themselves with the old rites and benefit from their perceptible beauty and transcendence". Although the Council accompanied this response with the observation that a stable group of the faithful attached to the older form has a right to assist at Mass in the extraordinary form, a website that published the response interpreted it as not requiring the existence of such a stable group.[105]
Present practice[edit]
The publication of Summorum Pontificum has led to an increase in the number of regularly scheduled public Tridentine Masses. On 14 June 2008 Cardinal Darío Castrillón Hoyos told a London press conference that Pope Benedict wants every parish to offer both the old and the new forms for Sunday Mass.[106]
The cardinal said that the Vatican was preparing to instruct seminaries to teach all students the Tridentine form of the Roman Rite. The complexity of the rubrics makes it difficult for priests accustomed to the simpler modern form to celebrate the Tridentine form properly, and it is unclear how many have the required knowledge.
Some Traditionalist Catholic priests and organisations, holding that no official permission is required to use any form of the Tridentine Mass, celebrate it without regularizing their situation,[107] and sometimes using editions of the Roman Missal earlier than the 1962 edition approved in Summorum Pontificum.
In order to provide for priests who celebrate the Tridentine Mass, publishers have issued facsimiles or reprintings of old missals. There were two new printings of the 1962 Tridentine Missal in 2004: one, with the imprimatur of Bishop Fabian Bruskewitz of Lincoln, Nebraska, by Baronius Press in association with the Priestly Fraternity of St. Peter; the other by the Society of St. Pius X's publishing house, Angelus Press. There was a new printing of a facsimile 1962 Tridentine Altar Missal in 2008 by PCP books. Some other missals reproduced date from before 1955 and so do not have the revised Holy Week rites promulgated by Pope Pius XII. They are used by traditionalists who reject Pius XII's liturgical changes. As well as such altar missals for use by the priest, old hand missals for those attending Mass have been reproduced, including a St Bonaventure Press facsimile of a pre-1955 edition of the St Andrew's Missal.
See also[edit]

List of communities using the Tridentine Mass
Sacred language
Western Rite Orthodoxy

References[edit]


^ In this context, "typical edition" means the officially approved edition to whose text other printings are obliged to conform.
^ Angelus A. De Marco, O.F.M., "Liturgical Languages" in The American Ecclesiastical Review
^ Council of Trent, session of 4 December 1563
^ These regions included those in which a variant of the Roman Rite, called the Sarum Rite, was in use for more than the minimum required time. On a few recent occasions Roman Catholic prelates have used this variant as an extraordinary form of celebrating Mass. But, like most of the other regions and the orders concerned, the Sarum Rite areas have adopted the standard Roman Missal. The most important non-Roman liturgies that continue in use are the Ambrosian Rite, the Mozarabic Rite and the Carthusian Rite.
^ Code of Canon Law, canon 928
^ Instruction Redemptionis Sacramentum, 112
^ a b Letter of Pope Benedict XVI
^ Pope Benedict spoke of it instead as "an" extraordinary form. While in English, "extraordinary" often has laudatory overtones, its meaning in canon law is illustrated by its use with reference, for instance, to "the extraordinary minister of holy communion" (cf. canon 910 §2 of the Code of Canon Law).
^ Summorum Pontificum, article 10 speaks of celebrations "iuxta formam antiquiorem ritus romani" (in accordance with the older form of the Roman Rite).
^ Summorum Pontificum, articles 2 and 4
^ Summorum Pontificum, article 5
^ Krmpotic, M.D. (1908). "Dalmatia". Catholic encyclopedia. Retrieved March 25, 2008. The right to use the Glagolitic  [sic] language at Mass with the Roman Rite has prevailed for many centuries in all the south-western Balkan countries, and has been sanctioned by long practice and by many popes. 
^ Japundžić, Marko (1997). "The Croatian Glagolitic Heritage". Croatian Academy of America. Retrieved March 25, 2008. In 1886 it arrived to the Principality of Montenegro, followed by the Kingdom of Serbia in 1914, and the Republic of Czechoslovakia in 1920, but only for feast days of the main patron saints. The 1935 concordat with the Kingdom of Yugoslavia anticipated the introduction of the Slavic liturgy for all Croatian regions and throughout the entire state. 
^ "Inter Oecumenici, Sacred Congregation of Rites". 2007. Retrieved March 25, 2008. 
^ Congregation for Divine Worship and the Discipline of the Sacrament (2004-04-23). "Redemptionis Sacramentum". Retrieved 2008-03-25. 
^ Thompson, Damian (2008-06-14). "Latin mass to return to England and Wales". The Daily Telegraph. Retrieved 2008-06-17. 
^ Medieval Sourcebook; Pope reformulates Tridentine rite's prayer for Jews
^ Letter to the Bishops on the occasion of the publication of Summorum Pontificum
^ a b c "Quo primum". Retrieved 2008-03-25. We decided to entrust this work to learned men of our selection. They very carefully collated all their work with the ancient codices in Our Vatican Library and with reliable, preserved or emended codices from elsewhere. Besides this, these men consulted the works of ancient and approved authors concerning the same sacred rites; and thus they have restored the Missal itself to the original form and rite of the holy Fathers. When this work has been gone over numerous times and further emended, after serious study and reflection, We commanded that the finished product be printed and published. 
^ The Mass of Vatican II
^ The Mass of the Consilium and the Mass of the Ages
^ God Was Worshipped Here Today
^ Meditation before Holy Mass
^ Is the Novus Ordo Mass Actually the Indult Mass?
^ Priories of the Order of Saint John of Jerusalem
^ The Mass of the Apostles
^ Cf. Extract from a Letter to a Philippine Mayor
^ Braga - Capital de Distrito
^ "Just after the Council of Trent, the study 'of ancient manuscripts in the Vatican library and elsewhere', as Saint Pius V attests in the Apostolic Constitution Quo primum, helped greatly in the correction of the Roman Missal. Since then, however, other ancient sources have been discovered and published and liturgical formularies of the Eastern Church have been studied. Accordingly, many have had the desire for these doctrinal and spiritual riches not to be stored away in the dark, but to be put into use for the enlightenment of the mind of Christians and for the nurture of their spirit" (Apostolic Constitution Missale Romanum).
^ ISBN 88-209-2547-8; publisher: Libreria Editrice Vaticana; introduction and appendix by Manlio Sodi and Achille Maria Triacca
^ Introduction to the reproduction of the editio princeps, pages XXVI-XXX
^ Introduction to the reproduction of the editio princeps, pages XXI
^ S. Cecilia in Trastevere, main altar, presbytery, ciborium
^ Helen Dietz, "The Biblical Roots of Church Orientation" in Sacred Architecture, vol. 10. Retrieved 20 July 2013.
^ Solemn Papal Mass. See further The Tridentine Mass by Paul Cavendish
^ Apostolic Constitution Si quid est
^ Missal in Catholic Encyclopedia
^ Divino afflatu
^ Mysterii Paschalis and Ordorecitandi website
^ Richard Breyer, "St. Joseph & the Mass" in Catholic Digest
^ Pope Benedict XVI's motu proprio Summorum Pontificum
^ "The Missal published by Paul VI and then republished in two subsequent editions by John Paul II, obviously is and continues to be the normal Form – the Forma ordinaria – of the Eucharistic Liturgy" (Pope Benedict XVI's letter to the bishops on the occasion of the publication of Summorum Pontificum).
^ Their dislike of the 1962 Missal is expressed for instance in a list of differences prepared by Daniel Dolan.
^ "The Collaborative International Dictionary of English v.0.48". 1913. Retrieved 2008-03-25. 
^ Chapman, John (1908). "Didache". Retrieved 2008-03-25. Let no one eat or drink of the Eucharist with you except those who have been baptized in the name of the Lord. 
^ It is an additional ceremony, not part of the Mass itself, and in the Tridentine Missal is given only in an appendix.
^ Text of Mass of the Catechumens
^ Rubrics V
^ Text in Latin and English
^ Summorum Pontificum, article 6
^ The Rubrics of the Missale Romanum 1962: VI. The Epistle, the Gradual, and everything else up to the Offertory
^ General Instruction of the Roman Missal, 66
^ Text of Mass of the Faithful
^  Herbermann, Charles, ed. (1913). "Pope St. Gregory I ("the Great")". Catholic Encyclopedia. New York: Robert Appleton Company. 
^ Santus
^ Mass of the Faithful - The Canon
^ Diptych
^ Definition of "oblation"
^ "Ab eadem parte Epistolae paretur cereus ad elevationem Sacramenti accendendus" (Rubricae generales Missalis, XX)
^ Mass of the Faithful - Closing Prayers
^ In pre-1962 editions of the Roman Missal, only the first four words, "Domine, non sum dignus", were to be said in the slightly audible voice.
^ Ritus servandus, X, 6 of the 1962 Missal
^ Latin Dictionary
^ Manlio Sodi, Achille Maria Triacca (editors), Missale Romanum: Editio Princeps (1570) (Libreria Editrice Vaticana 1988 ISBN 978-88-209-2547-5), pp. 27–36
^ Orationes ante Missam
^ Douay-Rheims Version
^ Orationes post Missam
^ Allocution Indictam ante of 30 June 1930, in Acta Apostolicae Sedis 22 (1930), page 301
^ Instruction Inter Oecumenici, 48 j
^ Pope St. Pius X said: "If you wish to hear Mass as it should be heard, you must follow with eye, heart, and mouth all that happens at the altar. Further, you must pray with the Priest the holy words said by him in the Name of Christ and which Christ says by him" (The Daily Missal and Liturgical Manual from the Editio Typica of the Roman Missal and Breviary, 1962, Baronius Press, London, 2004, p. 897).
^ They gave responses to "Kyrie eleison", "Dominus vobiscum", "Per omnia saecula saeculorum", the Gospel reading, the "Orate Fratres", "Sursum Corda", "Gratias agamus Domino Deo nostro", the conclusion of the Lord's Prayer, the "Pax Domini sit semper vobiscum" and the "Ite Missa est"
^  Herbermann, Charles, ed. (1913). "Liturgy of the Mass". Catholic Encyclopedia. New York: Robert Appleton Company. 
^ Conventual Mass (Mass of a religious community) on a Vigil, such as that of Easter, was celebrated after None, at which point the fast could be broken (see Rubricae generalis Missalis, XV, 2). Though None was in origin an afternoon prayer, it was then celebrated in the morning. Similarly, Lauds, which was originally a morning prayer, was commonly celebrated in choir on the evening before, as in the office of Tenebrae. "Private Masses" (Masses celebrated by a priest without a congregation) could, even on days of fast, be celebrated at any hour from dawn to noon (see Rubricae generalis Missalis, XV, 1). Most celebrations of the Easter Vigil were in the form of private Masses, since concelebration was not allowed.
^ The Pius X and John XXIII Missals Compared
^ Constitution on the Sacred Liturgy
^ Tres abhinc annos
^ Missale Romanum
^ Pope Benedict XVI, who has several times deplored departures on private initiative from the rite of Mass established in the 1970 revision of the Roman Missal has declared this contention unfounded, writing: "There is no contradiction between the two editions of the Roman Missal. In the history of the liturgy there is growth and progress, but no rupture. ... Needless to say, in order to experience full communion, the priests of the communities adhering to the former usage cannot, as a matter of principle, exclude celebrating according to the new books. The total exclusion of the new rite would not in fact be consistent with the recognition of its value and holiness" (Letter to the Bishops on the occasion of the publication of the Apostolic Letter motu proprio data Summorum Pontificum).
^ A Short History of the SSPX
^ Ottaviani letter
^ Ottaviani, Alfredo; Bacci, Antonio; Group of Roman Theologians. "The Ottaviani Intervention: A Critical Study of the New Mass". Catholic Tradition. Retrieved 21 November 2016. 
^ Talk on 19 November 1969
^ Talk on 26 November 1969
^ Quotation from Documentation Catholique, 1970; the full text of the letter in an English translation is given in The New "Ordo Missæ": A battle on two fronts
^ Je suis un témoin à charge contre mon temps
^ The Ottaviani Intervention - Part I, by Michael Davies
^ The Ottaviani Intervention - Part 1, by Michael Davies
^ "Special Supplement: The Ottaviani Intervention: A Critical Study of the Novus Ordo Missae". Triumph. 4 (12): 22A–22L. December 1969. Quoted in THE GREAT SACRILEGE by Fr. James F. Wathen 
^ Jones, Kenneth C. (January 2003). Index of Leading Catholic Indicators: The Church since Vatican II. Oriens Publishing. ISBN 0-9728688-0-1
^ Cf. World population
^ Collins, Roger (2009). Keepers of the Keys of Heaven: A History of the Papacy. Basic Books. pp. 488–489. ISBN 978-0-465-01195-7. 
^ English translation of Quattuor abhinc annos
^ Ecclesia Dei
^ Preface to the French edition of Die Reform der Römischen Liturgie by Klaus Gamber; partial English translation; cf. The Spirit of the Liturgy, San Francisco: Ignatius Press, 2000; and Looking Again at the Question of the Liturgy with Cardinal Ratzinger: Proceedings of the July 2001 Fontgombault Liturgical Conference, Farnborough, Hampshire: St. Michael's Abbey Press, 2002. For a Vatican condemnation of aberrant liturgical practices, see Redemptionis Sacramentum
^ Brian Mershon, "New French traditionalist priestly society founded," The Wanderer, September 18, 2006.
^ "French clerics rebel on Latin Mass," The Conservative Voice, October 29, 2006
^ Communiqué de la Fraternité Sacerdotale Saint Pie X
^ Text of the motu proprio Summorum Pontificum in Latin and English
^ Benedict XVI (2007-07-07). "Letter of His Holiness Benedict XVI to the Bishops on the occasion of the publication of the Apostolic Letter "motu proprio data" Summorum Pontificum on the use of the Roman liturgy prior to the reform of 1970". Libreria Editrice Vaticana. Retrieved 2008-03-24. 
^ Article 1 of the motu proprio. In his letter to the Bishops he said: "It is not appropriate to speak of these two versions of the Roman Missal as if they were 'two Rites'. Rather, it is a matter of a twofold use of one and the same rite."
^ Similarly, Clement VIII did not juridically abrogate the Missal of Pius V, nor did the other Popes who issued later typical editions of the Roman Missal before that of Paul VI (Urban VIII, Leo XIII, Benedict XV, John XXIII) juridically abrogate the previous editions. Even Pius V juridically abolished only those variants of the Roman Rite that had less than 200 years' antiquity.
^ Indeed, "Mass should not be celebrated without a minister or at least one of the faithful, except for a just and reasonable cause" (General Instruction of the Roman Missal, 254). Masses celebrated without the people were once called "private Masses", a term that fell out of favour in the mid-twentieth century: the 1960 Codex Rubricarum, which preceded the Second Vatican Council, declared: "The most sacred Sacrifice of the Mass celebrated according to the rites and regulations is an act of public worship offered to God in the name of Christ and the Church. Therefore, the term 'private Mass' should be avoided" (Rubricae Generales Missalis Romani, 269). Cf. Review of Mass without a Congregation: A Sign of Unity or Division?, by Fr Marian Szablewski CR.
^ In the letter to bishops by which he accompanied the motu proprio the Pope told them that the new regulations "do not in any way lessen your own authority and responsibility, either for the liturgy or for the pastoral care of your faithful." Cardinal Castrillón has stated: "The Pope has not changed the Code of Canon Law. The bishop is the moderator of the liturgy in his own diocese. But the Apostolic See is entitled to shape the sacred liturgy of the universal Church. And a bishop must act in harmony with the Apostolic See and must guarantee the rights of every believer, including that of being able to attend the mass of Saint Pius V, as extraordinary form of the rite" (30Days, June/July 2007).
^ Article 4 of the motu proprio
^ New Liturgical Movement: Important Clarifications
^ "Pope says old-rite Latin Mass should be on offer in every Catholic parish"
^ Article 5 §4 of the motu proprio says priests who use the Missal of Blessed John XXIII must not be juridically impeded.


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Tridentine Mass.


Full texts of Tridentine Roman Missals[edit]

1962 typical edition of the Roman Missal Accurately reproduced, but only in black and white. 78 Mb.
1920 typical edition of the Roman Missal, with feasts updated to the late 1920s
Missale Romanum published by Pustet, 1894 (1884 typical edition)
Roman Missal, published by Pustet, 1862 (1634 typical edition, updated to 1862)
Missale Romanum, 1577, (1570 typical edition)

Texts of parts of the Tridentine Missal (post-1604)[edit]

English translation of the Ritus servandus in celebratione Missae (The 1962 Missal left this text unaltered, but completely revised the Rubricae generales Missalis Romani. The English text, titled "Rubrics of the Missale Romanum 1962", is in fact a translation of the Ritus servandus, not of the Rubricae generales.)
Ordinary of the 1962 Roman Missal with MP3 Audio of Latin Text (Latin text with English translation)
Ordinary of the Mass, with English translation at sacred-texts.com (The text is presented as that of the 1962 edition, but the spelling of the Latin, e.g. "coelum", "quotidianum", use of the letter J, shows that, apart from the insertion of "sed et beati Ioseph eiusdem Virginis Sponsi" in the Canon of the Mass, it is really the 1920 text, identical with the 1962 text except for spelling and this insertion)
Ordinary of the Mass, with English translation (This text too is presented as that of the 1962 edition, but is the same hybrid text as in the previous site)
Term-by-term Ordinary of the Mass, with intratext grammatical notes and with English translation (The 1920 text, with "sed et beati Ioseph eiusdem Virginis Sponsi" inserted into the Canon)
An English translation of the Ordinary of the 1920/1962 Missals (the translation of the phrase "sed et beati Ioseph, eiusdem Virginis Sponsi", which marks a difference between the 1962 edition and the previous editions, is given between braces), side-by-side with the 1973 ICEL translation of the Ordinary of the 1970 Missal
F. X. Lasance, The New Roman Missal (1942) (a hand missal for the faithful)
The Roman Missal adapted to the use of the laity from the Missale Romanum incorporating rubrical changes by Pope St. Pius X in 1913
A Manual of Prayers for the Catholic Laity: The Official Prayerbook of the Catholic Church (1896) Official pew missalette adopted for American Catholics by the Third Plenary Council of Baltimore.
The Catholic's Vade Mecum: A Select Manual of Prayers for Daily Use An English Catholic prayer book and missalette published in 1850.
Roman Missal for the Use of the Laity in English and partly in Latin, published in London in 1806. Its Canon of the Mass includes the mention, by name, of the king.
The Saint John Fisher Missale Text and plainchant of the Order of Mass and other parts of the 1962 Roman Missal (e.g., propers of Sundays and First and Second Class feasts), interpolated with elements removed from the Roman Missal after 1900 but still used in many places, and with material from sources such as the pre-1570 English Sarum Missal, material that was thus never part of the Missal authorized by Pope Pius V (see Introduction).

History[edit]

Quo primum, promulgating the 1570 Roman Missal (Pope Pius V)
Cum santissimum, promulgating the 1604 Roman Missal (Pope Clement VIII)
Si quid est, promulgating the 1634 Roman Missal (Pope Urban VIII)
Apostolic Constitution Missale Romanum, promulgating the 1970 Roman Missal (Pope Paul VI)
Encyclical Mediator Dei
Liturgy of the Mass (article in Catholic Encyclopedia)
History of the 1570 Missale Romanum
Woods, Thomas E., Sacred Then and Sacred Now: The Return of the Old Latin Mass (Roman Catholic Books 2008 ISBN 978-0-9793540-2-1)
Hull, Geoffrey, The Banished Heart: Origins of Heteropraxis in the Catholic Church, 1995, rpt. T&T Clark/Continuum, London 2010. ISBN 9780567442208
Aillet, Marc, The old Mass and the new : explaining the motu proprio Summorum Pontificum of Pope Benedict XVI (Ignatius Press 2010 ISBN 978-1-58617-362-3)

Comparison with non-Roman Western rites and uses[edit]

Tridentine Ordinary of the Mass compared with the Lyonese, Bragan, Dominican, Carthusian, Carmelite, Ambrosian and Mozarabic
The ancient liturgy of the Church of England, according to the uses of Sarum, Bangor, York & Hereford and the modern Roman liturgy arranged in parallel columns Tridentine Ordinary of the Mass and Canon compared with the Medieval English uses of Sarum, Bangor, York and Hereford.

Media[edit]

Multimedia tutorial on the Tridentine Mass: Photos, Videos, and Audio
Audio and Explanation of Sacred Music - CatholicLatinMass.org
Audio files - Text of the Mass Latin Mass Society of Ireland.
Video of a 1941 Solemn High Mass narrated by Fulton Sheen
Video of a Missa Cantata, or sung Low Mass, offered on the Last Sunday after Pentecost at the Roman Catholic Parish of St. Nicholas of Chardonnet in Paris, France.
Video of a Votive Mass of the Blessed Virgin Mary offered as a Missa Cantata, or sung Low Mass, at the Roman Catholic Priory of St. Pius X in Warsaw, Poland.
Video of a Solemn High Mass celebrated at the SSPX Seminary of St. Cure d'Ars, Flavigny, France
Video of a Traditional Mass for Christmas, held at St. Roch's in West Bangor, Pa.
Another video of a Low Mass
Photographs of a Traditional (Tridentine) Mass
Forum dedicated to the Tridentine Mass
A Modern Tridentine Mass Wedding
The Extraordinary Form of the Mass - Explained (German)
Priests for the 3rd millennium (German)

Directories of Latin Masses[edit]

Ecclesia Dei's Latin Mass Directory, United States and Canada
WikkiMissa, world directory of Tridentine Mass
List of Tridentine Rite Masses in the US
List of Tridentine Rite Masses Worldwide







v
t
e


Tridentine Mass of the Catholic Church




Including the extraordinary form of the Roman Rite (1962)



Types



Chapter and conventual
Dialogue Mass
Low (Missa Cantata) and High Mass (Solemn)
Missa Sicca
Pontifical

Papal


Ritual Masses

Coronation (Papal)
Missa pro Defunctis
Nuptial


sine populo
Votive

Red







Order



Pre-Mass
Vesting prayers
Asperges me

Vidi aquam in Eastertide


Processional hymn


Mass of the Catechumens
Iudica me
Confiteor

mea culpa


Introit
Kyrie
Gloria in excelsis Deo
Collect
Lection
Gradual
Alleluia or Tract
Sequentia
Gospel
Homily


Mass of the Faithful
Credo

Niceno-Constantinopolitan Creed


Offertory

Lavabo
Orate fratres
Secret


Preface

Sursum corda
Sanctus
Hosanna


Roman Canon

oblation
epiclesis
Words of Institution
anamnesis
elevation
doxology


Pater Noster

embolism
doxology


Pax
Agnus Dei

Dona nobis pacem


Fraction
Holy Communion

Communion antiphon


Ablutions
Postcommunio
Dismissal

Ite, missa est or Benedicamus Domino


Last Gospel


Post-Mass
Leonine prayers
Recessional hymn


For funeral Mass
Dies Irae

Pie Iesu


Libera Me
Requiescant in pace
Absolution of the dead
In paradisum
De profundis





Participants



Acolyte

altar server


Bishop
Boat boy
Cantor or schola
Crucifer
Deacon
Laity
Lector
Master of ceremonies
Porter
Priest
Subdeacon





Altar



Altar cards
Altar crucifix
Altar rails
Ambo
Antependium
Credence table
Kneeler
Lavabo
Misericord
Piscina
Sacristy
Tabernacle





Altar cloths



Altar linens
Antependium
Burse
Chalice veil
Corporal
Pall
Purificator





Illumination



Altar candle
Altar candlestick
Paschal candle
Sanctuary lamp
Triple candlestick





Liturgical
objects



Altar bell
Aspergillum
Chalice
Ciborium
Collection basket
Cruet
Flabellum
Funghellino
Holy water
Incense

use


Manuterge
Paten
Processional cross
Pyx
Sacramental bread

wafer


Sacramental wine (or must)
Thurible
Water





Literature



Cæremoniale Episcoporum
Missale Romanum
Pontificale Romanum
Rituale Romanum





Vestments
(Pontifical/Papal)



Alb
Amice
Chasuble
Cincture
Cope
Crosier
Dalmatic
Episcopal gloves
Ecclesiastical ring
Episcopal sandals
Falda
Humeral veil
Liturgical colours
Mitre
Pallium
Papal fanon
Papal tiara
Pectoral cross
Stole
Sub-cinctorium
Superhumerale
Surplice
Tunicle
Vimpa





Music



Antiphon
Graduale Romanum
Gregorian chant
Hymn
Kyriale Romanum
Liber Usualis
Music for the Requiem Mass
Organ

voluntary


Organum
Polyphony
Reciting tone

Accentus
Recto tono


Tonary

Gregorian Antiphonary







Liturgical year
Calendar
(1954/1955/1960)



Advent
Christmastide
Epiphanytide
Septuagesima
Lent
Passiontide
Holy Week

Paschal Triduum


Eastertide
Ascensiontide
After Pentecost


Calendar of saints
Holy day of obligation
Moveable feast
Octaves


Ranking of liturgical days: Solemnity
Memorial
Commemoration
Feria





Discipline



Church etiquette
Closed communion
Communion and the developmentally disabled
Communion under both kinds
Denial of Communion

Canon 915


Eucharistic fast
First Communion
Genuflection
Headcover
Host desecration
Infant communion
Reserved sacrament
Sign of the Cross
Thanksgiving after Communion
Viaticum





Theology



Blessed Sacrament
Body and Blood of Christ
Corpus Christi (feast)
Crucifixion of Jesus and substitutionary atonement
Epiousios
Eucharistic miracle
Grace ex opere operato
In persona Christi
Historical roots of Catholic Eucharistic theology
Koinonia
Last Supper
Origin of the Eucharist
Priesthood of Melchizedek
Pro multis
Real presence
Transubstantiation





Concepts



Ad orientem
Canon law
Code of Rubrics
Concelebration
Dominus vobiscum
Ecclesiastical Latin
Good Friday prayer for the Jews
Intercession of saints
Ordinary & propers (common)
Oremus
Sunday

Lord's Day


Text and rubrics of the Roman Canon
Vulgate (Sixto-Clementine)

Latin Psalters







Related



Agape feast
Alternatim
Anaphora
Anima Christi
Aspersion
Catholic liturgy
Coetus Internationalis Patrum
Communities using the Tridentine Mass

Indult Catholic
traditionalist Catholic


Congregation for Divine Worship
Council of Trent
Deutsche Singmesse
Divine Office

Canonical hours
Choir dress
Roman Breviary


Eucharistic adoration & benediction

Holy Hour
Forty Hours' Devotion


Fasting and abstinence in the Roman Catholic Church
Fourth Council of the Lateran
French Organ Mass
Gospel Book
History of the Roman Canon
Latin liturgical rites
Latin Mass
Lex orandi, lex credendi
Litany
Liturgical Movement
Liturgical reforms of Pope Pius XII
Mass of Paul VI
Missal
Plenary indulgence
Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei
Pope Pius V
Preces
Pre-Tridentine Mass
Quattuor abhinc annos
Quo primum
Roman Catholic theology
Sacramentary
Sacraments of the Catholic Church
Spoon (liturgy)
Summorum Pontificum
Tra le sollecitudini
Western Rite Orthodoxy








 Catholicism portal










Links to related articles











v
t
e


Sacraments, rites, and liturgies of the Catholic Church



Sacraments



Baptism
Confirmation
Eucharist
Penance
Anointing of the Sick
Holy Orders
Matrimony








Mass



Low Mass
Missa Cantata
Solemn Mass
Pontifical High Mass
Papal Mass





Canonical
liturgical hours



Matins (nighttime)
Lauds (early morning)
Prime (first hour of daylight)
Terce (third hour)
Sext (noon)
Nones (ninth hour)
Vespers (sunset evening)
Compline (end of the day)





Other liturgical services



Asperges
Benediction of the Blessed Sacrament
Exorcism
Funeral

Requiem


Liturgy of the Hours





Liturgical literature



Antiphonary
Book of hours
Breviary
Gospel Book
Gradual
Lectionary
Martyrology
Psalter
Roman Missal
Roman Ritual
Sacramentary





Rites




Latin



Ambrosian Rite
Rite of Braga
Roman Rite

Mass of Paul VI
Extraordinary form
Anglican Use
Zaire Use







Eastern



Alexandrian Rite
Armenian Rite
Antiochene Rite
Byzantine Rite
East Syrian Rite
Mozarabic Rite
West Syrian Rite: Malankara Rite





Orders



Benedictine Rite
Carmelite Rite
Carthusian Rite
Cistercian Rite
Dominican Rite
Norbertine Rite





Defunct rites
and liturgies



African Rite
Aquileian Rite
Celtic Rite
Durham Rite
Gallican Rite
Use of Hereford
Missa Nautica
Missa Sicca
Missa Venatoria
Pre-Tridentine Mass
Use of York
Sarum Rite











 Catholicism portal












v
t
e


History of the Roman Rite Mass



Forms



Pre-Tridentine Mass
Tridentine Mass (Extraordinary form)
Mass of Paul VI (Ordinary form)








Calendars



Tridentine Calendar
General Roman Calendar of 1954
General Roman Calendar of Pope Pius XII
General Roman Calendar of 1960
General Roman Calendar (current)








 Catholicism portal












v
t
e


Traditionalist Catholicism




Movements advocating Catholic traditions less emphasised or abolished by the Second Vatican Council (1962–1965)



Groups and
movements





Part of the Roman Curia




Pontifical Commission Ecclesia Dei






In full communion
with the Holy See




Priestly Fraternity of St. Peter
Institute of Christ the King Sovereign Priest
Latin Mass Society of England and Wales
Personal Apostolic Administration of Saint John Mary Vianney
Institute of the Good Shepherd
Sons of the Most Holy Redeemer
Slaves of the Immaculate Heart of Mary
Fraternity of Saint Vincent Ferrer
Canons Regular of Saint John Cantius
Canons Regular of the New Jerusalem
Fœderatio Internationalis Juventutem
Fœderatio Internationalis Una Voce
Indult Catholics






Canonically irregular




Fraternité Notre-Dame
Society of Saint Pius X
SSPX Resistance






Sedevacantist




Conclavism
Sedeprivationism
Siri thesis
Congregation of Mary Immaculate Queen
Istituto Mater Boni Consilii
Society of St. Pius V








Doctrines,
rites and issues



Second Vatican Council
Modernism
Pascendi dominici gregis
Tridentine Mass
Mass of Paul VI
Summorum Pontificum
Ecumenism
Freedom of religion
Syllabus of Errors
Dignitatis humanae
Extra Ecclesiam nulla salus
"Papal Oath"





Prominent
people



Pope Pius X
Pope Pius XII
Pope Benedict XVI
Archbishop Marcel Lefebvre
Bishop Bernard Fellay
Bishop Richard Williamson
Bishop Antônio de Castro Mayer
Archbishop Ngô Đình Thục
Bishop Daniel Dolan
Fr. Gommar DePauw
Fr. Leonard Feeney
Joaquín Sáenz y Arriaga
Michael Davies








 Catholicism portal












v
t
e


Structure of the Mass of the Roman Rite of the Catholic Church



Forms



Pre-Tridentine Mass
Tridentine Mass

Extraordinary form


Mass of Paul VI





Types



Low Mass
Missa Cantata
Solemn Mass
Pontifical High Mass
Papal Mass
Ritual Masses

Blue Mass
Chapter and Conventual Mass
Coronation Mass
Nuptial Mass
Red Mass
Requiem Mass


sine populo
Votive Mass





Order of Mass





Pre-Mass




Vesting prayers in the sacristy
Asperges me

Vidi aquam in Eastertide








Liturgy of
the Word




Sign of the Cross
Psalm 43
Entrance Antiphon
Penitential Rite

Confiteor / Kyrie


Gloria
Dominus vobiscum
Collect

Oremus


First Reading
Responsorial Psalm or Gradual
Epistle
Alleluia

Gospel verse / sequence


Gospel
Homily
Credo

Niceno-Constantinopolitan Creed or Apostles' Creed


General Intercessions






Liturgy of
the Eucharist




Offertory

Orate fratres / prayer over the gifts


Preface

Sursum corda / Sanctus / Hosanna


Eucharistic Prayer/Canon of the Mass

oblation / epiclesis / Words of Institution / elevation / anamnesis
texts & rubrics
Roman Canon

History


Eucharistic Prayer II


Memorial Acclamation
Lord's Prayer

embolism / doxology


Pax
Sign of peace
Agnus Dei
Fraction
Holy Communion

Communion antiphon


Ablutions
Postcommunion
Dismissal

Ite, missa est / Benedicamus Domino


Last Gospel






Post-Mass




Leonine Prayers
Recessional hymn








Participants



Acolyte
Altar server

female


Bishop
Boat boy
Cantor
Choir
Crucifer
Deacon
Extraordinary minister of Holy Communion
Laity

Eucharistic Congress


Lector
Priest
Subdeacon
Usher





Parts of the
Sanctuary / Altar



Altar crucifix
Altar rails
Ambo
Communion bench
Credence table
Kneeler
Lavabo
Misericord
Piscina
Tabernacle





Altar cloths



Altar linens
Antependium
Burse
Chalice veil
Corporal
Lavabo towel
Pall
Purificator





Candles and lamps



Altar candle
Altar candlestick
Paschal candle
Sanctuary lamp
Triple candlestick
Votive candle





Liturgical objects



Altar bell
Aspergillum
Censer
Chalice
Ciborium
Collection basket
Cruet
Flabellum
Funghellino
Holy water
Incense

use


Manuterge
Paten
Processional cross
Pyx
Sacramental bread

wafer


Sacramental wine (or must)
Thurible
Water





Liturgical books
of the Roman Rite



Ceremonial of Bishops
Evangeliary

Gospel Book


Graduale
Lectionary
Roman Missal





Vestments



Alb
Amice
Chasuble
Dalmatic
Episcopal sandals
Liturgical colours
Headcover
Humeral veil
Pallium
Pontifical
Stole
Surplice
Tunicle
Vimpa





Liturgical year
(Roman Calendar)



Advent
Christmastide
Ordinary Time
Septuagesima
Lent
Passiontide
Holy Week

Paschal Triduum


Eastertide
Ascensiontide





Eucharistic
discipline



Abstemius
Anima Christi
Concelebration
Church etiquette
Closed communion
Communion and the developmentally disabled
Communion under both kinds
Denial of Communion

Canon 915


Eucharistic fast
First Communion
Frequent Communion
Genuflection
Host desecration
Infant communion
Intinction
Reserved sacrament
Thanksgiving after Communion
Viaticum





Eucharistic
theology



Body and Blood of Christ
Corpus Christi (feast)
Crucifixion of Jesus and substitutionary atonement
Epiousios
Grace ex opere operato
In persona Christi
Historical roots of Catholic Eucharistic theology
Koinonia
Last Supper
Mirae caritatis
Mysterium fidei (encyclical)
Origin of the Eucharist
Real presence
Transubstantiation
Year of the Eucharist
Stercoranism





Regulations
and concepts



Ad orientem & versus populum
Calendar of saints
Canon law
Code of Rubrics
Commemoration
Ecclesiastical Latin
General Instruction of the Roman Missal
Holy day of obligation
Intercession of saints
Ordinary & propers
Pro multis
Sunday

Lord's Day


Vernacular





Related



Agape feast
Catholic liturgy
Christian prayer

effects of prayer


Congregation for Divine Worship
Council of Trent
Ecclesia de Eucharistia
Eucharistic adoration & benediction

Dominicae Cenae / Holy Hour


Eucharistic miracle
Fermentum
Fourth Council of the Lateran
Gelineau psalmody
Gregorian chant
History of the Roman Canon
Lex orandi, lex credendi
Liturgical Movement
Liturgical reforms of Pope Pius XII
Mediator Dei
Missale Romanum (apostolic constitution)
Pope Paul VI
Catholic theology
Sacraments of the Catholic Church
Second Vatican Council

Sacrosanctum Concilium


Tridentine Mass
Summorum Pontificum
Tra le sollecitudini








 Catholicism portal















 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Tridentine_Mass&oldid=792722104"					
Categories: Tridentine MassCatholic liturgical ritesCatholic termsHidden categories: Articles incorporating a citation from the 1913 Catholic Encyclopedia with Wikisource referenceArticles containing Latin-language text 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БеларускаяCatalàČeštinaDeutschEspañolEsperantoFrançaisGaeilge한국어HrvatskiBahasa IndonesiaItalianoKiswahiliNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsРусскийSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 28 July 2017, at 06:51.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









        Trident Seafoods: Home























	Trident Seafoods: Home















































Facebook



Instagram



Pinterest



Twitter



YouTube










Mobile menu


Mobile menu












  








Something new for your BBQ





Grill up something unexpected. Our Bacon & Blue Alaskan Pollock Burger puts a new twist on an old favorite. Bacon and blue cheese on our Alaskan Pollock burger will become your new BBQ special.


Try the Recipe












Add a twist to your favorite taquito





This is the perfect way to unleash amazing taquito flavor. Mix in some Monterrey Jack Cheese and jalapeño chili peppers, and lay on sour cream and guac. Your Fish Stick Taquitos will be hot fire.


Recipe Details












Create a new category for fish sticks





There are fish sticks, and then there are mind-blowing fish sticks. Pair them with fries, drizzle them in garlic oil and Parmesan cheese. Your Garlicky Fish Sticks and Frites will make you say “ahhh.”


Recipe Details








Previous



Next











We make it easy to love what’s good for you





Healthy, easy to prepare, great tasting products your whole family will love.


Browse Products










Quick and Easy Recipes





Discover new and great tasting ways to incorporate your favorite Trident Seafoods’ Products into your life.


Browse Recipes






  



































































Previous



Next








A Storied History of Providing Quality





We have been fishing in the icy cold waters of Alaska for over 40 years and control every step of the process with one goal in mind- To bring you the finest seafood “from the source to your plate”.


Our Story










Join Our Team





We treat our employees like family. So if you have the skills, energy and desire for a challenging career or rewarding seasonal work, we'd love to welcome you to our team.


Job Openings








Trident News Fresh from the Source

  A post shared by Trident Seafoods (@tridentseafoods) on Apr 30, 2017 at 2:38pm PDT














































IPOs and Transactions: Nov 7 – 11 / plus 2017 SEC Filing Deadline calendar | Building Shareholder Confidence






























































Building Shareholder Confidence


#1 Blog for Regulatory Compliance


Skip to content

HomeIR & SEC Library
PR & Marcom Library
Products & Services
LinkedIn
Contact us









← IPO Underwriters of the Week: Nov 7 – 11
Video: October’s Top Law Firms for SEC transactions →


IPOs and Transactions: Nov 7 – 11 / plus 2017 SEC Filing Deadline calendar

Posted on November 14, 2016 | Leave a comment


There were 47 transactions filed with the SEC last week.
Congratulations to all of the corporations and law firms that selected our transactions services last week including Alliqua Holdings Inc. w/ Haynes and Boone, LLP and Troutman Sanders LLP, XG Technology Inc. w/ Robinson Brog Leinwand Greene Genovese & Gluck P.C., Sinorama Corp. w/ O’Neal Law Office, First United Corp. w/ Gordon Feinblatt LLC also Reg A+ registrations Knightscope Inc. and Sagoon Inc. w/ KHLK LLP and Keen Home Inc.
We appreciate that they selected to work with us and we’re pleased that they found us to be the intelligent value.




Law firm / advisor
Registrant
Symbol
Form
Industry


Akerman LLP
RENNOVA HEALTH INC
RNVA
S-1
Computer processing & data preparation


Andrews Kurth Kenyon LLP
MID-CON ENERGY PARTNERS LP
MCEP
S-3
Crude petroleum & natural gas


Andrews Kurth LLP
NGL ENERGY PARTNERS LP
NGL
S-3
Wholesale – petroleum & petroleum products, except bulk stations


AT&T Inc.
AT&T INC
T
S-4
Telephone comms.


Baker & McKenzie LLP
FRANK’S INTERNATIONAL N.V.
FI
S-3
Oil & gas field services


Blank Rome, LLP
JWIZ INC
~
S-1
Computer processing & data preparation


Bryan Cave LLP
GRAYBAR ELECTRIC CO INC
1737B
S-1
Wholesale – electrical apparatus & equipment, wiring supplies


Cooley LLP
CERECOR INC
CERC
S-3
Pharma preparations


Davis Graham & Stubbs LLP
RESOLUTE ENERGY CORP
REN
S-3
Crude petroleum & natural gas


Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP
BEIGENE LTD
BGNE
S-1
Pharma preparations


Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP
CBOE HOLDINGS INC
CBOE
S-4
Security & commodity brokers, dealers, exchanges & services


Dechert LLP
GOLDMAN SACHS BDC INC
GSBD
N-2
Finance services


EastBiz.com, Inc.
LAZEX INC
~
S-1
~


Eaton Vance Tax-Managed Buy-Write Income Fund
EATON VANCE TAX-MANAGED BUY- WRITE INCOME FUND
ETB
N-2
Investment advice


Eaton Vance Tax-Managed Buy-Write Opportunities Fund
EATON VANCE TAX-MANAGED BUY- WRITE OPPORTUNITIES FUND
ETV
N-2
Investment advice


Ellenoff Grossman & Schole LLP
CAR CHARGING GROUP INC
CCGI
S-1
Power, distribution & specialty transformers


FBR & Co.
FBR & CO
FBRC
S-3
Security brokers, dealers & flotation companies


Fellheimer & Eichen LLP
OPTEX SYSTEMS HOLDINGS INC
OPXS
S-1
Optical instruments & lenses


Fried, Frank, Harris, Shriver & Jacobson LLP
GOLDMAN SACHS BDC INC
GSBD
N-2
Finance services


Gibson, Dunn & Crutcher LLP
HEWLETT PACKARD ENTERPRISE CO
HPE
S-4
Computer & office equipment


Goodwin Procter LLP
DIMENSION THERAPEUTICS INC
DMTX
S-3
Biological products


Goodwin Procter LLP
LENNAR CORP /NEW/
LEN
S-4
General building contractors- residential


Goodwin Procter LLP
BEIGENE LTD
BGNE
S-1
Pharma preparations


Gordon Feinblatt LLC
FIRST UNITED CORP
FUNC
S-1
National commercial banks


Haynes and Boone, LLP
ALLIQUA HOLDINGS INC
~
S-4
~


Herrick, Feinstein LLP
GADSDEN GROWTH PROPERTIES INC
~
S-11
~


Incorp Services, Inc.
BITMIS CORP
~
S-1
~


Jessica Nguyen Law
ALLEGRO BEAUTY PRODUCTS INC
~
S-1
~


Jones Day
AQUABOUNTY TECHNOLOGIES INC
ABTX
10-12B
Biological products


Keen Home Inc.
KEEN HOME INC
~
1-A
~


Kelley Drye & Warren LLP
CINEDIGM CORP
CIDM
S-1
Services – business services


KHLK LLP
KNIGHTSCOPE INC
~
1-A
~


KHLK LLP
SAGOON INC
~
1-A
~


Kramer Levin Naftalis & Frankel LLP
TRINITY PLACE HOLDINGS INC
TPHS
S-3
Retail – family clothing stores


Latham & Watkins LLP
WILDHORSE RESOURCE DEVELOPMENT CORP
~
S-1
Crude petroleum & natural gas


Latham & Watkins LLP
LENNAR CORP /NEW/
LEN
S-4
General building contractors- residential


Latham & Watkins LLP
USD PARTNERS LP
USDP
S-3
Railroad switching & terminal establishments


Legal & Compliance, LLC
HEALING TOUCH HOLDINGS INC
~
S-1
~


Lucosky Brookman LLP
CAR CHARGING GROUP INC
CCGI
S-1
Power, distribution & specialty transformers


Mintz, Levin, Cohn, Ferris, Glovsky and Popeo, P.C.
KERYX BIOPHARMA-CEUTICALS INC
KERX
S-3
Pharma preparations


Morse, Zelnick, Rose & Lander, LLP
JWIZ INC
~
S-1
Computer processing & data preparation


Nelson Mullins Riley & Scarborough LLP
HCSB FINANCIAL CORP
HCFB
S-1
Savings institutions, federally chartered


Norcor Technologies Corp.
NORCOR TECHNOLOGIES CORP
NCRT
10-12G
Construction-special trade contractors


O’Neal Law Office
SINORAMA CORP
~
S-1
~


Pepper Hamilton LLP
GADSDEN GROWTH PROPERTIES INC
~
S-11
~


Perkins Coie LLP
PUGET SOUND ENERGY INC
~
S-3
Electric services


Proskauer Rose LLP
PREFERRED APARTMENT COMMUNITIES INC
APTS
S-3
REITs


Robinson Brog Leinwand Greene Genovese & Gluck P.C.
XG TECHNOLOGY INC
XGTI
S-3
Communications


Sichenzia Ross Ference Kesner LLP
RENNOVA HEALTH INC
RNVA
S-1
Computer processing & data preparation


Sidley Austin LLP
CBOE HOLDINGS INC
CBOE
S-4
Security & commodity brokers, dealers, exchanges & services


Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom LLP
BLACKROCK FLOATING RATE INCOME STRATEGIES FUND INC
FRA
N-2
Unit investment trusts


Sullivan & Cromwell LLP
AT&T INC
T
S-4
Telephone comms


Tridentine Corp
TRIDENTINE CORP
~
1-A
~


Troutman Sanders LLP
ALLIQUA HOLDINGS INC
~
S-4
~


Venture Law Corporation
DUBUC MOTORS INC
~
1-A
~


Vinson & Elkins L.L.P.
WILDHORSE RESOURCE DEVELOPMENT CORP
~
S-1
Crude petroleum & natural gas


Willkie Farr & Gallagher LLP
GOLDMAN SACHS BDC INC
GSBD
N-2
Finance services


Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr LLP
KARYOPHARM THERAPEUTICS INC
KPTI
S-3
Pharma preparations


Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr LLP
TETRAPHASE PHARMACEUTICALS INC
TTPH
S-3
Pharma preparations


Wilson Sonsini Goodrich & Rosati, P.C.
CAR CHARGING GROUP INC
CCGI
S-1
Power, distribution & specialty transformers



Whether in-house, your-house or 100% virtual… click here to discover why we are the intelligent value for both traditional and confidential IPOs.
Post IPO, thousands of organizations count on us to assure regulatory compliance and target new investors. Click here and opt-in to receive this weekly summary via email.
Click here to review the week’s underwriters.
Have a great week
 
 
 
Share this:TwitterFacebookLinkedIn

Related
 

							This entry was posted in IPO week in review. Bookmark the permalink.							


← IPO Underwriters of the Week: Nov 7 – 11
Video: October’s Top Law Firms for SEC transactions →



Leave a Reply Cancel reply 



Enter your comment here...




Fill in your details below or click an icon to log in:



























 
 


Email (Address never made public)



Name



Website














 You are commenting using your WordPress.com account. ( Log Out / Change )












 You are commenting using your Twitter account. ( Log Out / Change )












 You are commenting using your Facebook account. ( Log Out / Change )












 You are commenting using your Google+ account. ( Log Out / Change )




Cancel
Connecting to %s




 Notify me of new comments via email. Notify me of new posts via email.
 



 







Follow compliance discussions via email








 


Search discussions

Search for:



Top 5 discussions






								"Looks great, OK to file. I appreciate your quick turnaround and great work as always!"							








								A review of Section 16 filing responsibilities							








								What is required in an SEC 10-K file							








								IR Room Fundamentals: Are investor relations websites required by the SEC?							








								The success of the Confidential S-1 filing process is not confidential							



Discussion topics 
2017: How Investors Consume IR Content (Wall v Main Streets)

Annual reports

Before, During and After of your IPO

Client praise

How Investors Consume IR Content: 2014

Industry Events

Industry news

Investor relations

IPO

IPO series: The Ins and Outs of Preparing for an IPO

IPO week in review

IR benchmarking study

IR Fundamentals

M&A

Mutual Funds

News Releases

SEC Regulations

Shareholder Confidence 365 Study

Social media for IR

Targeting Investors

Top Ten law firms of the month

Top underwriters

Uncategorized

Vintage

Virtual Data Rooms

Virtual Investor Conferences

XBRL


Past discussions 
June 2017
May 2017
April 2017
March 2017
February 2017
January 2017
December 2016
November 2016
October 2016
September 2016
August 2016
July 2016
June 2016
May 2016
April 2016
March 2016
February 2016
January 2016
December 2015
November 2015
October 2015
September 2015
August 2015
July 2015
June 2015
May 2015
April 2015
March 2015
February 2015
January 2015
December 2014
November 2014
October 2014
September 2014
August 2014
July 2014
June 2014
May 2014
April 2014
March 2014
February 2014
January 2014
December 2013
November 2013
October 2013
September 2013
August 2013
July 2013
June 2013
May 2013
April 2013
March 2013
February 2013
January 2013
December 2012
November 2012
October 2012
September 2012
August 2012
July 2012
June 2012
May 2012
April 2012
March 2012
February 2012

 



IR and compliance tweetsError: Twitter did not respond. Please wait a few minutes and refresh this page.RSS - Posts
 







 



Blog at WordPress.com.















Post to



Cancel







 





















































































































































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Tridentine Latin Mass - El Paso, TX - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



TX



El Paso



Religious organizations



Catholic Church



                            Tridentine Latin Mass
                                    



 





















T 


Tridentine Latin Mass
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



1401 W YANDELL DR EL PASO, TX 79902
Get Directions



(915) 544-7385





Business Info



 Founded 1981
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $110,000.00
 Employee Count 2
 Industries Catholic Church
 Contacts Paul Tague







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Since 1981, Tridentine Latin Mass has been providing Catholic Church from El Paso. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







T

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.





















Tridentine Missal - The Catholic Company



































World’s #1 Catholic Store
Today’s Morning Offering





My Account
Order Status
Help
866-522-8465


(0)
View Cart


Call Toll-Free 866-522-8465
				Se Habla Español










Search






Our Lady of Fatima
Wish List
Advantage Rewards
Blog


GetFed







Jewelry


Bracelets
Bangle 
Beaded
Charm
Corded
Cuff
Leather
Link
Marian
Rosary Bracelets
Saint
Stretch
Wrap
Chains
Earrings


Medals
Four-Way Medals
Military Medals
Miraculous Medals
Our Lady Medals
Patron Saint Medals
Personalized Saint Medals
Pet Medals
Sacred Heart and Scapular 
Sports Medals
St. Christopher
St. Michael
Necklaces & Pendants
Crosses and Crucifixes
Irish/Celtic
Lockets
Marian
Pins & Brooches
Rings
Scapulars


Bliss Medals
Bangle Bracelets
Birthstone Rosary Bracelets
Birthstone Pendants with Chains
14KTGold Birthstone Pend Only
Medals with Chains
Medals without Chains
Scapular Gem Pendants
Stuller Jewelry
Medals
Crucifix Pendants
Cross Pendants
Bracelets
Earrings
Brooches and Pins
Christian Jewelry
Bracelets
Earrings
Necklaces & Pendants
Rings
FEATURED
New Arrivals
Sale





Pink & Gold Fatima Necklace

SHOP NOW >


Is this menu helpful?


Rosaries


Audio & Video
Books
Chaplets


Rosary Beads
Auto Rosaries
Fine Rosaries
Finger Rosary
Five-Decade Rosary
One-Decade Rosary
Special Devotion 
Personalized Rosaries
View by Color
View by Type
Rosaries by Bliss


Rosary Cases
Rosary Boxes
Rosary Pouches
Rosary Holders
Personalized Rosary Cases
FEATURED
New Arrivals
Sale





Fatima 100th Anniversary Rosary - Exclusive

SHOP NOW


Is this menu helpful?


Books & Media


Audio & Video
Apologetics
Audio Bibles
Audio Books
Computer Software
Conversion Stories
EWTN Programs
Feature Films and Documentaries
Marriage and Family Life
Music
Rosary & Divine Mercy
Sacraments
Spirituality
Studies
Teen Topics
Catholic Bibles
Audio Bibles
Bible Accessories
Bible Studies
Children's
Douay-Rheims
Gift Bibles
Ignatius Bible (RSV)
Large Print
New American Bible (NAB-RE)
Personalized & Exclusive Bibles
Revised Standard Version (RSV)
Spanish / Bilingual
Study Bibles


Catholic Books
Adult Coloring Books
Apologetics / Defending the Faith
Basic Faith
Bible Reference
Bible Studies
Bookmarks
Catechisms & Guides
Catholic Church History
Classics
Educational
Fiction
Gift Books
Home and Family
Inspiration & Encouragement
Journals
LARGE PRINT
Liturgical
Magazines
Marian Books
Mass Books & Guides
Missals
Papal Writings & Church Documents
Personalized Catholic Books
Popular Authors
Prayer and Spirituality
Reference 
Sacraments
Saints and Blesseds
Social Issues
Theology and Philosophy
Women's Interests


Other Printed Material
Calendars
Cards - Greeting Cards
Pamphlets
Prayer Cards
FEATURED
New Arrivals
Sale





Catholic Reading Selections

SHOP NOW >


Is this menu helpful?


Home Goods


Candles
Catholic Art
Angels
Diptychs and Triptychs
Eucharist
Framed Prints
Icons
Inspirational Decor
Italian Art 
Jesus
Mary 
Masterpiece Collection
Pieta
Plaques 
Saints
Stained Glass & Window Hangs
The Child Jesus
The Holy Family
The Last Supper
The Pope
Tile Murals
Unframed Prints
Wall Art
Wall Rosary


Crosses & Crucifixes
Standing Crosses
Standing Crucifixes
Wall Crosses
Wall Crucifixes
Sick Call Sets
Personalized
Garden & Outdoor
Garden Crosses
Garden Statues & Figurines
Garden Stones
Plaques and Murals
Holy Water Bottles & Fonts
Holy Water Bottles
Italian Holy Water Fonts
Kitchen & Entertaining
Coffee Mugs
Gifts for the Kitchen
Towels
Music & Keepsake Boxes
Keepsake Boxes
Music Boxes


Office
Mousepads
Picture Frames & Photo Albums
Personalized Photo Albums & Picture Frames
Statues & Figurines
Angels
Bronze Collection
Figurines
Florentine Collection
Holy Family
Italian Statues
Jesus
Joseph's Studio
Mary Statues
Night Lights
Pieta
Saints
St. Joseph Home Sale Kits
FEATURED
New Arrivals
Sale





The Vatican Cookbook & Apron Gift Set

SHOP NOW >


Is this menu helpful?


Kids


Books & Media
Mass Books
Bibles
Bible Stories
Coloring / Activity 
Basic Faith
Prayer Books
Saints and Blesseds
CDs
DVDs
Clothing
Baptismal
First Communion
By Type


Jewelry
Bracelets
Charms
Earrings
Necklaces
Pins and Baby Badges
Scapulars
Room Decor
Blankets
Crib Medals
Crosses & Crucifixes
Framed Prints & Plaques
Keepsake Boxes & Banks
Musical Box, Snow Globe
Photo Frames & Albums
Night Lights
Statues & Figurines


Rosaries
Rosaries
Boxes
Sets
Sacraments
Toys & Games
Gifts
Action Figures
Games & Activities
Stuffed Animals & Plushes
Teen & Young Adult
Books
DVDs & CDs
Gifts
Jewelry & Medals
FEATURED
New Arrivals
Sale





Popular Prayer Buddies Are In Stock

SHOP NOW >


Is this menu helpful?


Gift Ideas


Under $10
$10 to $50
Apparel
Hats
Adults
Chapel Veils
Scarves
Auto Accessories
Audio Bibles
Auto Rosaries
Keychains
Visor Clips
Catholic Company Exclusives
Apparel
Books & Media
Collections
Gift Ideas
Home Goods
Jewelry
Rosaries
Popular Catholic Devotions
Guardian Angels
Holy Souls in Purgatory
Holy Spirit
Jesus Christ Devotions
List of Marian Devotions
Patron Saint Index
The Holy Family


Irish Gifts
Crosses & Crucifixes
Home Decor
Irish Imports
Irish Saints
Jewelry
Miscellaneous Gifts
Personalized Irish & Celtic Gifts
Rosaries
Jerusalem Stone
Crosses & Crucifixes
Paperweights & Promise Stones
Plaques
Prayer Stones
Leather Gifts
Magnificat Covers
Military Gifts
Armed Forces
First Responders
Patriotic Gifts
Olivewood Gifts
Pocket Tokens & Crosses
Popular Catholics
Immaculée Ilibagiza
Mother Angelica
Pope Francis
Pro-Life Items
Pro-Life Apparel


Spanish Resources
Bibles and Books (la Biblia y los Libros)
Children's (Ninos y Otros)
DVDs
Gifts (Regalo)
Liturgical
Prayer Cards
Serenity Prayer
Totes & Travel Bags
Gift Baskets
Gifts for the Home
Home Blessings
Handcrafted from Mexico
Artwork
Ceramic & Terra Cotta
Jewelry
Wooden Gifts
Italian Imports
Crosses & Crucifixes
Gifts
Jewelry & Keychains
Plaques & Wall Art
Statues & Figurines
Ten Commandments
The Missionaries of the Poor
Encouragement
Personalized Encouragement Gifts
FEATURED
St. Mother Teresa of Calcutta
New Arrivals
Sale





Watercolor Laughter Apron

SHOP NOW >


Is this menu helpful?


Occasions


Recipient
Armed Forces
Caretakers
First Responders
Teachers
Gifts For Men
Gifts For Women
Events
Bereavement & Sympathy
Graduation
Quinceañera
Wedding & Anniversary


Sacraments
Baptism
Reconciliation
First Communion
Confirmation
Catholic Marriage
Holy Orders
RCIA


Seasonal & Holiday
Advent
Christmas
Lent & Easter
Father's Day
Mother's Day
Saint Valentine's Day
Saint Patrick's Day
FEATURED
Our Lady of Fatima: 100th Anniversary Gifts
New Arrivals
Sale





Celebrating the Sacrament of Confirmation

Show Now >


Is this menu helpful?


Church Supplies


Apparel & Vestments
Clergy Shirts
Vestments
Art and Statues
Angels
Christ
Crosses & Crucifixes
Holy Family
Marian
Nativity
Saints & Blesseds
St. Joseph
Stations of the Cross
Wall Artwork


Banners
Candles & Accessories
Memorial Candles
Chalices, Patens and Ciboria
Chalice
Ciborium
Paten
Church Ware
Chrism & Oil Sets
Cruets, Ablution, Lavabo Sets
Flagons
Holy Water Items
Trays
Furniture


Incense, Censers & Burners
Linens
Liturgical Books
Mass Kits
Ministerial Pendants
Monstrances & Reliquaries
Reliquaries
Pyxes
Personalized Engraved Pyx
Sacramental Certificates
FEATURED
New Arrivals
Sale





Viaticum Set



Is this menu helpful?


Sale


Books & Media
Church Supplies
Gift Ideas
Home Goods
Jewelry
Kids
Occasions
Rosaries





Shop Sale Items!

SHOP NOW >


Is this menu helpful?





















Search Results for
            Tridentine Missal



Tridentine Missal





				products
				

(4)




				all
				

(4)








Narrow by ...


Category
			






Books & Media(4)








Author
			






Published by Rev. James Socias(2)








Price Range
			






$5 - $10(1)










$50 - $100(3)








Rating
			






 (1)







 (3)












PopularityNameLowest PriceHighest PriceRating


View:

244896All

Page
    
1











    The Order of the Mass: The Missal of Pope St. John XXIII - Extraordinary Form of the Roman Rite

	…ideal for parish use, is not only a guide for those acquainting themselves with the Extraordinary Form of the Roman Rite (popularly known as the Tridentine Rite), but also a resource for those already familiar with this rich liturgy. Beautifully typeset and illustrated,  The Order of Mass also…


    Related Products
Missal
 | Latin English Missal
 | Tridentine Latin Mass




(2)





$9.95










    Daily Roman Missal Third Edition

	…It does NOT contain the Tridentine Latin Mass. Eucharistic Prayers for Reconciliation I and II are NOT included in this particular version of the Third Revised Daily Roman Missal. Need Help Using Your Missal? Click here for "How To Use The Daily Roman Missal" Below is an initial…


    Related Products
Missal
 | Roman Missal
 | Daily Roman Missal




(78)





$74.95










    Daily Roman Missal 3rd Edition [Burgundy]

	…Ordo is included for the mass parts.  It does NOT contain the Tridentine Latin Mass. Eucharistic Prayers for Reconciliation I and II are NOT included in this particular version of the Third Revised Daily Roman Missal. This edition is ideal for personal use, at just 4.75" x 6.75,"…


    Related Products
Missal
 | Daily Readings
 | Roman Missal




(23)





$62.95










    Daily Roman Missal 3rd Edition [Black]

	…Ordo is included for the mass parts.  It does NOT contain the Tridentine Latin Mass. Eucharistic Prayers for Reconciliation I and II are NOT included in this particular version of the Third Revised Daily Roman Missal. This edition is ideal for personal use, at just 4.75" x 6.75,"…


    Related Products
Daily Roman Missal
 | Daily Missal
 | Missal




(12)





$62.95






    Related Categories:
Missal
 | Daily Missal
 | Latin English Missal
 | Roman Catholic Missal
 | Tridentine Latin Mass
Page
    
1







Company Information

About Us
Contact Us
Careers
Internship
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Link to Us
Affiliate Program
Blog
Site Map



Shopping Information

Shipping Information
Wish List
Gift Card Balance
Product Reviews
Popular Searches
Printable Order Form
Parish/Bulk Orders
How to Order



Our Catalogs

Request Catalog

Satisfaction Guaranteed

Total Satisfaction Policy
Return Policy
Order Tracking



















		Partners: New Lily • Rosary


		© 2017 Trinity Road, LLC. All rights reserved. Website by Trinity Road, LLC.
	







Receive 15% Off In Your Inbox
on your first order over $35
Join our email list to learn about discounts,special offers, new products and promotions!

Join
*Offer valid for new email subscribers only. Discount valid for all orders over $35. See email for restrictions and coupon code. We value your privacy.







 
























Daily Roman Missal Third Edition | The Catholic Company































World’s #1 Catholic Store
Today’s Morning Offering





My Account
Order Status
Help
866-522-8465


(0)
View Cart


Call Toll-Free 866-522-8465
				Se Habla Español








Search




Our Lady of Fatima
Wish List
Advantage Rewards
Blog


GetFed







Jewelry


Bracelets
Bangle 
Beaded
Charm
Corded
Cuff
Leather
Link
Marian
Rosary Bracelets
Saint
Stretch
Wrap
Chains
Earrings


Medals
Four-Way Medals
Military Medals
Miraculous Medals
Our Lady Medals
Patron Saint Medals
Personalized Saint Medals
Pet Medals
Sacred Heart and Scapular 
Sports Medals
St. Christopher
St. Michael
Necklaces & Pendants
Crosses and Crucifixes
Irish/Celtic
Lockets
Marian
Pins & Brooches
Rings
Scapulars


Bliss Medals
Bangle Bracelets
Birthstone Rosary Bracelets
Birthstone Pendants with Chains
14KTGold Birthstone Pend Only
Medals with Chains
Medals without Chains
Scapular Gem Pendants
Stuller Jewelry
Medals
Crucifix Pendants
Cross Pendants
Bracelets
Earrings
Brooches and Pins
Christian Jewelry
Bracelets
Earrings
Necklaces & Pendants
Rings
FEATURED
New Arrivals
Sale





Pink & Gold Fatima Necklace

SHOP NOW >


Is this menu helpful?


Rosaries


Audio & Video
Books
Chaplets


Rosary Beads
Auto Rosaries
Fine Rosaries
Finger Rosary
Five-Decade Rosary
One-Decade Rosary
Special Devotion 
Personalized Rosaries
View by Color
View by Type
Rosaries by Bliss


Rosary Cases
Rosary Boxes
Rosary Pouches
Rosary Holders
Personalized Rosary Cases
FEATURED
New Arrivals
Sale





Fatima 100th Anniversary Rosary - Exclusive

SHOP NOW


Is this menu helpful?


Books & Media


Audio & Video
Apologetics
Audio Bibles
Audio Books
Computer Software
Conversion Stories
EWTN Programs
Feature Films and Documentaries
Marriage and Family Life
Music
Rosary & Divine Mercy
Sacraments
Spirituality
Studies
Teen Topics
Catholic Bibles
Audio Bibles
Bible Accessories
Bible Studies
Children's
Douay-Rheims
Gift Bibles
Ignatius Bible (RSV)
Large Print
New American Bible (NAB-RE)
Personalized & Exclusive Bibles
Revised Standard Version (RSV)
Spanish / Bilingual
Study Bibles


Catholic Books
Adult Coloring Books
Apologetics / Defending the Faith
Basic Faith
Bible Reference
Bible Studies
Bookmarks
Catechisms & Guides
Catholic Church History
Classics
Educational
Fiction
Gift Books
Home and Family
Inspiration & Encouragement
Journals
LARGE PRINT
Liturgical
Magazines
Marian Books
Mass Books & Guides
Missals
Papal Writings & Church Documents
Personalized Catholic Books
Popular Authors
Prayer and Spirituality
Reference 
Sacraments
Saints and Blesseds
Social Issues
Theology and Philosophy
Women's Interests


Other Printed Material
Calendars
Cards - Greeting Cards
Pamphlets
Prayer Cards
FEATURED
New Arrivals
Sale





Catholic Reading Selections

SHOP NOW >


Is this menu helpful?


Home Goods


Candles
Catholic Art
Angels
Diptychs and Triptychs
Eucharist
Framed Prints
Icons
Inspirational Decor
Italian Art 
Jesus
Mary 
Masterpiece Collection
Pieta
Plaques 
Saints
Stained Glass & Window Hangs
The Child Jesus
The Holy Family
The Last Supper
The Pope
Tile Murals
Unframed Prints
Wall Art
Wall Rosary


Crosses & Crucifixes
Standing Crosses
Standing Crucifixes
Wall Crosses
Wall Crucifixes
Sick Call Sets
Personalized
Garden & Outdoor
Garden Crosses
Garden Statues & Figurines
Garden Stones
Plaques and Murals
Holy Water Bottles & Fonts
Holy Water Bottles
Italian Holy Water Fonts
Kitchen & Entertaining
Coffee Mugs
Gifts for the Kitchen
Towels
Music & Keepsake Boxes
Keepsake Boxes
Music Boxes


Office
Mousepads
Picture Frames & Photo Albums
Personalized Photo Albums & Picture Frames
Statues & Figurines
Angels
Bronze Collection
Figurines
Florentine Collection
Holy Family
Italian Statues
Jesus
Joseph's Studio
Mary Statues
Night Lights
Pieta
Saints
St. Joseph Home Sale Kits
FEATURED
New Arrivals
Sale





The Vatican Cookbook & Apron Gift Set

SHOP NOW >


Is this menu helpful?


Kids


Books & Media
Mass Books
Bibles
Bible Stories
Coloring / Activity 
Basic Faith
Prayer Books
Saints and Blesseds
CDs
DVDs
Clothing
Baptismal
First Communion
By Type


Jewelry
Bracelets
Charms
Earrings
Necklaces
Pins and Baby Badges
Scapulars
Room Decor
Blankets
Crib Medals
Crosses & Crucifixes
Framed Prints & Plaques
Keepsake Boxes & Banks
Musical Box, Snow Globe
Photo Frames & Albums
Night Lights
Statues & Figurines


Rosaries
Rosaries
Boxes
Sets
Sacraments
Toys & Games
Gifts
Action Figures
Games & Activities
Stuffed Animals & Plushes
Teen & Young Adult
Books
DVDs & CDs
Gifts
Jewelry & Medals
FEATURED
New Arrivals
Sale





Popular Prayer Buddies Are In Stock

SHOP NOW >


Is this menu helpful?


Gift Ideas


Under $10
$10 to $50
Apparel
Hats
Adults
Chapel Veils
Scarves
Auto Accessories
Audio Bibles
Auto Rosaries
Keychains
Visor Clips
Catholic Company Exclusives
Apparel
Books & Media
Collections
Gift Ideas
Home Goods
Jewelry
Rosaries
Popular Catholic Devotions
Guardian Angels
Holy Souls in Purgatory
Holy Spirit
Jesus Christ Devotions
List of Marian Devotions
Patron Saint Index
The Holy Family


Irish Gifts
Crosses & Crucifixes
Home Decor
Irish Imports
Irish Saints
Jewelry
Miscellaneous Gifts
Personalized Irish & Celtic Gifts
Rosaries
Jerusalem Stone
Crosses & Crucifixes
Paperweights & Promise Stones
Plaques
Prayer Stones
Leather Gifts
Magnificat Covers
Military Gifts
Armed Forces
First Responders
Patriotic Gifts
Olivewood Gifts
Pocket Tokens & Crosses
Popular Catholics
Immaculée Ilibagiza
Mother Angelica
Pope Francis
Pro-Life Items
Pro-Life Apparel


Spanish Resources
Bibles and Books (la Biblia y los Libros)
Children's (Ninos y Otros)
DVDs
Gifts (Regalo)
Liturgical
Prayer Cards
Serenity Prayer
Totes & Travel Bags
Gift Baskets
Gifts for the Home
Home Blessings
Handcrafted from Mexico
Artwork
Ceramic & Terra Cotta
Jewelry
Wooden Gifts
Italian Imports
Crosses & Crucifixes
Gifts
Jewelry & Keychains
Plaques & Wall Art
Statues & Figurines
Ten Commandments
The Missionaries of the Poor
Encouragement
Personalized Encouragement Gifts
FEATURED
St. Mother Teresa of Calcutta
New Arrivals
Sale





Watercolor Laughter Apron

SHOP NOW >


Is this menu helpful?


Occasions


Recipient
Armed Forces
Caretakers
First Responders
Teachers
Gifts For Men
Gifts For Women
Events
Bereavement & Sympathy
Graduation
Quinceañera
Wedding & Anniversary


Sacraments
Baptism
Reconciliation
First Communion
Confirmation
Catholic Marriage
Holy Orders
RCIA


Seasonal & Holiday
Advent
Christmas
Lent & Easter
Father's Day
Mother's Day
Saint Valentine's Day
Saint Patrick's Day
FEATURED
Our Lady of Fatima: 100th Anniversary Gifts
New Arrivals
Sale





Celebrating the Sacrament of Confirmation

Show Now >


Is this menu helpful?


Church Supplies


Apparel & Vestments
Clergy Shirts
Vestments
Art and Statues
Angels
Christ
Crosses & Crucifixes
Holy Family
Marian
Nativity
Saints & Blesseds
St. Joseph
Stations of the Cross
Wall Artwork


Banners
Candles & Accessories
Memorial Candles
Chalices, Patens and Ciboria
Chalice
Ciborium
Paten
Church Ware
Chrism & Oil Sets
Cruets, Ablution, Lavabo Sets
Flagons
Holy Water Items
Trays
Furniture


Incense, Censers & Burners
Linens
Liturgical Books
Mass Kits
Ministerial Pendants
Monstrances & Reliquaries
Reliquaries
Pyxes
Personalized Engraved Pyx
Sacramental Certificates
FEATURED
New Arrivals
Sale





Viaticum Set



Is this menu helpful?


Sale


Books & Media
Church Supplies
Gift Ideas
Home Goods
Jewelry
Kids
Occasions
Rosaries





Shop Sale Items!

SHOP NOW >


Is this menu helpful?
















Daily Roman Missal Third Edition











Daily Roman Missal Third Edition




Product Images



























Click to Play Video





4.782051 / 5 stars
						
					
Read 78 reviews / 
						Write a review


Item #: 1111607

Price: 
				
					$74.95







In Stock
Usually ships in 1-2 business days
Notify Me When Back in Stock





Daily Roman Missal Third Edition
Notify Me When Back in Stock

SUBMIT







Daily Roman Missal Third Edition
Thank You For Your Request!
We will notify you when this item is back in stock




PPersonalization available!
					







Gift Wrap Service - We'll wrap it for you! - $4.95




Quantity: 
Add to Cart
Add to Wishlist








Similar Designs You May Like:






Product Description

Daily Roman Missal Third EditionSingle volumeBible passages and prayers that form the rich tapestry of our MassA beautiful, lasting gift idea

Details 
The Daily Roman Missal, Third Edition, durable and beautiful with a deep burgundy padded bonded leather cover and 6 ribbon markers, is both a tool and a treasure for any Catholic who wishes to learn about, love, and live the Mass more fully.The Daily Roman Missal, Third Edition presents the liturgical year's worth of Sacred Scripture, allowing the faithful to follow and delve further into the Church's holy celebration including those for the Sunday liturgies.
This new edition is updated with the guidelines of the Bishop's Committee on the Liturgy.
Click here to see sample pages
Other valuable revisions include:

All the readings for a day are now contained in each entry, not referenced throughout the volume.
Both the long and short forms of readings are printed.
Illustrations from illuminated manuscripts grace the pages.
The sixteen new saints in the Church's calendar of feast days are added.
Relevant passages from the Catechism of the Catholic Church offer an educational perspective on the liturgies for Sundays, feast days, and solemnities.
Devotional prayers for before and after Mass have been expanded with new translations more literal and faithful to the Latin originals.
Latin translation of the Novus Ordo is included for the mass parts.  It does NOT contain the Tridentine Latin Mass.
Eucharistic Prayers for Reconciliation I and II are NOT included in this particular version of the Third Revised Daily Roman Missal.

Need Help Using Your Missal? Click here for "How To Use The Daily Roman Missal"
Below is an initial "set up" ribbons suggestion.  It gives the new user somewhere to start—which can be adjusted as their proficiency develops.
1st ribbon--place in the proper location for the readings--Proper of Time
2nd ribbon--place in first page of the Introductory Rites/Confiteor
3rd ribbon--at the Liturgy of the Eucharist
4th ribbon--at Communion Rite / Our Father
5th ribbon--at the Proper of the Saints
6th ribbon--at the Prayers Before / After Mass
 
Dimensions & Specifications 



Measures 6.75" x 4.5" x 2"Weighs just over 2 lbs10 pt. font sizePersonalization: first and last name appear on separate linesPrinted in Italy




ISBN:
						9781612785097

Pages:  
							2514

Language:  
							English







Product Video








People also bought:








You might also like




Related Items

Books & Media
Missals
Catholic Books











Reviews - Daily Roman Missal Third Edition
Average Customer Rating

4.78

(4.78/5 Stars, 78 Ratings) Based on 78 Reviews




DISPLAYING 78 OF 78 REVIEWS

Love my Daily Missal!


By: 
 
						Alberta Falcioni Davis
(East Haven, January 3, 2017)


Review:
When I could not get to Mass on Christmas Eve, I watched the Papal Mass from the Vatican, 11:30 pm-1:30 am! I followed along with my English/Latin version of the Mass, being Italian I also understood the Italian prayers! The children dressed in native clothing were beautiful as was Baby Jesus! I loved when they brought Him from the altar to the back of the Vatican to the manger with Mary, Joseph, the shepherds and animals with the Angel overhead! Jesus is the reason for the season!


Spiritual Enlightenment


By: 
 
						Ken Zelasko
(Las Vegas, September 23, 2016)


Review:
The  Daily Roman Missal  has now become the one book that brings joy and contentment to my daily life. When I was a high school student (1962-1966) I had a _Cathedral Daily Missal_. It, too, was an excellent volume, but the _Daily Roman Missal_ is far superior to any book I have reviewed. If you are considering a missal, this is by far the best choice.


Great Gift for Confirmation


By: 
 
						Camille Weiss
(Ventura, April 20, 2016)


Review:
This is a wonderful gift for confirmation which will last a lifetime.  Great quality.  The Catholic Company is a very good company to do business with.  They back up  everything it sells.


Perfect! Daily Roman Missal


By: 
 
						Shaun Klucznik
(Spring Hill FL, March 27, 2016)


Review:
This item is so perfect.  I enjoyed every work the priest spoke during the Easter Vigil last night.  The book have been spot on every Mass I have attended.  Buy it, it's worth it


Daily Roman Missal Third Edition


By: 
 
						Regina
(Cary North Carolina, February 29, 2016)


Review:
this is the best purchased I made.there are many Missals available, but this one gathered most cherished prayers, devotions, Meditations on Stations of the Cross and Rosary plus more.along with faithful daily readings.and all that makes our Catholic Mass so perfect.I purchased a pair of white gloves to handle the book, so much do I love it.it never leaves my sight.I would recommend it in a heart beat. it is my most friendly companion. it is filled with God's grace. Thank You so much...


Growing in Grace


By: 
 
						Teresa
(February 8, 2016)


Review:
The Daily Roman Missal has been such a benefit to my spiritual life!  It has helped me dive deeper into the intricacies of the Mass.  It has also given me a push to read the Mass Scripture selections before Mass earlier in my day or the night before so as to prepare my heart to receive His word.  A grace-filled purchase!


Beautiful Missal


By: 
 
						Misty
(Rio Rancho, January 31, 2016)


Review:
I love this missal. It's beautifully made and the personalization/name embossed on the front cover is well worth it. Thank you.


personalized daily Roman Missal


By: 
 
						Deborah Druar
(Green Bay WI, January 24, 2016)


Review:
My husband ordered me a personalized daily Roman Missal for Christmas.  It unfortunately had a damaged back cover.  The customer service department replaced it with a new one.  It is beautiful.  I am impressed with the great customer service of the Catholic Company.  Thank you.


Daily Roman Missal 3rd Edition


By: 
 
						Karen Garrity
(Tamaqua, January 15, 2016)


Review:
I love it! The book is perfect! You thought of everything. The ribbons are perfect, there is enough to mark my favorites and everyday gospel. The cover and the gold edges brings beauty to the Lord's prayers. Great Job!


Daily Roman Missal


By: 
 
						Sandy Barnett
(Buffalo, Illinois, December 3, 2015)


Review:
I was looking for a missal that I could use daily and in both English and Latin as I go to both types of mass.  I love find the bit more formal style of language in the prayers.  I have shown and recommended purchase to several staunch Catholic friends.


Daily Roman Missal third edition


By: 
 
						Marilyn
(November 26, 2015)


Review:
Very pleased with the Missal. Love all the features mentioned. The ribbons are very handy to have. Highly recommend for daily Mass.


Daily Roman Missal


By: 
 
						Jo Ann Thompson
(Reno, October 24, 2015)


Review:
I totally love it and plan on using it everyday for years to come.  Thank you so much!


Daily Roman Missal


By: 
 
						Pauline Wynkoop
(Port St Lucie, September 23, 2015)


Review:
I bought this book for my Dad for his 83rd birthday and he just loves the book. He told me he reads it everyday and gets so much from it. It's a wonderful book and I would recommend it highly.


Daily Missel


By: 
 
						Pattie Houston
(Mountain Home, June 19, 2015)


Review:
I use it everday and love the rosary reflections.


Positive Purchase


By: 
 
						Richard D
(Yuba City, April 14, 2015)


Review:
Great item and positive customer service.


Daily Roman Missal


By: 
 
						Charles P Arnold Jr., Ph.D.
(Upper Marlboro, Maryland, March 26, 2015)


Review:
Having used the Moravian Daily Texts for many years as the basis for my morning devotions I wanted to add something new to supplement those devotions this year, something which would add elements of the Mass. As a Lutheran it took a while to find the Daily Roman Missal. I am thoroughly enjoying this daily addition to my readings. It is a beautiful book and I am very thankful that the church has produced such a wonderful treasure. I hope to use this book the rest of my life.


Date Errors


By: 
 
						Carl Guzowsky
(Allen, March 23, 2015)


Review:
Though a very good missal, I find that there are some disturbing errors. The first page of Table I liturgical calendar starts at 2010 while page 2 starts at 2011. I also found that the readings for 2015 Lenten season are not the ones used by the priest; the ones for 2014 seem to be the correct ones. I find this a very bad error on your part. In 2014 I thought is was just my difficulty learning how to use the missal but now I find that the missal itself is wrong. I could not recommend this book.


Daily Roman Missal


By: 
 
						Charles P Arnold Jr, Ph.D.
(Upper Marlboro, MD, March 9, 2015)


Review:
I could hardly be more pleased. I love the current Sunday Lenten Mass readings and use the daily readings along with the Moravian texts I have used for nearly 30 years. You will not be disappointed if you choose to purchase a copy of this beautiful Missal for your daily devotional.


Beautiful missal


By: 
 
						Cindy
(Longview, April 2, 2014)


Review:
Very nice!  I bought it as a gift for my husband.  Beautiful!!!


Highly Recommended


By: 
 
						Deeper in Faith
(Leesburg, Virginia, March 25, 2014)


Review:
I highly recommend this for anyone who wants to grow deeper in their faith.  Excellent for either daily mass or for reading the daily gospels.  The book is large but I find myself keeping it with me.  It is beautifully crafted and well worth having.


Great gift!


By: 
 
						Cindy
(Longview, March 25, 2014)


Review:
I bought this missal as a gift for my husband.  It is so beautiful!!!


Outstanding...way better than expected!


By: 
 
						RICK-O
(NASHUA, NH, May 14, 2012)


Review:
I am a daily Mass attendee and the missal provides me with the 'play-by-play' needed to stay involved with the Mass. Easy to read. Easy to follow along with the priest. Nice to have the Latin version right along with the English version as our church offers the Latin Mass once a week!


Daily Roman Missal, Third Edition


By: 
 
						Violetsroses
(Rio Rancho, New Mexico, May 4, 2012)


Review:
I use this book every chance I get, I love the meditations they provide daily, along with follow at home mass when you are unable to attend services due to illness, you can still follow mass on tv without being lost. I know the book has a lot of great qualities and is a must own for anyone who wishes to grow with Christ and be close to their church again, however I wish they had some hymns included.


Daily Roman Missal, Third Edition


By: 
 
						Sandy
(McLean, VA, May 3, 2012)


Review:
Service and Delivery as advertised Pros: Compact, Comprehensive, Easy to use


Exactly what mom wanted! Perfect gift!


By: 
 
						Patty & Lori
(Cedar Rapids, IA, April 26, 2012)


Review:
Mother has repeatedly thanked my sister & I for the birthday/Easter gift of Daily Roman Missal Third Edition! She is a devoted daily mass attendee and when the changes were made and the updated missal version was not yet available for purchase, she was resorting to multiple handouts from the various parishes she attends to follow along. She loved the personalization. Great job!


Too bulky


By: 
 
						Abraham the catechist
(Las Vegas, NV, April 26, 2012)


Review:
I use the product effective on daily masses but on sunday mass where the mass is too fast and quick like a commercial carwash i would just use the missalet as the priest still alter the wording. Best Uses: Daily masses, Not for sunday, Prayer book; Cons: bulky, Lots of unnecessary pages; Pros: Gilded sides, Nice long ribbon markers, Nice pages turn easily


Very pleased


By: 
 
						Mike
(East Alton, IL, April 19, 2012)


Review:
I use the Roman Missal to follow the daily readings at morning mass and for prayer.  There's also a section on how to be a better Catholic which I like to refer to.

It doesn't come with a case, so I am looking for a zippered one to protect it during transport. Best Uses: The daily readings; Pros: Easy to follow, Good formatting, It has 6 bookmarks


What a Value -- In Substance and Price!


By: 
 
						Dr. Positive
(Beaumont, CA, April 9, 2012)


Review:
I use the Roman Missal each day at Mass, and find the layout to be extremely helpful (prayers before Mass, after, plus it covers special spiritual events in the life of an individual and family. I value it as I would a precious work of art. Other than the print being a bit small, it is perfect for my liturgical needs.


Roman Missal Third Edition


By: 
 
						Manny_Tampa
(Tampa, FL, April 6, 2012)


Review:
This is an exceptional book and a great value for the money. It is made beautifully and its pure class. The leather is soft and very well done. The pages are beautifully gold leafed. Best Uses: Daily Use; Cons: none; Pros: Exceptional Item


Daily Roman Missal, Third Addition


By: 
 
						Popeye
(New Canaan, CT, February 26, 2012)


Review:
I ordered this missal to replace two very dated daily missals and one Sunday missal. It succeeds in consolidating all daily and weekend liturgies in one volume. To that extent it is, overall, well done.

However it was described as having added: "The sixteen new saints in the Churches calendar of feast days." It has failed to do that by excluding St. Faustina. What strikes me as disappointing about this is that a number of lesser known new saints are included in the new missal such as saints: Ansgar, Polycarp, Kateri Tekakwitha, and saint Hedwig, to name a few. 
The publisher could not offer a good reason for St. Faustina not being included in the new missal suggesting only that it "could be politics," that is, 
politics within the church hierarchy. Seems to me we have enough of that and it shouldn't be carried over to a daily missal. Cons: Left out St Faustina; Pros: Consolidated prayers, Updated Mass changes, Well Organized


Very high quality


By: 
 
						Mary
(Falls City, NE, February 24, 2012)


Review:
Just what I needed to be able to attend Mass everyday of the year. Pros: Attractive cover, Easily lies open, Easy to read font, Easy to use, Enough marking ribbons, Not Heavy


I like this missal but I'm still looking


By: 
 
						Mild Bill
(St. Stephen Roman Catholic, Pensacola Fl, February 16, 2012)


Review:
This book feels good in my hands and looks good. It is well constructed, although I wish they had use fatter ribbons. I feel like they might not last as long as the rest of the book.
The Latin is limited. When I ordered this book I was expecting all the readings to be in Latin with English translations. I like to follow along with the priest during the Latin Mass on Sundays. I can't do that with this missal. Although it is good for the English Mass. 
I find myself still using my old 1962 version during the Latin Masses on Sundays and using this one for Weekday Masses and English Masses on Sundays. Best Uses: Weekday Masses; Cons: Limited Latin; Pros: Feels good to hold


Awesome Book


By: 
 
						Ginka
(New Haven, CT, February 13, 2012)


Review:
I use the Daily Missal every day.   I am very happy that I was able to find this.  I was disappointed that I could not find this in the Catholic Book stores I frequent before Advent started. It is so easy to use and follow.  Best Uses: Every day; Pros: Easy to follow


Bought 1 for myself, then 2 more as gift


By: 
 
						d9belanger
(San Antonio, TX, February 1, 2012)


Review:
During religious retreat, the chapel didn't have the alter missal. Fr. was able to use my daily missal.
We presented this missal to a newly ordained priest in our parish.
I use it for meditation prior to confession, the mysteries of the rosary, everyday prayers, in addition to following the Mass.
I love it. Best Uses: Perfect Mass companion; Cons: sometimes hard to follow; Pros: All readings for year, Beautiful prayers, New Translation


Great Mass companion!


By: 
 
						Ellie
(Caldwell, Idaho, January 31, 2012)


Review:
I use this at Mass and is so easy to use and everything is easy to find.  I also enjoy the latin
pages this is how I remember it from years ago. I also enjoy reading it during the week at home.  Highly recommend it.


Great Missal


By: 
 
						Joe
(Folsom, NJ, January 22, 2012)


Review:
Great for all catholics and everyone who is should own one Pros: All masses of the year, Beautiful Book, Before and after mass prayers, Many ribbons, Name engraving


Comments on daily Missal


By: 
 
						Very pleased.
(Calgary, Alberta, Canada., January 18, 2012)


Review:
Having only just received my daily Missal, it will take me some time to get used to the layout & find my way around. The type set is very clear. Having 6 ribbon markers does away with the need to use cards, a good thing @ present as, due to new stiffness, it's difficult to insert them between pages.
I like the binding & the gold embossing gives it the appearance of something of quality, befitting of a religious publication. I hope it will be with me for years to come - unless another translation is deemed necessary!


New Missal


By: 
 
						Rich the Acolyte
(Minneapolis, MN, January 17, 2012)


Review:
The Missal is absolutely beautiful and everything I expected.    And the engraving of my name on the cover makes it so special. Best Uses: Daily Mass; Pros: Engraving was outstanding, Missal is beautiful, Service was outstanding


Roman Missal


By: 
 
						mama
(California, January 13, 2012)


Review:
Beautiful and very complete. Not only does it have the complete Mass but all the prayers that one needs to be a practicing Christian Catholic.


3rd edition Roman Missal


By: 
 
						Judith (She's in the bible)
(Skagit County WA, January 13, 2012)


Review:
This was a gift for my husband and I think he will get a lot of comfort from it. Best Uses: Daily time w/ the church; Cons: Pages so delicate; Pros: Beautiful


The Daily Roman Missal Has It All


By: 
 
						Brother John Robert Paul
(Wisconsin, January 13, 2012)


Review:
I use the Daily Roman Missal as often as I can whenever I go to Church- It has many prayers for different purposes
More than two ribbons which is nice to flip back and forth with to demarcate sections
Clear directions for use
Wonderful Illustrations
Just like my missal I used throughout the 50's and 60's! Best Uses: Use it every day; Cons: None-have waited so long; Pros: Clear directions tabs, Easy to navigate and clea


A useful tool in pursuing your faith


By: 
 
						Joe
(Folsom, NJ, January 9, 2012)


Review:
I've used St. Joseph's missals prior which were easier to use than this but were not so comprehensive as to include both Sunday, Daily, and Latin masses.  The only thing missing is the Hymnal, but that is a difficult order to fill.  Besides this book is somewhat large already.  If you never used a missal before, you may find this edition difficult to use at first.  You will overcome this after a few masses. In summary, I believe this is a perfect gift for yourself or a friend that you or they will be proud to own. It will add to your mass experience to read the readings before you go and help you through the latin mass sections on EWTN. Worth the money. Best Uses: For all masses, Prep before during  aft; Cons: Need to learn how to use; Pros: Also for latin masses too, Beautiful gold like edges, Complete  up to date, Many ribbons to use, More info than just mass, Opt name imprinting great


its awesome. i would recommend it


By: 
 
						aky
(upper Marlboro MD, January 6, 2012)


Review:
its easy to use


A perfect companion for Holy Mass


By: 
 
						Retired Ken
(Norwich, CT, January 6, 2012)


Review:
I was searching for a new Missal for my wife that included the three year cycle for Sundays, the two year cycle for weekdays and the new Liturgy. When I talked to Catholic Company the women told me this Missal was what I was looking for. That was an understatement! Not only does it contain all I asked about but is absolutly beautiful. I had my wife's name and church embossed in gold leaf, beautiful. The leather cover, the six place keeper ribbons, and the ease of use enhance the joy of participation in the Holy Mass.


My purchase was perfect


By: 
 
						Terry
(Spring, Texas, January 6, 2012)


Review:
My first visit to the Catholic Company was great.  Easy to navigate and find what you want.  Order process was smooth.
I'll be back. Pros: Embossed Name very nice, QUALITY IS EXCELLENT, Size is just right


Love the Daily Roman Missal


By: 
 
						Jim
(Arlingotn, VA, January 5, 2012)


Review:
Using it daily allows you to learn the beauty of God's word.  Once you get the lay out down pat, it becomes simpler to use.


A Masterful Missal


By: 
 
						Mass Meister
(Doylestown, Ohio, January 4, 2012)


Review:
I keep this Missal on my office desk as a way to prepare myself to celebrate the coming Mass. It helps me to enter more fully into the revised translation, to reflect upon the richness of the new texts, and so be able to celebrate the Liturgy with devotion, understanding and fervor. It also enables me to look ahead at the Readings in preparation for homilies. Also, it is a wonderful resource for personal prayer and spiritual nourishment. As a priest for thirty years, I can say that the revised translation of The Mass has renewed my own priestly spirituality, and that we all now have a translation of The Mass that truly expresses the depth of The Sacred Mysteries we celebrate in the Liturgy. This edition makes it all the more beautiful and fulfilling to enter into the celebration of The Mass. Best Uses: Liturgical participation, Personal prayer, Study reflection; Pros: Beautiful artwork, Easy to use format, Good Saints Day intro, Inspiring devotions, Quality Paper, Well made book


Well Done


By: 
 
						Diane
(Sanford, NC, January 4, 2012)


Review:
Perfect for preparing for, participating in, and reflecting upon Mass and the Catholic experience.  Bought one for my mother and liked it so much, I bought one for myself.


Beautiful Memory of Mass of My Childhood


By: 
 
						Chris
(Somerset, NJ, January 3, 2012)


Review:
In addition to Masses for a three year cycle, the missal contains various prayers and litanies that I have not heard since I was a child.  The only difficulty that I experienced was the missal is heavier than I originally thought.  It is a little hard for me to handle.  But it is so beautiful that I will continue to use it and enjoy it. Best Uses: Prayers outside of Mass; Cons: Bit Hard for Older Hands, Heavier than Thought; Pros: Beautiful binding, Perfect Gold Leaf, Prayers of my Childhood, Ribbon markers


Excellent Missal


By: 
 
						Jim the reader
(gibbstown, NJ, January 3, 2012)


Review:
This is an excellent Missal.  I enjoy it daily.


exactly what I was looking for


By: 
 
						CBrad
(Zephyrhills, Fl, December 31, 2011)


Review:
Use my missal every time I go to church, which is every Sunday and holy days!  I like the longer ribbon markers and the print is very easy to read.


A beautiful Missal, with all of the new


By: 
 
						Phil
(Lancaster, NY, December 31, 2011)


Review:
Wonderful Missal that in my opinion should be refined in the area of locating pages to match the appropriate Mass day and readings.  I believe that they should set up a better "date schedule" listing pages to coincide with the date you are looking for.  There is confusion in this area, but again a beautiful fine Missal and keepsake.


Printing too light


By: 
 
						Sue Van
(Kansas City, Kansas, December 30, 2011)


Review:
Received shortly after ordering.  With a book of this size I know the print size has to be smaller, but it could certainly be darker to make it much easier to read. Best Uses: Daily Use; Cons: Printing too light


Almost perfect missal


By: 
 
						Mary
(North Carolina, December 30, 2011)


Review:
excellent--prompt Best Uses: Daily Mass; Cons: Ribbon quality is poor; Pros: Excellent quality, Good images, Well Organized


This was a Christmas gift to myself...


By: 
 
						ronnb110 with Christ Our Lord
(Western, Canada, December 27, 2011)


Review:
With this I begin my day and end my day..... In a day filled with challenges and self indulgence, I take solace in the fact that Jesus is with me always, today and forever more.


This is a product I would purchase again


By: 
 
						Karen
(Iron Mountain, MI, December 27, 2011)


Review:
Bought this Roman Missal for my husband for a Christmas present.  I had it engraved on the leather cover.  He was thrilled.  It looks so 'rich' and the price was better even with the engraving added than one of the more popular Catholic sites.  I felt it was a great deal and my spouse was so pleased!


This is a wonderful guide to the Mass


By: 
 
						Donna
(Moreno Valley, December 26, 2011)


Review:
I use the Daily Roman Missal daily for the responses of the congregation and to follow the readings.  I like the expanded prayers it has. I have shared them with many people! It has helped to improve my prayer life.


A treasure from the Bishop's committee.


By: 
 
						Poor in Spirit
(America, December 26, 2011)


Review:
This was a gift for Christmas 2011.


The Roman Daily missal


By: 
 
						pat
(Arizona, December 23, 2011)


Review:
I go to a traditional mass.I find the missal very handy as it helps me to follow along during the rite. Pros: Beautiful Leather Binding, Easy to navigate, Easy To Read, English and latin side by side


At Last!


By: 
 
						Kenny
(Brantford ON, Canada, December 21, 2011)


Review:
I do daily prayers morning and night and use the prayers in this Missal. They are identical to the ones I am used to saying.
I find the book easy to navigate, and certainly easy to follow the Mass. I have been waiting for the Missal since I learned of the changes coming in Advent. Thanks, I'm not disappointed. Best Uses: Daily Mass, Daily prayer, Special Prayers, Sunday mass; Cons: none; Pros: Compact, Current language, Easy to follow, Prayers up to date, Same format as last one


roman missal


By: 
 
						brooke
(greenport, ny, December 21, 2011)


Review:
daily mass Best Uses: Eucharistic ministry; Cons: A little bulky; Pros: Beautifully Made


Exceedingly well done volume


By: 
 
						dragonlady221
(new york city, December 21, 2011)


Review:
well worth the price.  it will be a joy to use.


Excellent Transaction


By: 
 
						dee
(sulphur springs, texas, December 20, 2011)


Review:
Missal very professionally done.  Beautiful as well as usable.


Daily Roman Missal, Third Addition


By: 
 
						Lt Colonel Tom
(Studio City, CA, December 20, 2011)


Review:
I received the Missal within three days after paying for it.
I take the Missal with me every time I go to Church for whatever reason--it is a guide for almost everything.   
It is the best, most complete Missal I have ever used!!!  Well worth the cost and I highly recommend it. Pros: A handsome volume, Blessed Sacrament Visits, Catholic Prayers, Entire Liturgical year, Great Liturgical Calendar, Guide for Confession, Holy days, I highly Recommend it, Major Devotions, Many other pluses, Mass in Latin AND English, Well Organized


Worth Waiting For


By: 
 
						Jim and Kathy
(Hurst, Texas, December 20, 2011)


Review:
We will use this missal at Mass on Weekdays as well as Sundays.  Since some churches have gone back to Latin responses it is handy to have it on the opposite page as the English. Best Uses: Everyday and Sunday; Pros: Complete, Has Latin translation


I would buy it again. I like everything


By: 
 
						mems6kids
(New Hampshire, December 20, 2011)


Review:
Everything is easy to find and I can follow the Mass without getting lost. Thank you Best Uses: Easy to use; Cons: none; Pros: It is a beautiful book


Daily Roman Missal, Third Edition


By: 
 
						Janey
(New Jersey, December 20, 2011)


Review:
I have used the Daily Roman Missal for years, and was satisfied with the previous versions. Our church uses the Eucharistic Prayers for Reconciliation I and II a lot...so as they  are not  included in this Third Edition-- is a definite negative. Best Uses: Daily Mass; Cons: Eucharistic Prayers, No Reconciliation; Pros: A good format


Beautiful outside & inside as well!


By: 
 
						Lar
(Mo, December 19, 2011)


Review:
To quote my son It's awesome! Just what I wanted! I even had people at church oohhing over it.
He couldn't be happier with it.


Happy to have the new Roman Missal


By: 
 
						Tia
(Pittsburgh, PA, December 18, 2011)


Review:
It is not as big as I was afraid it would be, even though it has both Sunday and weekday masses, so it fits nicely in my prayer tote.  There are prayers, Commandments, examination of conscience in the back and lots of ribbons to mark your special places.  I haven't had a chance to look at everything yet, but I am really happy I have this.  It was worth the money for me.


VERY ATTRACTIVE EASY TO USE AND FULL


By: 
 
						NEIL
(NAHANT MA, December 18, 2011)


Review:
I USE AT DAILY MASS ITS FULL OF BASIC CATHOLIC LITURGY HAVEN'T FOUND ANYTHING WRONG.


New Roman Missal, Third Edition


By: 
 
						Rege
(McKnight, PA, December 17, 2011)


Review:
I think the Ribbon Markers are too thin.  I own the previous edition, and they are much heavier than these.  I just hope they hold up with daily use.  Other than that the Missal meets my expectations.


Glad I Purchased It


By: 
 
						golf_bug
(Kalamazoo, MI diocese, December 17, 2011)


Review:
Since I do not have the option to attend daily Mass, I have been using the missal to read the daily readings and especially like having the feast day readings for the saints.  I follow my church calendar, and when it is a special day, I read those.  Love the quality and look of the missal.  Haven't had one since I was a kid. Best Uses: Use at Mass, Use for daily readings; Cons: none; Pros: Beautiful gold edging, Good Quality, Lots of good content


Beautiful but Incomplete


By: 
 
						Truth Seeker
(Mount Clemens, MI, December 17, 2011)


Review:
I feel very blest to own this Missal. I was, however, disappointed to discover it is incomplete.  The first Mass at which I used this was the Optional Memorial of Juan Diego.  After the Collect, there was no page to turn to for the rest of the Presidential Prayers and antiphons. Under the Common for Holy Men & Women, sections B and C are missing, which would have had the prayers for One Saint.  I expect I shall find other omissions as the year goes on. Best Uses: An aid to prayer, For participation during, Preparing for Mass; Cons: Incomplete; Pros: Beautiful, Comfortable to carry, Easy to use, Extensive Prayer section, Guide for good Catholics, Luxurious


Very Satisfied


By: 
 
						Ed
(Crestview, FL, December 17, 2011)


Review:
Makes Mass a more personal experience. Many devotional prayers are a bonus. Pros: Everything I expected


I will  teasure this beautiful missal.


By: 
 
						Grammy Linda
(Turlock CA, December 16, 2011)


Review:
It is a beautiful book.It looks lovely on a table or desk. It just draws you in to take it in hand and open it and start reading.The pages are thin and fragile so be gentle with it.I plan to use it for daily private prayer and meditation. Best Uses: Daily mass readings, Daily private prayer; Cons: Pages are very thin; Pros: Comforting to hold, Easy to Carry, Easy To Read, Soft ribbons


A beautiful book!


By: 
 
						Marie
(Mt. Morris NY, December 16, 2011)


Review:
This missal was beautiful. The cover was lovely as were the pages. It was just too large and heavy for me to handle. I would not recommend it for older people with any arthritis in their hands. It made me very sad to return it. Cons: Too large for me to hold; Pros: Very well done


Well made and attractive


By: 
 
						Clem
(Cape Cod, December 16, 2011)


Review:
Easy to use


Daily Roman Missal 3rd Edition


By: 
 
						stanbbb
(Santee S.C, November 16, 2011)


Review:
This is a MUST Have for the upcoming change in the New Translation of the Mass. I especially love it because it has the Sunday Readings in it also. I never learned Latin. This Missal has the Latin Translation next to the order of mass, which is Great. Now I don't have to worry about the priest asking me to Read during the week,because I now have it at my finger tips. The Con is that it does not come enclosed in a zipped cover, for protection. Other than that I love it. I will also order the Sunday Missal 3rd Edition when it becomes available.




Return to the top of the page.


Quantity: 
Add to Cart


 




Company Information

About Us
Contact Us
Careers
Internship
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Link to Us
Affiliate Program
Blog
Site Map



Shopping Information

Shipping Information
Wish List
Gift Card Balance
Product Reviews
Popular Searches
Printable Order Form
Parish/Bulk Orders
How to Order



Our Catalogs

Request Catalog

Satisfaction Guaranteed

Total Satisfaction Policy
Return Policy
Order Tracking



















		Partners: New Lily • Rosary


		© 2017 Trinity Road, LLC. All rights reserved. Website by Trinity Road, LLC.
	







Receive 15% Off In Your Inbox
on your first order over $35
Join our email list to learn about discounts,special offers, new products and promotions!

Join
*Offer valid for new email subscribers only. Discount valid for all orders over $35. See email for restrictions and coupon code. We value your privacy.







 






Building Shareholder Confidence | #1 Blog for Regulatory Compliance | Page 14

















































Building Shareholder Confidence


#1 Blog for Regulatory Compliance


Skip to content

HomeIR & SEC Library
PR & Marcom Library
Products & Services
LinkedIn
Contact us









← Older posts
Newer posts →


IPOs and Transactions: Nov 14 – 18 / plus 2017 Mutual Funds filing deadline calendar

Posted on November 21, 2016 | Leave a comment


There were 51 transactions filed with the SEC last week.
Congratulations to all of the corporations and law firms that selected our transactions services last week including Medley LLC w/ Fried, Frank, Harris, Shriver & Jacobson LLP and Winston & Strawn LLP and Digital Donations Technologies Inc. w/ Cassidy & Associates.
We appreciate that they selected to work with us and we’re pleased that they found us to be the intelligent value.




Law firm / advisor
Registrant
Symbol
Form
Industry


Baker Botts L.L.P.
PENN VIRGINIA CORP
PVA
S-1
Crude petroleum & natural gas


Barnes & Thornburg LLP
AMERICA FIRST MULTIFAMILY INVESTORS LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
ATAX
S-3
Finance services


Bonner & Associates
MEXICO SALES MADE EASY INC
~
S-1
~


Cahill Gordon & Reindel LLP
ARDAGH FINANCE HOLDINGS S.A.
~
F-1
~


Cassidy & Associates
DIGITAL DONATIONS TECHNOLOGIES INC
~
S-1
Blank checks


Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP
ENDURANCE INTERNATIONAL GROUP HOLDINGS INC
CTCT;EIGI
S-4
Direct mail advertising services / prepackaged software


Cleary Gottlieb Steen & Hamilton LLP
ENDURANCE INTERNATIONAL GROUP HOLDINGS INC
EIGI
S-3
Direct mail advertising services / prepackaged software


Cooley LLP
STEADYMED LTD
STDY
S-3
Pharma preparations


Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP
AT&T INC
T
S-4
Telephone communications


Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP
KINSALE CAPITAL GROUP INC
KNSL
S-1
Fire, marine & casualty insurance


Debevoise & Plimpton LLP
SITEONE LANDSCAPE SUPPLY INC
SITE
S-1
Landscape counseling & planning


Disclosure Law Group, PC
BRIDGELINE DIGITAL INC
BLIN
S-3
Prepackaged software


DLA Piper LLP
MARRIOTT INTERNATIONAL INC
MAR
S-4
Hotels & motels


Ellenoff Grossman & Schole LLP
FRANKLY INC
~
S-1
~


EMR Technology Solutions, Inc.
EMR TECHNOLOGY SOLUTIONS INC
~
10-12G
~


Fenwick & West LLP
IMPINJ INC
PI
S-1
Electronic components


Fried, Frank, Harris, Shriver & Jacobson LLP
MEDLEY LLC
MDLX
S-1
Investment advice


Gary Steven Findley & Associates
CVB FINANCIAL CORP
CVBF
S-4
State commercial banks


Gibson, Dunn & Crutcher LLP
LA JOLLA PHARMACEUTICAL CO
LJPC
S-3
Biological products


Gibson, Dunn & Crutcher LLP
MARRIOTT INTERNATIONAL INC
MAR
S-4
Hotels & motels


Gibson, Dunn & Crutcher LLP
GALLAGHER ARTHUR J & CO
AJG
S-4
Insurance agents, brokers & service


Goodwin Procter LLP
AMPLIFY SNACK BRANDS INC
BETR
S-3
Food preparations, not elsewhere classified


Goodwin Procter LLP
BEYONDSPRING INC
~
F-1
Pharma preparations


Goodwin Procter LLP
TURBO TRAVEL HOLDING B.V.
~
F-1
Computer processing & data preparation


Graubard Miller
PARKERVISION INC
PRKR
S-3
Radio & television broadcasting & communications equipment


Gunderson Dettmer Stough Villeneuve Franklin & Hachigian, LLP
SYNACOR INC
SYNC
S-3
Computer processing & data preparation


Gunderson Dettmer Stough Villeneuve Franklin & Hachigian, LLP
NATERA INC
NTRA
S-3
Medical laboratories


Helios Exchange, Inc.
HELIOS EXCHANGE INC
~
1-A
~


Hogan Lovells US LLP
URANIUM RESOURCES INC
URRE
S-3
Metal mining


Incorp Services, Inc.
KALMIN CORP
~
S-1
~


Jones Day
TRANSDIGM INC
TDG
S-4
Fabricated metal products


K&L Gates LLP
CHINA GEWANG BIOTECHNOLOGY INC
RCHR
S-1
Food & kindred products


Katzenell Dimant
STEADYMED LTD
STDY
S-3
Pharma preparations


Kirkland & Ellis LLP
ICHOR HOLDINGS LTD
~
S-1
Semiconductors & related devices


Kirkland & Ellis LLP
OPTIV INC
~
S-1
Computer integrated systems design


Latham & Watkins LLP
ICHOR HOLDINGS LTD
~
S-1
Semiconductors & related devices


Latham & Watkins LLP
COTIVITI HOLDINGS INC
COTV
S-1
Business services


Latham & Watkins LLP
TURBO TRAVEL HOLDING B.V.
~
F-1
Computer processing & data preparation


Legion Capital Corporation
LEGION CAPITAL CORP
~
1-A
~


Lowenstein Sandler LLP
FRANKLY INC
~
S-1
~


Manatt, Phelps & Phillips, LLP
CVB FINANCIAL CORP
CVBF
S-4
State commercial banks


Mintz, Levin, Cohn, Ferris, Glovsky and Popeo, P.C.
CALADRIUS BIOSCIENCES INC
CLBS
S-3
Miscellaneous health & allied services


Morgan, Lewis & Bockius LLP
HOSTESS BRANDS INC
TWNK
S-3
Blank checks


Morgan, Lewis & Bockius LLP
ALPHA & OMEGA SEMICONDUCTOR LTD
AOSL
S-3
Semiconductors & related devices


Paul Hastings LLP
CROSSAMERICA PARTNERS LP
CAPL
S-3
Wholesale – petroleum & petroleum products


Pearlman Law Group LLP
SOCIAL REALITY INC
SRAX
S-3
Advertising agencies


Pearlman Law Group LLP
SOCIAL REALITY INC
SRAX
S-3
Advertising agencies


Pepper Hamilton LLP
BOJANGLES’ INC
BOJA
S-3
Retail eating places


Pierce Atwood LLP
IMMUCELL CORP
ICCC
S-3
In vitro & in vivo diagnostic substances


Porter Hedges LLP
PAR PACIFIC HOLDINGS INC
PARR
S-3
Crude petroleum & natural gas


Porter, Wright, Morris & Arthur LLP
FIRST COMMONWEALTH FINANCIAL CORP
FCF
S-4
National commercial banks


Shearman & Sterling LLP
ARDAGH FINANCE HOLDINGS S.A.
~
F-1
~


Sichenzia Ross Ference Kesner LLP
ALZAMEND NEURO INC
~
1-A
Pharma preparations


Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP
SITEONE LANDSCAPE SUPPLY INC
SITE
S-1
Landscape counseling & planning


Simpson Thacher & Bartlett LLP
OPTIV INC
~
S-1
Computer integrated systems design


Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom LLP
KINSALE CAPITAL GROUP INC
KNSL
S-1
Fire, marine & casualty insurance


Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom LLP
BEYONDSPRING INC
~
F-1
Pharma preparations


Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom LLP
NATERA INC
NTRA
S-3
Medical laboratories


Squire Patton Boggs LLP
FIRST COMMONWEALTH FINANCIAL CORP
FCF
S-4
National commercial banks


Stroock & Stroock & Lavan LLP
PBF FINANCE CORP
~
S-4
Petroleum refining


Sullivan & Cromwell LLP
AT&T INC
T
S-4
Telephone communications


Sunset Island Group, Inc.
SUNSET ISLAND GROUP
~
S-1
~


SW Innovative Holdings, Inc.
SW INNOVATIVE HOLDINGS INC
SWHI
1-A
Telephone communications


Vincent & Rees
CH REAL ESTATE II INC
~
S-1
Real estate


Vinson & Elkins L.L.P.
CRYOLIFE INC
CRY
S-3
Surgical & medical instruments & apparatus


Weil, Gotshal & Manges LLP
COTIVITI HOLDINGS INC
COTV
S-1
Business services


Wiggin and Dana LLP
CAS MEDICAL SYSTEMS INC
CASM
S-3
Surgical & medical instruments & apparatus


Wilson Sonsini Goodrich & Rosati PC
IMPINJ INC
PI
S-1
Electronic components


Windels Marx Lane & Mittendorf, LLP
NANO STONE INC
~
1-A
~


Winston & Strawn LLP
MEDLEY LLC
MDLX
S-1
Investment advice



Whether in-house, your-house or 100% virtual… click here to discover why we are the intelligent value for both traditional and confidential IPOs.
Post IPO, thousands of organizations count on us to assure regulatory compliance and target new investors. Click here and opt-in to receive this weekly summary via email.
Click here to review the week’s underwriters.
Have a great week


 
Share this:TwitterFacebookLinkedIn 

Leave a comment

Posted in IPO week in review 



IPO Underwriters of the Week: Nov 14 – 18

Posted on November 21, 2016 | Leave a comment


Congratulations to the corporations and underwriters that worked with our transaction services team. Whether in-house, your-house or 100% virtual… click here to discover why we are the intelligent value for both traditional and confidential IPOs.




Registrant
Form
Underwriter 1
Underwriter 2
Underwriter 3 +


BEYONDSPRING INC
F-1
Citigroup Global Markets Inc.
Guggenheim Securities, LLC
FBR Capital Markets & Co. / China Renaissance Securities (Hong Kong) Limited / Trout Capital LLC


ARDAGH FINANCE HOLDINGS S.A.
F-1
Citigroup Global Markets Inc.
~
~


ICHOR HOLDINGS LTD
S-1
Deutsche Bank Securities Inc.
Stifel, Nicolaus & Company, Inc.
RBC Capital Markets, LLC / Cowen and Company, LLC / Needham & Company, LLC


MEDLEY LLC
S-1
FBR Capital Markets & Co.
Incapital LLC
Ladenburg Thalmann & Co. Inc. / Compass Point Research & Trading, LLC / William Blair & Company, L.L.C. / JonesTrading Institutional Services LLC / National Securities Corporation / Maxim Group LLC / Boenning & Scattergood, Inc.


SITEONE LANDSCAPE SUPPLY INC
S-1
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
UBS Securities LLC
~


COTIVITI HOLDINGS INC
S-1
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
~


TURBO TRAVEL HOLDING B.V.
F-1
J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC / Allen & Company LLC / Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Inc. / Citigroup Global Markets Inc. / Deutsche Bank Securities Inc. / Cowen and Company, LLC / Guggenheim Securities, LLC


KINSALE CAPITAL GROUP INC
S-1
J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
William Blair & Company, L.L.C.
RBC Capital Markets, LLC / SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc. / Dowling & Partners Securities LLC / Moelis & Company LLC


OPTIV INC
S-1
Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
Barclays Capital Inc. / Citigroup Global Markets Inc. / Blackstone Advisory Partners L.P. / Raymond James & Associates, Inc. / William Blair & Company, L.L.C. / Evercore Group L.L.C. / Guggenheim Securities, LLC / PJT Partners LP


IMPINJ INC
S-1
Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC
RBC Capital Markets, LLC
Pacific Crest Securities / Piper Jaffray & Co. / Needham & Company, LLC / Canaccord Genuity Inc.


FRANKLY INC
S-1
Roth Capital Partners, LLC
Noble Financial Capital Markets
~


CHINA GEWANG BIOTECHNOLOGY INC
S-1
ViewTrade Securities Inc.
~
~



Post IPO, thousands of organizations count on us to assure regulatory compliance and shareholder communications.
Click here to review the week’s IPOs and active securities law firms. Click here and opt-in to receive this weekly summary via email.
Have a great week.
 
 
Share this:TwitterFacebookLinkedIn 

Leave a comment

Posted in Top underwriters 



SEC closed for Thanksgiving Holiday: Thursday, November 24

Posted on November 18, 2016 | Leave a comment



In honor of Thanksgiving Day, the SEC is closed on Thursday, November 24, 2016. No files can be received.
Files submitted after 5:30 pm ET, Wednesday, November 23, 2016 will receive a filing date of Friday, November 25, 2016 and will be posted to the public on November 25.
As with other holiday closings, the following file types will receive a Wednesday, November 23, 2016 filing date if filed by 10:00 pm ET on Wednesday:

Section 16 filings (3, 3/A, 4, 4/A, 5, 5/A)
Filings pursuant to Rule 462(b)

For any filing with a due date of Thursday, November 24, 2016, the SEC will move the due date to the next business day, Friday, November 25, 2016.
Have a great day.
Share this:TwitterFacebookLinkedIn 

Leave a comment

Posted in Industry news 



Mitigate filing deadlines risk with easy-to-read 2017 FYE calendar for Mutual Funds

Posted on November 17, 2016 | Leave a comment


To help keep track of the varying filing deadlines across funds with different fiscal-year-ends, we’re pleased to offer our 2017 Mutual Fund & ETF Filing Calendar.

CLICK HERE TO ORDER & DOWNLOAD YOUR CALENDAR
Both mailed to you to hang up on your bulletin board and as download, you’ll find this colorful and segmented month-by-moth per fiscal-year-end calendar perfect to remind you of those key filing and mailing dates.

Easy to read – separated by fiscal-year-end per page and month


Includes individual filing and mailing dates for all 12 FYE dates


Includes federal holidays


(FREE)
Share this:TwitterFacebookLinkedIn 

Leave a comment

Posted in Mutual Funds 



Video: October’s Top Law Firms for SEC transactions

Posted on November 16, 2016 | Leave a comment


As subject matter experts in transactions i.e. IPOs and M&A, we carefully track the capital markets dealflow… daily, weekly and monthly. If you would like to be emailed the week’s transactions (every Monday afternoon), fill out the quick form on this page.

.
Congratulations to any and all of our partnering law firms that made this month’s list – and to the firms that worked with our teams on their clients’ transaction:

1-A: Form needed for companies taking advantage of Regulation A+


S-1: General form of registration statement for all companies including face-amount certificate companies


S-3: Registration statement for specified transactions by certain issuers


S-4 Registration of securities issued in business combination transactions


N-2: Initial filing of a registration statement on Form N-2 for closed-end investment companies


F-1: Registration statement for securities of certain foreign private issuers


S-11: Registration statement for securities to be issued by real estate companies


10-12G: Initial general form for registration of a class of securities pursuant to Section 12(g)


10-12B: Initial general form for registration of a class of securities pursuant to Section 12(b)

Have you read our whitepaper on how the S-1 registration paperwork flows back-and-forth between the company and the SEC?  CLICK HERE
Share this:TwitterFacebookLinkedIn 

Leave a comment

Posted in Top Ten law firms of the month 



IPOs and Transactions: Nov 7 – 11 / plus 2017 SEC Filing Deadline calendar

Posted on November 14, 2016 | Leave a comment


There were 47 transactions filed with the SEC last week.
Congratulations to all of the corporations and law firms that selected our transactions services last week including Alliqua Holdings Inc. w/ Haynes and Boone, LLP and Troutman Sanders LLP, XG Technology Inc. w/ Robinson Brog Leinwand Greene Genovese & Gluck P.C., Sinorama Corp. w/ O’Neal Law Office, First United Corp. w/ Gordon Feinblatt LLC also Reg A+ registrations Knightscope Inc. and Sagoon Inc. w/ KHLK LLP and Keen Home Inc.
We appreciate that they selected to work with us and we’re pleased that they found us to be the intelligent value.




Law firm / advisor
Registrant
Symbol
Form
Industry


Akerman LLP
RENNOVA HEALTH INC
RNVA
S-1
Computer processing & data preparation


Andrews Kurth Kenyon LLP
MID-CON ENERGY PARTNERS LP
MCEP
S-3
Crude petroleum & natural gas


Andrews Kurth LLP
NGL ENERGY PARTNERS LP
NGL
S-3
Wholesale – petroleum & petroleum products, except bulk stations


AT&T Inc.
AT&T INC
T
S-4
Telephone comms.


Baker & McKenzie LLP
FRANK’S INTERNATIONAL N.V.
FI
S-3
Oil & gas field services


Blank Rome, LLP
JWIZ INC
~
S-1
Computer processing & data preparation


Bryan Cave LLP
GRAYBAR ELECTRIC CO INC
1737B
S-1
Wholesale – electrical apparatus & equipment, wiring supplies


Cooley LLP
CERECOR INC
CERC
S-3
Pharma preparations


Davis Graham & Stubbs LLP
RESOLUTE ENERGY CORP
REN
S-3
Crude petroleum & natural gas


Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP
BEIGENE LTD
BGNE
S-1
Pharma preparations


Davis Polk & Wardwell LLP
CBOE HOLDINGS INC
CBOE
S-4
Security & commodity brokers, dealers, exchanges & services


Dechert LLP
GOLDMAN SACHS BDC INC
GSBD
N-2
Finance services


EastBiz.com, Inc.
LAZEX INC
~
S-1
~


Eaton Vance Tax-Managed Buy-Write Income Fund
EATON VANCE TAX-MANAGED BUY- WRITE INCOME FUND
ETB
N-2
Investment advice


Eaton Vance Tax-Managed Buy-Write Opportunities Fund
EATON VANCE TAX-MANAGED BUY- WRITE OPPORTUNITIES FUND
ETV
N-2
Investment advice


Ellenoff Grossman & Schole LLP
CAR CHARGING GROUP INC
CCGI
S-1
Power, distribution & specialty transformers


FBR & Co.
FBR & CO
FBRC
S-3
Security brokers, dealers & flotation companies


Fellheimer & Eichen LLP
OPTEX SYSTEMS HOLDINGS INC
OPXS
S-1
Optical instruments & lenses


Fried, Frank, Harris, Shriver & Jacobson LLP
GOLDMAN SACHS BDC INC
GSBD
N-2
Finance services


Gibson, Dunn & Crutcher LLP
HEWLETT PACKARD ENTERPRISE CO
HPE
S-4
Computer & office equipment


Goodwin Procter LLP
DIMENSION THERAPEUTICS INC
DMTX
S-3
Biological products


Goodwin Procter LLP
LENNAR CORP /NEW/
LEN
S-4
General building contractors- residential


Goodwin Procter LLP
BEIGENE LTD
BGNE
S-1
Pharma preparations


Gordon Feinblatt LLC
FIRST UNITED CORP
FUNC
S-1
National commercial banks


Haynes and Boone, LLP
ALLIQUA HOLDINGS INC
~
S-4
~


Herrick, Feinstein LLP
GADSDEN GROWTH PROPERTIES INC
~
S-11
~


Incorp Services, Inc.
BITMIS CORP
~
S-1
~


Jessica Nguyen Law
ALLEGRO BEAUTY PRODUCTS INC
~
S-1
~


Jones Day
AQUABOUNTY TECHNOLOGIES INC
ABTX
10-12B
Biological products


Keen Home Inc.
KEEN HOME INC
~
1-A
~


Kelley Drye & Warren LLP
CINEDIGM CORP
CIDM
S-1
Services – business services


KHLK LLP
KNIGHTSCOPE INC
~
1-A
~


KHLK LLP
SAGOON INC
~
1-A
~


Kramer Levin Naftalis & Frankel LLP
TRINITY PLACE HOLDINGS INC
TPHS
S-3
Retail – family clothing stores


Latham & Watkins LLP
WILDHORSE RESOURCE DEVELOPMENT CORP
~
S-1
Crude petroleum & natural gas


Latham & Watkins LLP
LENNAR CORP /NEW/
LEN
S-4
General building contractors- residential


Latham & Watkins LLP
USD PARTNERS LP
USDP
S-3
Railroad switching & terminal establishments


Legal & Compliance, LLC
HEALING TOUCH HOLDINGS INC
~
S-1
~


Lucosky Brookman LLP
CAR CHARGING GROUP INC
CCGI
S-1
Power, distribution & specialty transformers


Mintz, Levin, Cohn, Ferris, Glovsky and Popeo, P.C.
KERYX BIOPHARMA-CEUTICALS INC
KERX
S-3
Pharma preparations


Morse, Zelnick, Rose & Lander, LLP
JWIZ INC
~
S-1
Computer processing & data preparation


Nelson Mullins Riley & Scarborough LLP
HCSB FINANCIAL CORP
HCFB
S-1
Savings institutions, federally chartered


Norcor Technologies Corp.
NORCOR TECHNOLOGIES CORP
NCRT
10-12G
Construction-special trade contractors


O’Neal Law Office
SINORAMA CORP
~
S-1
~


Pepper Hamilton LLP
GADSDEN GROWTH PROPERTIES INC
~
S-11
~


Perkins Coie LLP
PUGET SOUND ENERGY INC
~
S-3
Electric services


Proskauer Rose LLP
PREFERRED APARTMENT COMMUNITIES INC
APTS
S-3
REITs


Robinson Brog Leinwand Greene Genovese & Gluck P.C.
XG TECHNOLOGY INC
XGTI
S-3
Communications


Sichenzia Ross Ference Kesner LLP
RENNOVA HEALTH INC
RNVA
S-1
Computer processing & data preparation


Sidley Austin LLP
CBOE HOLDINGS INC
CBOE
S-4
Security & commodity brokers, dealers, exchanges & services


Skadden, Arps, Slate, Meagher & Flom LLP
BLACKROCK FLOATING RATE INCOME STRATEGIES FUND INC
FRA
N-2
Unit investment trusts


Sullivan & Cromwell LLP
AT&T INC
T
S-4
Telephone comms


Tridentine Corp
TRIDENTINE CORP
~
1-A
~


Troutman Sanders LLP
ALLIQUA HOLDINGS INC
~
S-4
~


Venture Law Corporation
DUBUC MOTORS INC
~
1-A
~


Vinson & Elkins L.L.P.
WILDHORSE RESOURCE DEVELOPMENT CORP
~
S-1
Crude petroleum & natural gas


Willkie Farr & Gallagher LLP
GOLDMAN SACHS BDC INC
GSBD
N-2
Finance services


Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr LLP
KARYOPHARM THERAPEUTICS INC
KPTI
S-3
Pharma preparations


Wilmer Cutler Pickering Hale and Dorr LLP
TETRAPHASE PHARMACEUTICALS INC
TTPH
S-3
Pharma preparations


Wilson Sonsini Goodrich & Rosati, P.C.
CAR CHARGING GROUP INC
CCGI
S-1
Power, distribution & specialty transformers



Whether in-house, your-house or 100% virtual… click here to discover why we are the intelligent value for both traditional and confidential IPOs.
Post IPO, thousands of organizations count on us to assure regulatory compliance and target new investors. Click here and opt-in to receive this weekly summary via email.
Click here to review the week’s underwriters.
Have a great week
 
 
 
Share this:TwitterFacebookLinkedIn 

Leave a comment

Posted in IPO week in review 



IPO Underwriters of the Week: Nov 7 – 11

Posted on November 14, 2016 | Leave a comment


Congratulations to the corporations and underwriters that worked with our transaction services team. Whether in-house, your-house or 100% virtual… click here to discover why we are the intelligent value for both traditional and confidential IPOs.




Registrant
Form
Underwriter 1
Underwriter 2
Underwriter 3 +


WILDHORSE RESOURCE DEVELOPMENT CORP
S-1
Barclays Capital Inc.
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Inc.
BMO Capital Markets Corp. / Citigroup Global Markets Inc. / Wells Fargo Securities, LLC / Guggenheim Securities, LLC / J.P. Morgan Securities LLC / Raymond James & Associates, Inc. / Piper Jaffray & Co. / Tudor, Pickering, Holt & Co. Securities, Inc. / Capital One Securities, Inc. / Comerica Securities, Inc. / Scotia Capital (USA) Inc. / Wunderlich Securities, Inc.


DIMENSION THERAPEUTICS INC
S-3
Cantor Fitzgerald & Co.
~
~


KERYX BIO-PHARMACEUTICALS INC
S-3
Cantor Fitzgerald & Co.
~
~


GOLDMAN SACHS BDC INC
N-2
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
Goldman Sachs International
~


RENNOVA HEALTH INC
S-1
Joseph Gunnar & Co., LLC
~
~


JWIZ INC
S-1
Joseph Gunnar & Co., LLC
~
~


CAR CHARGING GROUP INC
S-1
Joseph Gunnar & Co., LLC
~
~


BEIGENE LTD
S-1
Morgan Stanley & Co. LLC
Goldman, Sachs & Co.
Cowen and Company, LLC


GADSDEN GROWTH PROPERTIES INC
S-11
National Securities Corporation
~
~


KNIGHTSCOPE INC
1-A
SI Securities, LLC
~
~



Post IPO, thousands of organizations count on us to assure regulatory compliance and shareholder communications.
Click here to review the week’s IPOs and active securities law firms. Click here and opt-in to receive this weekly summary via email.
Have a great week.
Share this:TwitterFacebookLinkedIn 

Leave a comment

Posted in Top underwriters 



REPORT: 50% of institutional investors “buy” on an IPO’s first day

Posted on November 11, 2016 | Leave a comment


2016 has been a lackluster year for traditional IPOs. Mini-IPOs via RegA+ is another story (READ HERE).
Regardless, institutional investors remain active in their appetite with just over half reporting them take a position on Day One.

The amount of energy it takes to IPO is enormous – and for many companies it is a watershed event. As explained in this video, we execute hundreds of SEC transactions each year.
Be sure your “financial brand” is well established and ready to go live before you ring any bells: IR Room, streamlined EDGAR and XBRL processes and a comprehensive shareholder communications strategy.

About the study
Initially launched in 2012, the Shareholder Confidence 365 Study is an ongoing survey targeted at two key constituents with whom public companies communicate: institutional investors and individual investors. It was the first study of its kind — directly asking investors how they consume investor relations content. In 2014, we published an updated study.
For this 2016 iteration, we have segmented and compared the results between institutional investors and individual investors. To date. we have accumulated over 6,870 responses from a pool of 16,000 buy-side analysts & portfolio managers and from over 15,000 long-term holding retail investors. There are 29 questions.
Questions include:

How often do you visit IR websites?
Why do you visit IR websites?
Do you use Twitter for stock research?
Would a CEO video instill trust?
Do you use earnings estimates?

The inbound response ratio is 1:3, Wall Street to Main Street. All of the data is unedited, except for any typos within the comments and the exclusion of inappropriate comments.
Click here to request the free Shareholder Confidence 365 Study.
Share this:TwitterFacebookLinkedIn 

Leave a comment

Posted in 2017: How Investors Consume IR Content (Wall v Main Streets) 



“I LOVE THIS [XBRL] SYSTEM!”

Posted on November 10, 2016 | Leave a comment


Fast turns and spot-on execution has redefined Vintage, helping us to be a top three solution in North America. Our work is highlighted every Monday in our “IPOs and Transactions of the Week” blog and email.  Importantly, our week’s success isfurther highlighted (and celebrated) by the appreciative notes our operations people receive each day from our clients.

We can’t not share the good news (anonymized for privacy). Sales can offer you full named references.
Here is just a handful of the week’s notes:
.

Kudos to our EDGAR team

Thank you all so much for all of your hard work!  Great job getting this done!
.
.


Kudos to our Typesetting team
We made today’s filing deadline with a couple minutes to spare. Well done everyone for the great teamwork to get this amendment done in an accurate and timely manner.
A sincere thank you!
.


Kudos to our EDGAR team
Our move from to Vintage was simple and our first experience was one of confidence. There were less errors/corrections than we had previously encountered [w/ other firm] and there was an attention to detail that I very much appreciated.
Since that time, we have been very pleased with our transactions and any changes we required were done in an incredibly timely fashion. In our industry, changes become necessary at the very last moment and Vintage was able to accommodate the last minute stresses very well.
.


Kudos to our Mutual Funds team
So much better! Thanks for being so proactive.
.
.


Kudos to our XBRL team
We are finished with our first draft. I have forwarded it to the accountants and attorney for comments.
.
.


Kudos to our Print team
Great. Thanks to you guys’ outstanding work!
.
.


Kudos to our EDGAR team
Thanks everyone for another successful filing! We appreciate all of the hard work and patience through our many changes.
.
.

Our rebrand was not just a logo change – it was a systemic and cultural reform throughout our operations. Our president, Liam Power, challenged his team to deliver the industry’s intelligent value, measured as fast turns and spot-on execution of services. You can meet Liam Power on this video. 
Thanks to our experts for delivering intelligent value!
Share this:TwitterFacebookLinkedIn 

Leave a comment

Posted in Client praise 



Experts share XBRL’s biggest challenges as we move into 2017

Posted on November 9, 2016 | Leave a comment


Greater transparency, lower filing costs, reduced risks and better data quality – these long-promised benefits of XBRL are finally becoming a reality. As the XBRL landscape continues its swift evolution, we discussed the latest developments with five experts – as well as with a representative of the SEC.

Vintage Question > In your view, what are the biggest challenges currently being tackled by filers when it comes to implementing XBRL?
Jaret Klekota > When it comes to implementing XBRL, the main issue for registrants is coordinating and incorporating all of the quality-control activities in their process. The close of the financial statement and the SEC submission process is already a busy time. And they need to make sure that they understand the complexities and risks of XBRL. A lot of clients use third-party XBRL creation providers, and we help to make sure that these third parties are following all the necessary rules. We want to be sure that our clients are comfortable that these tags truly represent what their financial statements are disclosing.
Campbell Pryde > One of the major issues currently is with extensions. The main problem with extensions is that there are elements in a taxonomy which exist but are not being used, and someone goes in and makes an extension for it instead. Our Data Quality Committee, of which Vintage is a founding member, has started addressing that issue with more comprehensive guidance on where and when you should use extensions. A lot of that is just getting decent guidance out there. I don’t think it’s fair to say that extensions are a bad thing, however. I think they are bad when used inappropriately, and the main cases are when a company creates an extension with an element that already exists in the taxonomy.
Or, secondly, they create an extension to differentiate an amount which is immaterial. If it’s immaterial, then why create it? But that’s actually quite common. It’s largely a matter of making people feel comfortable with that, which I think will help drive the issue out of the systems.

Pranav Ghai > I agree with Campbell – the custom tags are an issue. The idea of these custom extensions is that your metric doesn’t quite fit what the taxonomy wanted it to, so you create something special.
But the problem is that there’s no linking between the base taxonomy and that extension. These things become step-children and it’s much more difficult to figure out the logic. If you’re comparing three or four companies — let alone 10 or 20 — if a couple of them have extensions, it becomes very difficult to compare them, even if they are ostensibly the same thing. One of the things Calcbench has done is a lot of extension mapping.
Ilya Vadeiko > Although we do not work on the filing side, we observe a fair amount of variability and inconsistency in disclosure reporting. Some filers are clearly struggling with reporting their face financials consistently. We believe that this usually results from the fact that the filers do not use or look at their own XBRL data from the point of view of investor relations or business analysis of their peers. This feedback loop should help improve implementation and eliminate issues in meaningful choices of XBRL elements.
Hudson Hollister > The most difficult part has already been done by every company, because XBRL is already mandatory. But XRBL electronically expresses how all the numbers relate to each other. So you’ve got to have somebody who knows how to do that. Some of the software products out there, like the ones offered by Vintage, give you an interface to do that, which makes it much easier. You don’t need to be a data expert.

Share this:TwitterFacebookLinkedIn 

Leave a comment

Posted in XBRL 



← Older posts
Newer posts →





Follow compliance discussions via email








 


Search discussions

Search for:



Top 5 discussions






								"Looks great, OK to file. I appreciate your quick turnaround and great work as always!"							








								A review of Section 16 filing responsibilities							








								What is required in an SEC 10-K file							








								IR Room Fundamentals: Are investor relations websites required by the SEC?							








								The success of the Confidential S-1 filing process is not confidential							



Discussion topics 
2017: How Investors Consume IR Content (Wall v Main Streets)

Annual reports

Before, During and After of your IPO

Client praise

How Investors Consume IR Content: 2014

Industry Events

Industry news

Investor relations

IPO

IPO series: The Ins and Outs of Preparing for an IPO

IPO week in review

IR benchmarking study

IR Fundamentals

M&A

Mutual Funds

News Releases

SEC Regulations

Shareholder Confidence 365 Study

Social media for IR

Targeting Investors

Top Ten law firms of the month

Top underwriters

Uncategorized

Vintage

Virtual Data Rooms

Virtual Investor Conferences

XBRL


Past discussions 
June 2017
May 2017
April 2017
March 2017
February 2017
January 2017
December 2016
November 2016
October 2016
September 2016
August 2016
July 2016
June 2016
May 2016
April 2016
March 2016
February 2016
January 2016
December 2015
November 2015
October 2015
September 2015
August 2015
July 2015
June 2015
May 2015
April 2015
March 2015
February 2015
January 2015
December 2014
November 2014
October 2014
September 2014
August 2014
July 2014
June 2014
May 2014
April 2014
March 2014
February 2014
January 2014
December 2013
November 2013
October 2013
September 2013
August 2013
July 2013
June 2013
May 2013
April 2013
March 2013
February 2013
January 2013
December 2012
November 2012
October 2012
September 2012
August 2012
July 2012
June 2012
May 2012
April 2012
March 2012
February 2012

 



IR and compliance tweetsError: Twitter did not respond. Please wait a few minutes and refresh this page.RSS - Posts
 







 



Blog at WordPress.com.
















Post to



Cancel







 





















































































































































